==========================================================================
TITAN QUEST GUIDE & WALKTHROUGH
(THQ/Iron Lore)
Version 1.1
==========================================================================

Version History

0.8: 11th of Aug 2006 ¡V The main base information of the guide completed,
some information to be verified. To do : some monsters to be filled in;
quest details for epic and legendary.
0.9: 30th of Aug 2006 ¡V Corrected some mistakes, added comments to skills and
filled in more of the rewards for quests, updated and corrected monster
list. Corrected location of second bag.
1.0: 4th of Sept 2006 -  Completed all quest XP. Added some skill
descriptions,and also added some points to types of damage. Added Max stats
for each character class, and max stats for epic/legendary items. Added tiny
section on Sets in item section. Add top bonus for items section.
1.1: 28th Sept 2006 ¡V Corrected some figures in mastery tables. Added some
1.2 patch changes. Finally removed Hermes' Sandals from Charms.

Contents
-----------

1. General Information
	1.1 Introduction
	1.2 What is Titan Quest
	1.3 Differences compared to Diablo
2. Walkthrough
	2.1 A troubled village
	2.2 Spartans at war
	2.3 The words of the Oracle
	2.4 The source of the monsters
	2.5 The Order of Prometheus
	2.6 The Blindness of the Gods
	2.7 The Invocation
	2.8 A Telkein in Egypt
	2.9 The Sickle of Kronos
	2.10 Hunt for the Sickle
	2.11 Journey to the Jade Palace
	2.12 Under Wusao Mountain
3. Items and equipment
	3.1 Weapons, armor and rings types
	3.2 Relics and charms
	3.3 Shrines
4. Monsters
	4.1 A troubled village
	4.2 Spartans at war
	4.3 The words of the Oracle
	4.4 The source of the monsters
	4.5 The Order of Prometheus
	4.6 The Blindness of the Gods
	4.7 The Invocation
	4.8 A Telkein in Egypt
	4.9 The Sickle of Kronos
	4.10 Hunt for the Sickle
	4.11 Journey to the Jade Palace
	4.12 Under Wusao Mountain

5. Skills and skill trees
	5.1 Character class table
	5.2 Skills
	5.3 Mastery attribute bonuses
	5.4 Defense Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.5 Earth Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.6 Hunting Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.7 Nature Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.8 Rogue Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.9 Spirit Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.10 Storm Mastery Skill Bonuses
	5.11 Warfare Mastery Skill Bonuses
6. Combat and character builds
	6.1 Combat
	6.2 Character builds
	6.3 Difficulty levels
	6.4 What am I doing wrong?
7. Hints and Tips
	7.1 General
	7.2 Exploration
	7.3 combat
	7.4 Inventory
	7.5 Character building
8.0 Interesting little things
	8.1 Cheats?
	8.2 Final things
9.0 Credits


Disclaimer and terms of use
----------------------------
The author of this guide is not affiliated in any way with THQ or Iron Lore.
This FAQ is (c) azrealhk. You are not allowed to alter this FAQ in any way,
nor post on any site without my approval.

Current sites posted:
www.1up.com
www.ign.com
www.gamefaqs.com

UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE AUTHOR BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL,
INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO
THE USE, INABILITY TO USE, LOSS OF TIME, MEDICAL and PSYCHOLOGICAL
DISORDERS, DEATH RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THIS DOCUMENT.

This document is given for free to the community of Titan Quest players and
cannot be used for any commercial or monetary gains. This document is
provided as is, and the author is under no obligation to update or correct
this document.

All statistics in this document is based upon the TQ 1.11 build, Iron Lore
may change the these values to balance the game in later patches, and the
author makes no guarantee to their accuracy.

If you want to post this guide on your site, mail me at azrealhk at bigfoot
dot com. The author is under no obligation to read or reply to any emails.
For those who send thanks and other similar emails to me, I will just say
thanks in advance, but will most likely not return your emails for various
reasons.

==========================================================================
1. General Information
==========================================================================

1.1 Introduction
--------------------

Information from this guide is mainly based on the playing experience of the
author, as well as information given from mod tools and some information
from various gaming forums.

I will use N,E,W,S,NE, etc to mean direction points of the compass where N
is the top of the screen. Since some of the maps are not big open areas, but
winding paths etc. It is difficult to give exact directions. In general the
directions are relative to a certain landmark (which would be described), or
relative to the center of the area (if no relative point described). Since
most maps areas are linear with one entry and one exit, it is hard to get
lost.

The side quest title description has the following format
Side quest : <side quest name> : <source of quest> : <destination of quest>
Source of quest: where the quest is given
Destination of quest: Where the quest is fulfilled

Final note, please do not play a pirated or illegal copy. If you like the
game, buy it (even if it is the only one you buy). Then Ironlore will have
more incentive to make an expansion and maybe even a sequel. ƒº

What is Titan Quest?
------------------------------
The Greeks Gods of Mythology came to power by defeating the Titans, however
something has disrupted the imbalance and monster seem to be going wild.
What is going on?

That about sums up the story. So here is some information of what to expect
from TQ.

For those who are unfamiliar with the Diablo style "action-RPG", here is a
basic description. It is not a RPG, don't expect amazing story unfolding
before you, or interesting dialogs and conversation trees with NPCs, don't
expect an interesting world, full of guilds, people going about their lives,
don't expect inventing potions etc. TQ is action , which means it
concentrates on pure combat, both melee and ranged. There is no amazing
skills with the mouse or the keyboard, just click to kill ( and click to
talk and click to pick up items), and there is plenty to kill; hence the tag
of "click-feast". So what's so good about just clicking and killing, well,
the answer is you get to build the ultimate killing machine.

TQ is about creating a character that can basically kill all beasts as
quickly as possible, with weapons of choice, skills and special items that
add bonuses to your attack or defense. Unlike "normal RPGs", TQ is quick
paced, in less than ten seconds, pick up another weapon, whack a few
enemies, and decide if the weapon is worth keeping. There's lots of weapons
and items and skills such as armor, shields, special bonus enhancing stones
etc, which boost you attack speed, damage, defense, or attributes. This
means there is many many possible ways to tweak your killing machine, and it
is a constant and fast pace. You will always find a weapon that is slightly
better, in damage it does, or speed, or range, but also items which are
slightly just beyond you characters attributes, eg. Not enough strength, or
dexterity or level, which makes you think about your character planning. So
everything to improve your character is right before your eyes, but just
slightly out of reach.

TQ is all about picking up and improving your character so that it kills
monsters faster (Oh there is the story as well). This is not a game for
everyone, but a lot of people will like it, just because you can basically
play it without any learning curve. No special skills, just click to kill.
Do not expect a game where you talk about the amazing story, or fantastic
adventure, but do expect to talk about how you killed 10 enemies in 15s with
your super hunter with an ultra enhanced longbow.
It is a game where you can sit down and play for hours without noticing time
going by, or just play for 30mins and know that after the 30mins you
character will be better (more dangerous to the monsters of TQ) than it was
30mins ago.

1.3 Difference compared to Diablo
------------------------------------------
This section deals with slight variations in game play from Titan Quest and
Diablo (LOD). This is intended for Diablo players, and things which they
will find helpful whilst playing Titan Quest (TQ). Players, who have not
played Diablo, may skip this section, although there is some information
that may be useful.

Character differences:
The first major difference is that there are NO classes. You are male or
female, and you give them a name, that is all to it in character generation.
This means there does not seem to be any character advantages or
disadvantages to each character.

You class is determined by your skills. On level 2 you will choose one
mastery out of eight, which determines your main class, e.g. fighter, magic
user, etc. Then at level 8 you can choose your secondary mastery, which
fixes your class. Your second mastery can be same as you first (one mastery
character) or different (2 mastery character), giving a total of 36
different classes, each with their own skills that they can master. (See
section 3.1).
Although there are no classes, so to say, when you add skill points to
certain mastery tiers (see next section), you get bonuses on your attributes
e.g. a skill point on Warfare tier will give you attribute points added to
strength, dexterity and health.

The skill section is also slightly different. As well as the standard skill
tree, you will also get mastery "tier". The "tier" is like a special skill
allocation that does not allow you to put points into a higher-level skill
until you have "unlocked" a tier.
For example,
The first tier requires 1 skill point, so you need to invest 1 skill point
into the tier to unlock all first level skills of the mastery. Once unlocked
you will be able to allocate your remaining skill points to skills on the
first tier.
The second tier requires 4 skill points, that means in addition to the first
skill point to unlock the first tier, you need to use three more skill
points to unlock the second tier skills. Of course instead of using three
points to unlock the second tier, you can always spend it on all first level
skills.

Inventory and loot:
In TQ the first thing you notice is that there is no stash. You carry
everything, including your gold. You cannot store items in your stash until
you have enough level or attributes to use them; you have to keep it in
inventory. I do not know why there is no stash, but I guess it is because in
TQ you are always moving forwards as opposed to Diablo return to camp. Since
in TQ you are moving from one place to another, it would be strange if your
stash would appear in the village ahead, so I guess that is why it is not in
TQ. As you advance in the main story you will add extra "bags" which allow
you to carry more and by the time you get to the last part of the single
player quest your character has three extra bags for loot.

Items and equipment is pretty similar to Diablo, all color coded, and
different levels of rarity. There is one nice touch and that is the "ALT"
key only shows "normal" or better items, so broken, cracked, damaged items
are not shown when you use the "ALT". However there are two more keys, one
that shows all items (including damaged), and one to only show special items
only (nice touch).

The inventory is pretty similar except no shoes/sandals whatever, and no
belt/sash. All potions take up room in your inventory.
There are special items later on to increase the size of your inventory.

Equipped items can now be compared with each other. In TQ whenever you mouse
over an item, it will display the properties of that item AS WELL AS the
corresponding item you have equipped. This means you can compare the two
items to see which one is better. This is a great little feature.

Other differences:

No corpse: One thing (which may be a blessing), is that when you die, you
get reborn at a rebirth fountain. But you DON'T loose any of your equipment,
so you DO NOT have to recover your corpses (yippee). However you do loose
experience even at normal level.

No arrows: Actually infinite arrows wow. You do not have to keep on "equip"
arrows because there are no arrows. Once you equip a bow, you can fire as
many arrows as you like.

No stamina: There is no stamina, so you do not "walk", and do not worry
about running out of speed.

No durability: Weapons and stuff do not wear out.

Potion delay: After you use a potion, there is a delay before you can drink
another potion. When I first read this in the manual I said WTF. But then
realized it is a nice feature; the delay is short and it prevents the
dreaded "potion panic" of Diablo where you drink too many potions at once ¡V
wasting them.

Skills delay: Some skills, like potions have a delay after each use. Slow
skill delays are quite long, so beware.

Infinite portals: In Diablo, people always stocked up their tome of portals.
TQ has done away with this altogether and decided to give you infinite
portals. You can open a portal anytime and go to any of the "main" portals
found at various points in the game.

Portals don't stay around. When you die your last portal is gone. You cannot
open a portal outside a boss screen, and when you die, use your portal to go
back quickly. That is because when you die so does your portal, also you get
reborn at your last activated rebirth fountain and not near a main portal
anyway.

==========================================================================
2. Walkthrough
==========================================================================


Just one note before we start. I think I have seen different amount of XP
awarded, for the main quests. I am not too sure, but I know I have modified
a few figures , maybe that is why main quest XP is not shown in the quest
window . This may mean the XP may be character level related or something,
so the values shown should act as a guideline rather than a true figure.

2.1 A Troubled Village
----------------------------
Map areas:
	*Greece*
	Road to Helos
	Helos (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Helos farmland
	Helos Woods

When you walk up the path you will find a guy (Timaeus) next to a field. He
will say his horse in being attacked by monsters. If you enter the field two
satyrs and a boar will be attacking a black horse. This quest is easy, as
the enemies will just attack the horse (I do not think the horse can die,
but I have never just watched anyway). Kill the enemies and return to the
character to complete the quest. There is no reward, and Timaeus will say
that in the village ahead more people need help etc.
NOTE: Timaeus is name of a text by Greek philosopher Plato, which describes
the formation of the Universe. Appropriate for the start of the game?
Note: In Greek mythology Satyrs are the companions of Dionysus, the god of
wine, and they spent their time drinking, dancing, and chasing nymphs. (so
where are the nymphs???)

Proceed up the path, and you will see some soldiers fighting some satyrs (or
already killed the satyrs, if you were slow in rescuing the horse). If they
are still fighting, you can join in the fight).

Enter the village (Helos), and activate the rebirth fountain. You can go
around taking to people in the village. One will be the village leader
(Diomedes) who will tell you of your next quest, the "satyr shaman". East of
Diomedes in the village is a merchant, take note as you can sell some of
your loot later on and also buy new equipment here. SE of the village is a
portal, which you need to activate, but cannot go anywhere yet (first
portal), and also the way out of the village (which you cannot pass until
you kill the Satyr shaman).

OK so to kill the shaman, proceed N of the village over a bridge and into a
field (Helos farmland). Kill all the beasts and the satyrs you find. There
are also some chests lying around so open them for some goodies; you should
equip the best items and go back and sell the rest for some gold (and maybe
buy some better equipment, if you have enough gold). Continue to proceed
north to the camp. You will also probably gain a level during this trip so,
level up before you proceed into the camp.

The Satyr Shaman (Dark Satyr) cannot be missed; it's a big Satyr that can
throw fireballs. This should be easy, just run around killing the minions as
they get in the way, and then kill the Shaman for the equipment. There is a
also a chest, so open it after you've killed the shaman. Grab the goodies
and return to village and talk to Diomedes for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 1000 Gold and 150 XP (experience points).
	Epic: 50000 gold and 30000XP.
	Legendary: 650000 gold and 30000XP.

Now trade your stuff for more gold, buy some more equipment before moving to
the next quest, looking for General Leonidas.
Note: Leonidas was a Spartan King who led armies against the Persians lead
by Xeres.

2.2 Spartans at war
------------------------
Map areas:
	Helos (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Laconia (rebirth fountain)
	Laconia woods
	Laconia hills (rebirth fountain)
	Spartan Road
	Spartan war camp (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Pellana Valley
	Spartan Highlands (rebirth fountain)

When you're ready, go SE of the village of Helos where the portal is
located. Now that you killed the Shaman the guards will let you pass through
and exit to the wilderness. I will not describe which path to go since it is
quite linear. The map basically only has one route, with a few side routes
leading to "dead ends"e.g. cave/ruins etc. This means you basically cannot
go wrong; also main routes are marked by braziers/torches on side of roads.
This is typical of the whole map in TQ. You basically battle your way
through until you reach the Spartan camp. This is basically a level up and
equipment gathering part, and allows you to up you character and establish
your mastery.

There are four side quests.

Side quest: Monstrous brigand: Helos : Laconia
The first side quest is presented to you when you first exit the village. A
guy (Nicostratus) will run up to saying his friend has been captured and put
into a cave by Satyrs. The cave is near the village and easy to find, just
follow the red marker. Enter the cave kill everyone and you find the guy
(Tellis) in the NE corner. Talk to him for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Magic jewelry and 300 XP
	Epic: Magic jewelry and 25000XP
	Legendary: Magic jewelry and 55000XP

Side quest: Cornered man: Laconia Woods: Laconia Woods
During your journey you will find the satyr camp, and further on you will
come across a small farm, lots of Satyrs inside. The farm is on the right
side of the road, and not hard to miss especially since you will see the
Satyrs and instinctively rush in to kill them (even before you see the guy).
Again just kill the Satyrs, talk to the guy you just rescued (Lycus) for
your reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 1500 Gold, 300 XP
	Epic: 60000 gold and 27500XP
	Legendary: 60000 gold and 60000XP

Side quest: Medicines Wayland: Laconia Hills : Laconia Hills
On your way, you will find a guy (Euphadimus) next to a cart. He explains he
is taking medicines to a sick village but creatures and a big monster blocks
the road. The road is ahead of you and there is no other path. The big
monster (Satyr ¡V brute) , is simple, but again ready your potions. Just kill
the big guy, clean up the remaining Satyrs, and go back and talk to the
Euphadimus for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Replenish Life and Energy, some potions, 350 XP
	Epic: Replenish Life and Energy, some potions, 27500XP
	Legendary: Replenish Life and Energy, some potions,60000XP

Side quest: The lost dowry: Laconia hills : Laconia hills
Along your way to the Spartan camp, you will find a lonely guy (Theages) in
the middle of nowhere, talk to him and he will say his village was raided
and the creatures stole his daughter's dowry. OK, go E and fight some
creatures, before you reach a cave. Enter the cave, battle your way through
and kill the creature (Pandarus ¡V Thieving Eurynomus) that has a aura
surrounding it for the dowry. Don't forget the loot all around the place.
Return the item to the guy for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Relic, 400 XP
	Epic: Relic, 30000 XP
	Legendary: Relic, 65000XP

Finally we reach the Spartan camp. Leonidas is to the N but his tent is
guarded, talk to guy (captain Brasidas) just to the E of the entrance to the
guarded tent and he will explain that you are unworthy to see great General
Leonidas, and he is too busy. However, there is one thing you can do to
prove your worthiness, kill the great Centaur Nessus, as they the Spartan
warriors (with a camp full of warriors) cannot spare anyone. So there's your
quest. But before you go, there is a rebirth fountain and a portal to the SE
of the captain, and then further SE a merchant and an archanist (for magical
items), so stock up and buy/sell before you go, but some health potions just
in case.

Note: Nessus, the Centaur of Greek mythology. He kidnapped and tried to rape
Heracles's wife. Heracles killed him, but on his dying breath he trick the
wife to spread his blood mixed with his semen on Heracles (which was
poison). It was this tainted blood poison that killed the great hero
Heracles. Don't you just love Greek mythology?

As you exit the camp (NE from the center of the camp), just past the rebirth
fountain (there is another exit E, but we will not get the side quest), a
soldier (Euthycles) will tell you that he heard a great warrior and mentor
was lost in the valley (lol), this is the "Ancient of War" side quest.

Anyway the Centaur camp is to the NNE of the Spartan camp. You will know you
have found it because you enter a fenced camp with a large Centaur (with
aura) surrounded by his centaur minions. If you kill the minions Nessus will
just call more on his horn. The best technique I have found was to kill the
minions, then lure Nessus away, so when he calls his minions, they will
appear in the camp and not see you. Note: Nessus will throw some "windmill"
traps, which are annoying, destroy them if you have time. Back to Nessus,
once you have lured him away, you can kill him which every way you like;
Nessus will run back to camp if you run too far, so you need to keep running
towards him to attract him and to keep him from running back to camp. Nessus
is quite tough, and I found ranged weapons work best because he does some
mean damage with melee, but this takes time. My melee character did better,
I just bashed until my health was low, then changed to a bow to finish him
off, which was quick and I did not need to use any potions (read the tips
section 7 for hit and run tactic). Kill Nessus, grab the goodies, especially
the armor (which will benefit your melee character at least until you get
the archnos chitin armor) and return to Captain Brasidas.

On return and talking to Brasidas to get reward and see Leonidas.
Reward:
	Normal: 1 extra skill point and 750 XP.
	Epic: 1 extra skill point and 32000 XP.
	Legendary: 1 extra skill point and 70000 XP.

Leonidas gives a long boring speech that leads to next part of the quest.
Seek the Oracle in Delphi.

2.3 The Words of the Oracle
-----------------------------------
Map areas:
	Spartan war camp (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Pellana Valley
	Spartan Highlands (rebirth fountain)
	Mycenean Ruins (rebirth fountain)
	Spartan woods
	Village of Tegae (rebirth fountain)
	Tegea Forest
	Arcadia
	Tegea Graveyard
	Megara Bluff (rebirth fountain)
	Megara Coast
	City of Megara (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Megara Outskirts
	Kerata Forest
	The Old Eulesis
	Halcyon Coast (rebirth fountain)
	Boetia
	Ambrossos Farmland
	Chirons Grove
	Village of Ambrossos (rebirth fountain)
	Helicos Valley
	Helicos Pass (rebirth fountain)
	The Olive Groove
	Phocian Swamp
	Lower Delphi
	Crisaeos Falls (rebirth fountain)
	Delphi Highlands
	City of Delphi (portal)

Off we go again, (if you have not done the "ancient of war" side quest, you
might as well do it, and return to sell your loot and buy/sell your stuff
before moving on.

Side quest: Ancient of war: Spartan war camp: Pellana Valley
This is not much of a quest, as it just involves wandering around Pellana
Valley until you find a guy surrounded by dead monsters, talk to the guy
(Hippias) who is the mentor, who says that he just slained the creatures and
taking a rest. Return to Euthycles at the Spartan War Camp for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 2000 gold and 500 XP
	Epic: 70000 gold, 25000XP
	Legendary: 65000 gold, 60000XP

Note: Hippias was a cruel ruler, enemy of the Spartans, and was exiled.
Later to be killed in the battle of marathon. Not so great a warrior after
all.

Again the next part is pretty linear. You will find ruins and caves that
have lots of loot, and encounter zombies and skeletons, Lich etc. It is wise
to stock up on your potions. Lich are a pain in the backside at this stage
and it is wise to lure the skeleton warriors away from the lich, and kill
them off first as they are easy, and then get back to the lich and kill it
off.

The map is a bit less linear than the first part but there is only one main
path. The rest will lead to dead ends, ruins or a cave, so you cannot go
wrong. It is worth exploring every part of the map to get the loot, and
experience. You will encounter the Mycenean Ruins to the NE of the camp,
which is good for loot, but this is where you will first meet the skeletons.

After the ruins you will find a village (Tagea).

Side quest: The poisoned spring: Village of Tagea : Tagea Forest
On entering the village Tagea a guy (Olorus) will tell you of a strange
plague and all villagers getting ill. This is your quest.  Journey out the W
of the village to where the guards are, to start the quest (Tagea Forest).
Note: You can lure creatures back to these guards and let them kill it, but
you will not get experience. This is good, if you are overwhelmed etc.
This is where you first meet the spiders (arachnos), lots of different ones,
and the nice arachnos chitin armor. The destination is to the NNW, where you
will find Pagaea the water nymph; she says the source of the poison is in
the cave to the N (Fetid Lair). Enter the cave, explore and kill the boss
with the aura. Note: For non-melee characters you will meet spinners, which
can throw a net trap that stops you from running. You will not be able to
run away and will be surrounded by spiders, so beware.
Kill all spiders and go out and talk to water nymph for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Extra health points and 1500 XP.
	Epic: Extra health points , 30000 XP
	Legendary: Extra health points , 70000 XP

Back to the village and everyone is getting better. Leave the village from
one of the other exits, it does not matter, as it will merge into one big
area with one "exit" any way (Megara Bluff). Proceed with your quest
battling through camps and ruins etc.

Back to the main quest; as you continue onwards, you will reach the coast
(Megara coast). Keep on battling until you reach the City of Megara. In the
city you will find merchants and arcanist. You should talk to the people,
one of which is Timon, who will tell you that you need to give an "A proper
offering" to the Oracle (side quest) or she will not grant you an audience;
this will trigger the addition of your first extra bag in your inventory. In
addition you will find a stranded sailor (Anton) who will give you one side
quest, about a shipwreck, and lost treasure ("News of a ship wreck). Also,
you will find a guy near the entrance to the city (Nireus) will talk about
being invaded by skeletons, you will see two guys at a doorway of the house,
just above where Timon stands. Talk to Autolycus first (as he has the ! on
his head) and then to the second guy (Meikiades) and they will say the
source of the undead are in a ruin at "The Old Eleusis". Proceed up the path
from the two guys to find the portal and the rebirth fountain. This is the
"Skeletal raiders" side quest.

Side quest: Skeleton Raiders: City of Megara : The Old Eleusis
On your way out of the city, you'll pass a small village and a forest, and
to the N/NE is "The Old Eleusis". Enter the ruin and down the stairs, to
battle the three princes who have been terrorizing the city. The three
princes are pretty simple; they are just big red skeletons. You will also
find a blade trap, which shoots blades in "all" directions; they fire at
fixed angles, so if you move slightly off one of the angles, you can pick it
off using a ranged weapon without getting hurt. One prince uses a bow (Menon
¡V prince of bow), and is very ineffective at close range, one uses melee
(Polypas ¡V prince of blade) and the last uses magic (Aristeus ¡V prince of
storm). I found the magic user most problematic, I think because it had the
most health (if that could be said about the undead). They are in separate
sections of the ruins, so you do not battle all three at once. After you
killed them all, loot the ruins for some nice loot. Return to city and talk
to guys (Autolycus or Nireus) for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 2500 XP
	Epic: 35000XP
	Legendary: 75000XP

Now let's go back to the main quest. After the ruins, to the N is a bridge
(Halcyon Coast). Assuming that you have just killed the three princes and
went back at the city, it is wise to sell your loot, and stock up on
potions, because the next part is hard. You should leave some room in your
inventory, as there will be some good loot. As you cross the bridge after
the ruins, you'll see some soldiers running forwards (N), follow them and
you meet Polyphemus (the original Cyclops). He is one bad mother, and kills
the soldiers with ease. Polyphemus is hard, both for melee and ranged
attackers, but the run and shoot tactic should work. The Cyclops will not
cross the bridge further than the two braziers, so ranged weapons is best.
Shoot it, and run past the braziers, and the Cyclops will turn it back and
walk back towards is original position. Now cross over the bridge attack it
again whilst his back is turned (he will turn around and move towards you),
and when he is approaching, run back pass the braziers and he will not
attack (walk back). This method is slow, but saves potions and works quite
well in quite a few places. When you kill him, go NNE from the bridge to his
cave for loot.
Note: The famous Polyphemus, son of Poseidon the sea god, the original
Cyclops. Tricked by Odysseus in Homer's Ilyad, to poke out his only eye. In
his rage he threw a great rock from the coast of Megara at Odysseus's ship.
(Explains the shipwrecked sailor as well??).

To the N (next to the Polyphemus's cave), is a path that leads down to the
beach (Megara coast). Note the two braziers on the side of the path. At the
bottom, do a U-Turn to find the shipwreck loot.

Side Quest: News of a shipwreck: City of Megara : Halcyon Coast
On the beach (after you U-Turn), you will find the loot, but a load of
"drowned sailors" will spawn and attack you. Kill them and collect the loot,
and experience
Reward:
	Normal: 2000 XP
	Epic: 18000XP
	Legendary: 40000XP

Proceed back where you can from and up (N-NW) the coast. Keep following the
coast, and there are two exits, both lead to same place (Boetia).

Keep going until you reach the Ambrossos Farmland. At the end to the N is a
small bridge leading to the village of Ambrossos. If you do not cross the
bridge but go due E you will find a centaur NPC (Chiron) next to the field
and in the shade of the trees for a side quest.

Side quest: The Good Centaur: Ambrossos : Chirons Grove
Talk to Chiron for the quest (need to do it twice). Well a mean Maenad has
stolen his bow, boohoo. Cross the bridge and into the cave to retrieve it.
Your will battle some Maenads but your target is the one that keeps on
running further into the cave. Keep following until the dead end and kill
her off. She is quite easy, collect the bow and the loot and return to
Chiron for the reward. Note: The bow is a quest item, and although you can
redo the quest (after a reload), you cannot give it to Chiron a second time.
You cannot use it or sell it.
Reward:
	Normal: 2 extra attribute points, 3000 XP
	Epic: 2 extra attribute points, 35000 XP
	Legendary: 2 extra attribute points, 80000 XP

From Chiron, go west and you will see a bridge, go across into the village.

Across the bridge until you reach the Village of Ambrossos. You will find a
rebirth fountain, and merchant here. Also there is a guy (Admetus) who tells
you of a blacksmith for the "A master blacksmith" side quest, but we do not
have to worry about this for a while. Near the exit you there is a guy
(Asimidas) who says he lost all his goods when attacked by skeletons, as far
as he is concerned anyone who finds it can have it (Abandoned goods side
quest).

Leave the village and keep going until you reach a bridge at Helicos Pass.
Across the bridge is a rebirth fountain (this area has two rebirth
fountains, one here and one at the "end" of the area).

Talk to the old guy ( Eurytimus) to update a side quest -A Proper Offering.
He says the Olive groove just ahead (to the N), but over run by monsters.

Side Quest: A proper offering: City of Megara : The olive groove
Proceed into the olive groove. The spiders should not give you too much
problems, and keep clearing the area until you reach the stone steps. By
this time you would have noticed Arachne ¡V Spider Queen. Mean green spider,
which has a mean melee and cast spells as well, has a lot of HP and
relatively fast. She is tough (almost as bad as Polyphemus), but again the
hit and run tactic works, as she only follows you to the main Olive trees
(back up the path), before turning back. However, the little spider minions
she summons can go pass the invisible boundary, but they are not much of a
problem. Kill Arachne and proceed up the stone steps into the ruins. Click
the "pedestal" to get the "olive branch" for the quest. All open the other
chests for loot.
Reward:
	Normal: +5% Bonus resist, when offered the branch at Delphi.
	Epic: +7% Bonus resist, when offered the branch at Delphi.
	Legendary: +5% elemental resist, when offered the branch at Delphi.

Note: Arachne was a mortal who claimed to be better at weaving than the
Goddess of weaving (Athena). To cut a long story short, the Goddess turned
Arachne into a spider.

Exit the olive groove and proceed W until it turns south, at the bottom, you
have a choice of E or W. Go W for "Goods Abandoned" side quest, otherwise
proceed E

Side Quest: Abandoned Goods: Village of Ambrossos: Helicos Pass
If you go W you will find ruins with some skeletons and maybe some zombies.
Not as bad as the merchant described and should be a pretty easy clean up.
Kill the monsters for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 1000 XP
	Epic: 18000XP
	Legendary: 40000XP

Proceed E until you reach the second rebirth fountain in Helicos Pass, at
the edge of the Phocian Swamp. There is a cave to the N of the rebirth
fountain but you do not need to go there if you do not wish. Go E across the
swamp to Lower Delphi. At lower Delphi you will see a bridge. At this point
you can do the blacksmith side quest or cross the bridge to continue the
main quest.

Side quest: A master blacksmith: Ambrossos Village: Lower Delphi
Not much of a quest at all. If you do not cross the bridge at Lower Delphi
but instead you will find the blacksmith who is just a short distance
further up the path to complete the quest. Note: The blacksmith offers item
which are a few levels beyond normal merchants, and you will find some high
level, but expensive items. However this is only when you complete the
quest. After you complete the quest and leave the area (or reaching the next
rebirth fountain or after a certain time; I am not too sure which), the
blacksmith becomes a "normal" merchant.
Reward:
	Normal: 1500 XP
	Epic: 20000XP
	Legendary: 55000XP

Cross the bridge and there is a cave to the SW, again you do not need to go
there. Continue along the path (NW), keep going pass Delphi highlands until
you reach the City of Delphi. On the way you will met a lot of Maenads (you
probably met some before, but not as many as here).
Note: Maenads are also minions of Dionysus, the god of wine, just like
Satyrs. They are also known for their wild crazy behaviors. They were the
subject of Euripides's play "The Bacchae"; Bacchae being roman for the
Maenads. They also wear leopard skins, and if you zoom in TQ also skinned
them with leopard skins.

At the city of Delphi, visit the Oracle. If you have the "branch of the
Olive tree" talk to the temple attendant (Astyoche) for reward, but this is
not necessary.

The oracle will give a long speech, but basically saying you need to
continue your journey (Parnassus Caves) etc. Complete.
*****Note: Delphi, city of Apollo (Apollo Delphius), was famous for the
Oracle of Apollo.

Reward:
	Normal: 2000XP
	Epic: 40000XP
	Legendary: 90000XP

In Delphi you will find merchants and archanist, also you will see your
first mystic (Pausanias) who can redistribute your skill points (for a
price). There is a portal, but no rebirth fountain in Delphi. If you wander
around you will meet Iodame for the "Grieving widow" side quest.

Congratulations you are now a quarter of the way through the game.

2.4 The source of the monsters
--------------------------------------
Map areas:
	City of Delphi (portal)
	Parnassus Foothills
	Parnassus Caves (rebirth fountain)
	Parnassus Hinterlands (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Cephesus Woods
	Lower War-Camp (rebirth fountain)
	Upper War-Camp (rebirth fountain)
	Pythian Caves (rebirth fountain)
	Athenian Passage (rebirth fountain)
	Kephisos Valley
	Athenian Swamps
	Monster Encampment (rebirth fountain)
	Athenian Mortuary
	Athenian Battleground
	City of Athens (rebirth fountain, portal)

Leave the City of Delphi, kill the monsters and follow the marker until you
reach the Parnassus Caves, enter and there should be rebirth fountain near
the entrance.

Side quest: The Grieving widow: City of Delphi: Parnassus Cave
If go NNE from the rebirth fountain you will find a small narrow passage
leading to a cave with a boss (Cephasus, Master of the Flame) . Just kill
the monster and collect the loot and go back to Iodame for the reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 3000 XP
	Epic: 35000XP
	Legendary: 85000XP

In the Parnassus cave, keep moving eastwards and eventually you will find an
exit to the Parnassus Hinterlands and another rebirth fountain. Near the end
of this area is the "Parnassus" portal, with a Satyr merchant, for all the
loot you will find in the next section. From here just keep going, through
the Lower war camp (which updates your quest) and upper war camp. There in
nothing special in these areas, except a cave due E in Parnassus
Hinterlands, and a cave due NE in the lower war camp.
There are quite a lot of monsters in these areas so stock up with potions
and remember to activate the rebirth fountains.

After battling through the Lower war camp, you will reach some stone steps
and the entrance to the upper war camp. You will see a guy crawl out of the
bushes (Hylas), you can talk to him for a main quest update. There is a
rebirth fountain so activate it. The steps lead to an area mostly populated
by skeletons. Not hard but there are a lot of them. The exit is actually NW
but turns back round to the SE. You basically go up and then back down the
other side where the camp is. The camp is a large ground area, again full of
monsters. Whilst battling in the lower grounds, you will see some statues of
people (and a big giant) , this is a warning of things to come. You should
clear the upper war camp, then portal, unload your loot and stock up on
potions, before continuing.

Once you have cleared the upper war camp, follow the stone path with the
statues and you will get to the Pythian caves. There is a big set of heavy
wooden doors, are you ready? If so open the doors and walk through, once
you're passed the doors will shut and then become locked (no way out).
Inside are the three Gorgon sisters, Medusa with bow and magic skills (can
freeze with her eyes), Euryale with a bow, and Sstheno with a spear. If you
attack them all at once you are most likely to get killed. Even my 15 level
slayer had problems hand to hand (even with just one). The best method is
used ranged attacks (hit and run works). Lure each one, one at a time and
used the ranged attack with the hit and run tactic, the cave has just enough
room for you to do this, but be careful not to run around too much or you
will attract the others. Killing all three should be easy, but slow.
Note: Gorgons were creatures in Greek mythology that can turn a person to
stone if they stared the gorgon in the face. The three gorgons Stheno (the
mighty), Euryale (the far-springer) and Medusa (the queen), only Medusa is
mortal, and was killed by Perseus. There is also one male gorgon mentioned
in mythology, who is the guard of Zeus.

After you've killed the Gorgons, a NPC will appear (I am not sure but she
was a stone staue before?), anyway talk to her (Fei Yan ¡V you will met her a
few times more later) twice to update your main quest.
Reward: (Talk to Fei yan)
	Normal: 3000XP
	Epic: 40000XP
	Legendary: 90000XP

There is a set of heavy doors to the W of the NPC, proceed to continue.
Through the doors, are filled with normal Gorgons which are pretty easy to
kill, although the magic users can be a real pain. Go through, grab the loot
and move E to find the exit to the caves (Athenian Passage).

Once outside activate the rebirth fountain (you do not want to go through
the upper war camp and Gorgons again). There ia also a merchant; how
appropriate after all the loot. Keep going and you will find a bridge into
Kephisos Valley. Again a monster bash, the exit is to the N, but NNW there
are some spartan warriors for some side quests. The first soldier(Pausanias)
talks about the trapped limos and gives the "Trapped in the Ruins" quest,
and the other (Isarchus) talks about a lost patrol and gives the "Spartans
Lost" which you do a bit later.

Side quest: Trapped in the Ruins: Kephisos Valley: Kephisos Valley
After talking to the soldier, proceed to the stone structure (W ¡V where a
bunch of soldiers are standing in line) and you will see an ancient Limos.
If you have met the "normal" version of Limoses already, then you know they
are a real pain, especially the life leech, this one also throws poison and
has a very high health. The hit and run tactic works very well, in fact
melee characters will have a big problem because it can do big damage as
well. However the Limos is fast, so you will only get one or two shots
before you have to run. The Limos will not pass the row of guard soldiers.
After you kill it talk to Pausanias for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: magical weapon, 3000 XP
	Epic: magical weapon, 35000 XP
	Legendary: magical weapon, 85000 XP

On with the quest, by going E from the soldiers, to a pass and a rebirth
fountain (Monster encampment). If you keep going eastwards you will reach
the Athenian swamps. There is nothing here and just one big dead end.
However this is where you find the lost soldiers. On legendary difficulty
here is where you find the Hydra. The hydra is fast and has lots of attacks
making it a very difficult opponent. Slow attacks is the best method to stay
alive and kill it. Magic users have the advantage, as they can do more
damage at a distance. This is the monster with the multiple heads on the
front of the game box, if you did not know. I found it harder than the end
of level bosses, but a lot of fun.

Side Quest: Lost Spartans: Kephisos Valley: Athenian Swamps
Go NE to find the spartans, at the NE edge, talk to soldier, then go back to
Isarchus in Kephicos Valley, to tell him they are OK for a reward. Note:
Easy for Normal, on epic and legendary, you will met the Hydra here.
Reward:
	Normal: 4000 XP
	Epic: 37500XP
	Legendary: 85000XP

The monster encampment is big area full of monsters, lots of them and quite
a variety. The exit is to the NE of the big area leading to the Athenian
battleground. However you will most likely stumble into the Athenian
mortuary to the NNW, which is another big dead end for loot. I think there
is a ruin to the N in the Athenian Mortuary.

Once you reach the Athenian battleground, you are almost at the Athens, but
this area is big and has lots of monsters, and the map design means you have
to zigzag. Just battle your way through until you reach Athens. You will
find Brasidas and General Leonidas here, talk to them for a speech about the
Spartans foolishness (how they go here so fast I have no idea, and they
should have killed the Gorgons for me). Reward: (talk to Leonidas)
	Normal: 2500XP
	Epic: 25000XP
	Legendary: 50000XP
At the entrance of Athens is the rebirth fountain, which is easy to miss.

In Athens you will find a portal and merchants, arcanists and a mystic. Also
Athens seems to be in a bad state and there are pockets of monsters all
around the place but nothing you cannot handle. Find Kypos and talk to him,
for the next part of your journey.

2.5 The Order of Prometheus
------------------------------------
Map areas:
	City of Athens (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Acropolis (rebirth fountain)
	The Parthenon
	Athens Catacombs level 1 ¡V 5 (rebirth fountain)
	Athens Docks (rebirth fountain)
	Knossos Beach
	Village of Herakleion (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Herakleion Highlands
	Omphalion (rebirth fountain)
	Tritons Ridge
	Kairatos Bluff (rebirth fountain)
	Knossos Palace
	Court of the Kings
	Minaon Labyrinth
	Room of the Conduit
	Knossos Landing

As you wander around Athens and cleaning out the pockets of monsters in the
city you will encounter a big stone stairway with Spartan guards, follow the
stairway all the way up to Acropolis. Just kill the monsters and follow the
marker on the map to reach the Parthenon. Go NE down the stairs into the
Athens catacombs.
Note: Parthenon is one of the greatest buildings of ancient Greece, and if
you go there for a holiday, you should definitely visit it. It is a temple
dedicated to the Goddess Athena (Athena Parthenos), it was believed to house
a massive 30ft gold status of Athena in the center . Do you see the statue
in the game.

The Athens catacombs have five levels, and you descend each level by stairs.
There is nothing major to note, except to look for the rebirth fountains.
The map of each level is small so there should be no major problems. On the
last level you will met the boss (Alastor ¡V Scourge of Archeron). This guy
quite tough, high health and magic user and also summons skeletons. I found
melee pretty difficult, best way was to used ranged attacks and switch to
melee for the skeletons. Having said that A;astor seems to have good
elemental resistances so physical damage seems to be more effective at
reducing health. This was slower but used less potions (also he seems to be
susceptible to elemental attacks).
After you kill the boss, a guy appears at the doorway to the E. He is
Phaedrus, the Philosopher of the Order of Prometheus. Talk to him for the
main quest update and continue through the doorway he came from to continue
the quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 5000XP and magical item
	Epic: 40000XP and magical item
	Legendary: 100000XP and magical item


Out into Athens Docks, proceed until you reach the Docks (W). Once there you
can talk to a ship captain to sail to Knossos, Fei Yan is here as well and
you can talk to her if you want, to reveal that she is of the Order of
Prometheus. You will land on Knossos Beach, and if you proceed N you will
find the Village of Herakleion; rebirth fountain, portal, merchants. Talk to
Hippocoon for the "Xanthippus the healer" side quest and the other guy
(Diotimus) for the second side quest "The undead tyrant"

If you go west it leads to a dead end (docks), but you will see a big statue
of a Minotaur, you will see these soon. Go through the second exit to the
village (E) into the Herakleion Highlands, then to Omphalion and keep going
until you reach a stone bridge into Tritons ridge. From the bridge there are
you can go W to a dead end, E for a side quest and N to the next area.

Side Quest : Xanthippus The Healer : Village of Herakleion : Triton's Ridge
You will find Xanthippus outside a cave; talk to him and he will say he
cannot help the villages until he has his staff that is in the cave next to
him. Enter, and batlle your way through and retrieve the staff. Go out and
talk to Xanthippus again for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 5x health and energy potions, health energy restored, 5000XP.
	Epic: 5x health and energy potions, health energy restored, 40000XP.
	Legendary: 5x health and energy potions, health energy restored, 90000XP.

From the stone bridge head N (narrow passage leading up on the N wall), and
keep going. You should see a marker on the map that leads to a cave; this is
the general direction you should go. The cave is for the "The Undead Tyrant"
side quest. Outside the cave and due W is the exit to the area.

Side Quest: The undead tyrant: Village of Herakleion: Triton's Ridge
In the cave, kill the monsters until you find the boss (Leucus I, Tyrant of
Crete). Kill the boss, to complete the side quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 6000 XP
	Epic: 40000XP
	Legendary: 95000XP

West of the cave is the exit to the next area ( Kairotos Bluff). There is a
rebirth fountain and a merchant here. Keep going until you reach Knossos
palace. Enter through the short court of the kings and into the Minoan
Labyrinths. In Epic/Legendary you will find Talos, here just before the
"Court of Kings". He is so bad, and first time I met him, he killed me
before I knew he was there. The key is to learn the animations of his
attacks, and know when to move away. Of course slowing his attacks is the
best as you can avoid most of his most dangerous attacks. Stun resists is a
must otherwise rebirth time. Magic users will have a slightly easier time
because he is slow, and as you stay roughly away, you can dodge most of his
attacks. Also there is a narrow passage between two buildings just to the W
of the eastern set of steps. Talos cannot attack you there and cannot enter
so you can slowly fire off you ranged attack. Also Like all automatoi, Talos
seems to be susceptible to Lighting attacks.
Note: In Greek mythology, Talos (alt. Talus) was a bronze automaton whom
Zeus gave to Europa. In one telling he was forged by Hephaestus and the
Cyclopes. According to Apollodorus and Argonautica he may have been a member
of the Bronze Generation who had survived to the age of the demigods. Europa
took him to Crete and he stayed there, circling the island's shore three
times daily while guarding it. He threw stones at any approaching ship.
Talos is said to have heated himself red-hot and clasped strangers in his
embrace as soon as they landed on the island.

The Labyrinths are not much of a labyrinth, and like much of TQs maps there
is basically one path to go, so if you explorer all the areas, you are bound
find the right way. There are many rebirth fountains (just in case you get
lost), and also braziers to mark the right way. You will not get lost, but a
thing to note is that there are all types of creatures here, so you are
bound to met some monsters which you have difficulty with, regardless if you
are a melee or ranged character. Point of note is that there are lots of
groups of monsters, including 6-7 Minotaurs in groups and it is wise to
proceed slowly. You know you have found the exit when you find the big metal
double doors with the symbol of the Minotaur on the front. Portal back to
village drop/sell etc, and buy lots of potions, because the next part is
hard.

Let use turn our attention back to the double doors. Once enter there is no
way out (unless you die). Enter to meet the Mintoaur Lord. He is slow and so
is his attack, so it is not as hard. However his attacks do a lot of damage
and he has high defense and health as well and takes a long time to kill.
However what is harder (and more annoying) is that there are four blade
traps in the room. These do more damage than the Minotaur. I found this much
easier if you destroy the traps first, as these are a pain, the Minotaur is
slow so keep running and note the spots where the traps do not touch you.
Once the traps have been destroyed, keep your distance and kill the Minotaur
(easy), which may take some time. Do not melee because of his high defense
and damage.
Note: Minotaur. There was one Minotaur in Greek Mythology, and to cut a
story short, King Minos, angered the God Poseidon, because he did not
sacrifice a White bull to the God. The God cursed Minos's wife to fall in
Love with the bull, and she gave birth to the Minotaur a half man, half bull
creature. To hide his guilt (this creature), Minos built the labyrinth and
put the Minotaur in it. Theseus killed the Minotaur sometime later in
another story above love.

That was not the hard part. Portal back, and sell loot, and stock up on
potions again, as the next part is the hard part. Portal back and enter the
other side to the Room of the Conduit, and proceed to the end where you will
see the Big Boss (Megalesios - Telkine). He first casts a spell that will
animate the statues. The statues are slow, but do lots of damage, I found
physical attacks best as they seem to be immune to elemental attacks. These
four are easy, so don't go heroic and waste your potions; save it for the
Telkine. After you killed the statues, just in time for the Telkine to
destroy the conduit to the Gods, (talk about timing). Now the Gods cannot
hear the prayers of the people; anyway you still have to defeat the Telkine.

The Telkine is hard, very high health and high armor, and powerful magical
attacks, lightning being one, and also summons limos that will sap your life
away. There is no good way of fighting and magical and physical attacks both
do only a small amount of damage. I have yet to find a good way of killing
it except just a long and slow process of attacking it and healing myself in
the process. Melee, range and magical all do damage but very little.

Kill the Telkine and talk you a guy (Kyros) who was "hiding" to update your
quest.
Reward:
	Normal: Health restored, relic,7500XP
	Epic: Health restored, relic,45000XP
	Legendary: Health restored, relic, 110000XP

Leave in the newly revealed passage out into Knossos Landing and talk to
Apollodorus to sail to Egypt.

Note: I do not know much about the Telkines, but from my searches, they may
me the Telchines or Telkhines (which I did not know about from my Greek
Mythology studies). From shat I gathered they were spirits or demons which
also hated the Olympian Gods. You can try the search yourself.

Congratulations you are half way through Titan Quest.

2.6 The Blindness of the Gods
--------------------------------------
Map areas:
	*Egypt*
	City of Rhakotis (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Rhakotis slums (rebirth fountain)
	Rhakotis Library
	Library Archives (rebirth fountain)
	Library Vault
	Hathor Basin (rebirth fountain)
	Wadjet Canyon
	Nile Floodplain (rebirth fountain)
	Village of Sais (rebirth fountain)
	Temple of Sais (portal)
	The Lower Nile (rebirth fountain)
	Memphis Outskirts
	Memphis Plaza (rebirth fountain, portal)

City of Rhakotis, as you leave the ship talk to Imhotep to update your main
quest (retrieve the scroll of Invocation). Talking to Imhotep after killing
the Telkine seems to trigger your second extra bag in your inventory.
Activate the portal and rebirth shrine and do your normal housekeeping of
inventory before heading N (Rhalotis slums) to start the next part of your
quest. Just before the exit is Anherru who gives you the "The family
heirloom" side quest. By the way, this is Egypt and you will mean a whole
set of new monsters.

Side quest : The family heirloom : City of Rhakotis : Rhakotis slums
The slums are an area outside the city, which doubles back to the city (on
the other side). In the slums you will find a Jackelman boss; kill him to
retrieve the sword.
Reward:
	Normal: Relic shard + 6000XP
	Epic: Relic shard + 40000XP
	Legendary: Relic shard + 95000XP

The slums start off NE and then turns around back to SW direction, back to
the other side of the city. You will know because the name changes back to
"City of Rhakotis" and you will see stone steps leading to a rebirth
fountain, and a large stone building (Library). Just before the stone steps
there is an alleyway (N) leading to a cave that you can visit for loot if
you want. Go round the outside of the library to find the entrance and enter
Rhakotis Library. Kill the few monsters around and you find Neb-ka-n-ra, who
will update the main quest if you talk to him (basically the library is full
monsters). Go down the steps into the Library archives. Activate the rebirth
fountain, and enter. This part is full of rooms and IMHO more of a maze than
the labyrinth. Find the stairs leading down to the Library vault and find
the large double doors. Again advised to portal back and do some
housekeeping and buy potions before enter the next area.

Behind the doors is Scarabaeus , a scarab boss. He is like the guy that held
that priest hostage. In other words long battle. The scarab does not move
around much but does have a ranged poison attack and throws out little
scarabs. The little scarabs are irritating and should be clear out. I found
melee against it much more easier, as it's poison and baby scarab spawning
is much less when you attack it directly. However expect to use a lot of
potions. Once you killed, there is a door to the N of the room, enter to
open a chest for the scroll of invocation. A passage will open up to lead to
Hathor basin, the next area.

Hathor basin, is a large open area, however the exit is in the general NW
direction. This area is just combat training, and there is nothing much
here, except some new creatures. There is a cave here that leads to a
lookout area, but I am not sure what purpose it holds. The following areas
you know you are going in the right direction because of the braziers
(torches) You will eventually enter Wadjet Canyon and meet some traveler.
One of them (Sebu) will tell you about a great monster for the side quest
"The beast of legend" (worth doing because of 2 skill points reward). The
area is pretty much like Hathor basin. There is a cave due N from the
traveler for the side quest and the exit if due NW from the traveler at a
stone bridge.

Side quest : The Beast of Legend : Wadjet canyon : Wadjet Canyon
The is a cave to the N, right at the end of the area, near the exit (stone
bridge), the cave is reached by a small path south of the cave entrance.
Enter the cave and you will eventually find the "Ancient Scorpos" which is a
big scorpion (and I think it can actually stand on two legs). Anyway, he's
not too tough so kill it for the reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 7500XP, 2 skill points.
	Epic: 40000XP, 2 Skill points
	Legendary: 95000XP, 2 Skill points

Exit Wadjet Canyon across the bridge into the Nile floodplains. Again the
exit is to the NW direction, and the is a cave in the N direction, again
leading to a lookout which does not seem to serve any purpose. The next area
is the village of Sais with a rebirth fountain. There is one guy Anpu who
will give you a side quest " Plight of the Nile". This one is easy, and can
be done now. The exit to the village is to the N.

Side quest: Plight of the Nile: Village of Sais: Village of Sais
To the W of the village is a beach, follow the beach S and clear all the
monsters. Go back to the village and find and talk to Makara for the reward.
Easy.
Reward:
	Normal: 8000XP and a partial charm.
	Epic: 40000XP and a partial charm.
	Legendary: 100000XP and a partial charm.

Outside the village is a merchant, and further on is the Temple of Sais. You
will find the portal here too. Anyway talk to the guy Thuti for update of
main quest. Thuti will tell you Imoteh is not here, and also that the temple
has been destroyed by another Telkine (Oh no). You will have to find Imhotep
at Memphis, so off we go.

Lower Nile, another big area where the exit is in the NW direction, If you
want to avoid most of the stuff, just go W from the temple and follow the
coast up to the exit. However if you go N you will find a "Old Kingdom
ruins" and also one to the E.

Side Quest: A Promethean surrounded: Lower Nile: Lower Nile
To the N direction just before the exit to the Lower Nile area is a small
camp. Kill the monsters and the boss and talk to Inen, a NPC you just
rescued for the reward.
Reward:
	Normal: magic jewelry, 7500 XP
	Epic: magic jewelry, 38000 XP
	Legendary: magic jewelry, 95000 XP

Memphis outskirts, again this is just a big area, with lots of monsters,
proceed in a general N,NW direction to Memphis.

Side quest: The Lowest of the Lows: Beggars Quarter: Beggars Quarter
Just before you get to Memphis there is an area Beggars Quarter, where you
will find a beggar (Merab) for a side quest. Basically there is no one that
is willing to protect the beggars. Kill the monsters in the following area.
You will find lots of shadow stalkers. These are fast and have a fast
attack, and you will find you are easily surrounded and taking a lot of
damage. However the good thing is that they only have average health. Kill
them all, and return to Merab for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Magical ring, 8500XP
	Epic: Magical ring, 45000XP
	Legendary: Magical ring, 100000XP

Finally journey into Memphis (Memphis plaza). You will find Imhotep to the N
next to a camel. Talk to him, and he will tell you that you need two items
to cast the invocation spell; The Eye of Chaos and Hand of Balance. That
will be the next part of the main quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 8000XP, magical item
	Epic: 45000XP, magical item
	Legendary: 110000XP, magical item

To the W of Imhotep you will find a priest (Zazamankh) for the "The High
Priest's Request" side quest (you may need to talk to him twice). Around the
place you will find "Tathari" for another side quest "The missing brother",
again you have to talk to her twice. Stock up and manage your inventory for
the next part. You will find a few Gates "The Gate of the Sphinx", "The Gate
of the Palm" and "The Gate to Thebes" (Quest Locked) in the plaza; you have
to click on them to open them.

2.7 The Invocation
------------------------

Map areas:
	Memphis Plaza (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Outer Giza (rebirth fountain)
	Giza Plateau (rebirth fountain, portal)
	The Great Sphinx (rebirth fountain)
	Pyramid of Khufu
	Fayum Passage
	Artisan's Quarter (rebirth fountain)
	Desert Waste (rebirth fountain)
	Sobek Plateau
	Canyon of Isis
	Fayum Desert
	Fayum Oasis (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Sandswept caves
	Temple of Atum (rebirth fountain)

There is one exit in Memphis Plaza to the NE leading to the Outer Giza ¡V "
The gate of the Sphinx", just outside of this exit is a rebirth fountain
(The other available exit NW ¡V "The gate of the palm" leads to the Artisans'
Quarter). This is a big area but the exit is due E between two torches, into
Giza Plateau. There is a rebirth fountain here. This area (Giza plateau) is
a bit difficult to explain, because there are a few places to note, and is a
relatively big empty area. First the directions from the starting point
(rebirth fountain). Move due E towards the red marker till you reach the
entrance to a tomb. Enter it (The Great Sphinx). There are two rebirth
fountains in here, one at the entrance, and the other near the "end" so to
say. After you find the second fountain, keep going a bit more until you
reach a set of double doors. If you are low on potions, portal back and
stock up.

Main quest: Defeat Pharoah's Honor guards. Through the double doors and you
will meet a lot of undead, soldiers and magical users. Kill them all (they
will respawn), so clear as much out as possible. Also in the room are four
"obelisk" type devices, each one generates a few of the undead. However do
not destroy them all. Each time you destroy one of the Obelisks, one of the
big stone statues (Pharoah's honor guards) will become active (if you look
closely when you destroy the obelisk you will see a ghost like creature
leave the crumbling obelisk and into the statue before it comes alive).
The statues are hard, and the undead gets respawned, however the statues are
harder than the undead, so dealing with one big statue and some undead is
better than dealing with four statues and no undead. The statues are hard
because of the high damage and high health, but are slow. However they seem
to be mostly immune to elemental damage as my poison, fire or cold damage
seems to do hardly any damage. The best method is just hit and run because
they are so slow; you get a hit or two before it raises it arm or foot to
attack. Warning, its reach is quite long, so run further. This method is
slow, so expect to spend some time to destroy all four.
After you destroyed them all, you can open the doors on the other side of
the room, don't worry the worse has passed. Click the Sphinx to get the Hand
of Balance, and get an update of the main quest. Exit the Great Sphinx head
due E of the "Great Sphinx" tomb (purple marker) is the Giza portal; you may
want to activate it. Keep going E (red marker) you will reach a cave "Fayum
passage". You now have two choices, continue the main quest or do the side
quests, if you continue the main quest, just enter the Fayum passage (and
skip the side quests below).

If you do the side quest, I assume you do them all (three of them) as I will
describe the general direction one after the other.

Side Quest: The missing brother: Memphis Plaza: Giza Plateau
Do not enter the cave. Instead follow the wall (SE direction) till you find
another cave. Enter and kill the monsters until you find the woman's brother
(Una). Talk to him, and he will say a monster has gone crazy, so go through
the double doors and kill the boss (Nesy-su-neb-ef or something similar),
who is basically a giant Jackal. It is fast and has high attack and fairly
high health. However it is susceptible to most damage so it should not be a
problem. Kill it, grab the loot in the chest, and go back out to talk to the
brother. Now portal back to Memphis and talk to the woman (Tathari) to
complete the quest. You should stock up on potions as well, before your
portal back, and leave the cave.
Reward:
	Normal: powerful ring, 10000XP
	Epic: powerful ring, 42000XP
	Legendary: powerful ring, 100000XP

Side Quest: The high priest's request: Memphis Plaza: Pyramid of Khufu
Side Quest: The Khufu's curse: Pyramid of Khufu: Pyramid of Khufu
If you are following this guide, you should be outside the second cave.
Proceed in a W,SW direction until you reach the pyramid of Khufu area (there
is no torches of paths, the Giza Plateau just merges with the Pyramid of
Khufu area). Once there it should be easy to find the big pyramid. Find the
entrance, and there will be a guy ( Tekenu), who will talk about a curse to
give you the "Khufu's curse" side quest. Both the quests are completed
inside the Pyramid (Tomb of Khufu) so enter it.
After a few rooms, you will enter a passage with three large doors. The
first one has just monsters (and loot). The second (middle) one has a boss.
Kill it to complete the "Khufu's curse" quest. The third room has two
obelisks and lots of undead. Kill them all, click on the coffin in the
middle to get "Staff o Khufu". As you are about to leave four big Liches
will appear. Kill them and go back to Memphis, to complete the quest.
Khufu's curse reward:
	Normal: 12500XP
	Epic: 50000XP
	Legendary: 100000XP
The high Priest's request:
	Normal: relic, 9000XP
	Epic: relic, 42000XP
	Legendary: relic, 100000XP

Main quest: Off we go, now depending if you took the side quests or not you
should be in Memphis plaza (side quests) or Fayum Passage (no side quests).
If you are in Fayum passage, just exit at the other side into "Fayum
Desert". If you are in Memphis, you have two choices, one quick method, is
just to portal back and go back to "Fayum passage" or the second method,
which is longer but new areas for loot and XP. The second option you will
see there are a set of large double doors NW ¡V "Gate of the Palm" (not the
gate of the priest, but the wooden ones further along), which you can go. If
you go through this set of doors then you enter into Artisan's Quarter. Keep
following the general path, moving from area to area activating the rebirth
fountains when you see them. I will not go into too much detail but you
should pass through the Desert Waste through Sobek Plateau, and Canyon of
Isis until you reach Fayum Desert. You know you are going the right way,
because of the torches (and there are no other exits).

You should now be in Fayum desert. You should have arrived at Fayum desert
from one of the two paths described, but no matter which way you came, a
little exploring and you will find Fayum Oasis (a town in the middle of
Fayum desert). Enter to stock up, ready for the next part. You can talk to
Menemnakht (or Pa neb) for "Caravan Woes" side quest and another guy Asri
for the "A hidden treasure" side quest.

Side Quest: Caravan Woes: Fayum Oasis: Fayum desert
If you leave Fayum Oasis in the desert you should see a Dune Raider camp
just to the north. There is a boss there. Just kill all the monsters, to
complete the quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 12000XP
	Epic: 45000XP
	Legendary: 100000XP

Side Quest: A hidden treasure: Fayum Oasis: Fayum desert
If you leave Fayum Oasis and proceed in a NW direction right to the edge of
the area you will find a cave (Mysterious tomb) indicated by the red marker
on the map. Enter it and kill everything and find the loot (treasure) for
reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 9000XP
	Epic: 30000XP
	Legendary: 65000XP

In the roughly NE direction from Fayun Oasis is the sandswept caves. The
cave is just a normal loot, XP cave on Normal, but on Epic or Legendary, you
will find the Manticore here, just another special monster you see along the
way. I would definitely avoid him, until you complete Epic, and come back.
He is HELL, like all the other non-game special bosses. Not really worth
losing XP over, but if you want to kill him, here is what I found. Max up on
your poison resists and lightning resists, melee characters will also have
Hell to deal with, so buy lots of potions. Slow enemy attacks will allow you
to see his attack animation and run away faster. As for all monsters with
energy based skills, have some energy drain attacks, also it seems it is
also susceptible to pierce damage so boost this as well. However my best
advice¡K.Leave him.

To continue the main quest, stock up on potions, and exit Fayum Oasis into
the desert and proceed in a NE direction until you find the Temple of Atum.
There will be a single set of steps leading up to the temple. After killing
some monsters you will meet NehebKau ¡V Scorpion King. This big scorpion is
fast and has big attack damage. However it seems to have weak resistances so
it should not be hard with potions. On harder levels, having slow monsters
will be a great help. Kill it, proceed NW and get the Eye of Choas, and
loot. Portal back to Memphis Plaza.

Back at Memphis plaza, talk to Imhotep twice (who is at the big gates now,
near the priest). The main quest is updated. Oh no, the Invocation did not
work; now you cannot call the Gods for help, and have to kill the Titan(s)
yourself. After the talk Imhotep says you should find the Telkine, who is
seeking something, but whatever it is it must be important.
Reward:
	Normal: 10000XP + 2 Attribute points
	Epic: 50000XP + 2 Attribute points
	Legendary: 130000XP + 2 Attribute points

2.8 A Telkein in Egypt
-----------------------------
Map areas:
	Dahsur (rebirth fountain)
	The Upper Nile (rebirth fountain)
	Thebes Outskirts
	Temple of Seti (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Highland Pass (rebirth fountain)
	Place of Truth
	Valley of Kings (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Tomb of Thutmes
	Tomb of Amenhetep I
	Tomb of Amenhetep I
	Tomb of Amenmeses
	Tomb of Merenptah
	Tomb of Seti I
	Tomb of Ramses

The golden gates (where the priest stands) in Memphis plaza should now be
open to you. Open them and proceed into Dahshur and activate the rebirth
fountain, then to the upper Nile, where near the end there is another
rebirth fountain. The general direction is NW, until you reach the Thebes
Outskirts. Note: There are two caves in the region, one roughly to the NW,
and the other N (from the entrance to the area), they only contain monsters
and loot. If you keep following the general NW direction, you will pass two
huge statues, and further on is the Temple of Seti.

At the Temple, you will find a portal, rebirth fountain, merchants etc here,
so rest and stock up. Talk to priest guy Amen-nahte for side quest (Search
for the Corrupt priest).

Leave the Temple, into the Highland Pass.

Side Quest: The Corrupt Priest: Temple of Seti: Meretseger Ridge
At the start of the Highland pass, if you proceed E you will eventually
reach the Meretseger Ridge, at the far end is a tomb, and in the tomb is
Neb-kemi the corrupt priest, who is now an undead priest. He should be quite
easy, especially if you have any + damage to undead. Kill him, and return to
the priest at the Temple of Seti (Amen-nahte) for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: magical weapon + 15000XP
	Epic: magical weapon + 50000XP
	Legendary: magical weapon + 125000XP

To exit to the Highland pass is to the N where you will find a rebirth
fountain. Proceed down the slope to the place of truth. Keep following the
general direction of the map to you finally reach the Valley of the Kings,
which has a portal and a merchant.

In the valley you will find lots of tombs of past Pharaohs, only one is the
correct Tomb. Since you are reading this walkthrough I assume you want the
quick way,so I might as well tell you the correct one; Tomb of Ramses. The
Tomb of Ramses is in the area to the NW of the portal (Not the Northern
tomb, but further W when you hit the northern wall). Enter the tomb of
Ramses. The other tombs are just XP and loot.

Inside the tomb are lots of monsters but they should not be a problem.
Proceed until you reach the double stone doors; you know what to expect.
Portal back and stock up on potions if you need to, before entering the
doors.

The Egyptian Telkine (Aktaios), is just like the previous Telkine except it
does not summon those life sucker Limos. However it has many other spells,
including the ability to clone himself. Anyway, I found this one easier than
the previous Telkine, for all my games. Maybe that is because by now I had
good equipment and a lot of resistance to elemental magic. Note: My melee
character that usually has problems with magic users, had no problems
neither, but I did have a high damage fast weapon with a 33% slow enemy
attacks, which I am sure helped a lot. I always use slow enemy enhancements
for my melee weapons, it helps a lot, and stacking these means your enemy
will basically be so slow that you can kill it before they even have time
for first attack. For bow users this is less helpful, but instead you should
look for slow movement enhancements.
Reward
	Normal: 12000XP + 2 Skill Points
	Epic: 55000XP + 2 Skill Points
	Legendary: 140000XP + 2 Skill Points

After you kill the Telkine , grab the Cuneiform Tablet and the other loot,
and portal back to the Temple of Seti, where you will find Imhotep. He reads
the Cuneiform tablet and discovers that the Telkine is looking for the
Sickle of Kronos, a powerful weapon used by the Titans with the power even
to kill Gods. To stop them you have for get the Sickle before the Telkine,
and best way is to use a portal at the Temple of Hatshepsut. The N door is
now open to you.

2.9 The Sickle of Kronos
-------------------------------
Map areas:
	Hatshepsut Path (rebirth fountain)
	Temple of Hatshepsut (rebirth fountain)
	Hall of Prometheus
	*Orient*
	Gardens of Babylon (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Temple of Marduk(rebirth fountain)

Leave the Temple of Seti, into Hatshepsut Path, and to the Temple of
Hatshepsut. Enter the temple and you will find lots of monsters, and a few
Dark Obelisks to make your life more difficult. The monsters are mostly
undead so bonus damage to undead weapons will be useful in these sections.
Keep going until you reach the Hall of Prometheus, and there are three
paths. I found this area quite hard for most of my characters, maybe because
there are some many monsters in such a confined space. To help you out, the
correct path is to the NE. You will eventually find a room with a boss (Sand
Wraith Lord ¡V Nightmare of the Desert), this one is easy (compared to the
monsters you found in the Hall of Prometheus). Kill it and enter the portal
and to the Orient.

The Orient, Gardens of Babylon, for most new players this is where things
start getting hard. This will be the first part. As well as monsters you saw
before in a new form (different name and stronger, and more skills), you
will meet a lot of new creatures that can be deadly to both melee and ranged
characters.

Activate then portal and rebirth fountain, trade and buy potions. You should
see if the merchants have any better equipment, as you will need it. Talk to
the Order of Prometheus guy if you want.

When you are ready proceed SE, along the Gardens. The first new problem you
will encounter is that you are now traveling in a south direction (SW,S,
SE). In previous stages you where were moving N most of the time. TQ main
screen has perspective, which means the bottom (S) is closer to you and
bigger, and the N part of the screen is further away and smaller. This means
the N part you can see farther and also more area than the bottom. Since now
you are moving south, you have two problems; one, once you see monsters they
are too close, and two, monsters see you before you see them. This is a real
pain, especially later on, but too bad, you cannot change the camera angle,
maybe IronLore intentionally made it this way so this last part is a lot
harder.

Proceed up the garden, basically zigzag up the stairs until you get to the
top and the entrance to the Temple of Marduk, where you will find a rebirth
fountain. I will not describe this area in too much detail. Although each
level is like a maze, there is basically one entry and one exit, so there is
not much to say. Just be careful and kill all the monsters, in case you have
to run back. There are four levels to the temple, and on the fourth, if you
proceed slowly you will see two traps by the door. You should destroy these
two first (before you enter the room ahead). Once destroyed, you should
stock up on potions.

After destroying the two traps, you will enter a long rectangular room
(there are two more traps on the other side); there is a Chimera in the
middle. The Chimera is hard, high health, fast and has fire and lightning
damage. For melee characters, high resistances and defense is helpful. For
ranged characters, just keep dodging and watch out for the traps on the
other side. Again slow down attack or slow movement is very important for
these fast creatures. After you killed the Chimera, and the two traps
proceed and you will find a room with a symbol, step on it to open the door
if you have not figured that out yet. In the next chamber you will find an
injured Feiyan. Talk to her because this triggers the addition of your third
and final inventory bag. She says she is not strong enough and the Telkine
almost killed her with one blow. The Telkine has the Sickle. Anyway, it's
now your job to hunt down the Telkine and get the sickle back.
Reward : Talk to Fei Yan
	Normal : Relic + 15000XP
	Epic: Relic + 60000XP
	Legendary: Relic + 145000XP

Congratuations you are now 75% through Titan's Quest.

2.10 Hunt for the Sickle
------------------------------
Map Areas:
	Babylon Outskirts (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Parthian Highlands (rebirth fountain)
	The Silk Road
	Bactrian woods
	Amdo Region
	Shangshung Village
	Natu La Pass
	Natu La Ridge (rebirth fountain)
	Amdo Region (rebirth fountain)
	Chumbi Valley
	Tsongmo Peak
	Tsongmo Ice Cavern (rebirth fountain)
	Khantai Mountains (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Orkhan Valley
	Outer Mongolia (rebirth fountain)
	Mongolian Plateau (rebirth fountain)
	Village of Guanzhong
	The Great Wall
	Shaanxi Province
	Village of Zhidan (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Jingyang Woods (rebirth fountain)
	Shaanxi Fields
	Chang'an Outskirts
	City of Chang'an (rebirth fountain, portal)

Welcome to the final part of TQ. Before I go into detail of the quest, let
me say a few things about this level. This level is hard, and as well as the
moving South direction problem, you will meet some monsters which are hard
and fast, and lots of them, so ranged attackers will find that they are
surrounded easier. To make things even more difficult, you will visit a lot
of forests. Forests are a pain, nice graphics with lots of tall trees and
foliage. This makes the game harder because even with the transparencies,
you will find may places where monsters are hidden because of the tree
trunks and tree tops. Before you know it you will find four or five high
melee creatures surrounding you. However, if this is your first time be
prepared to meet more cool monsters.

General guidelines have a few weapons, some for beasts, some of undead, and
have slow movement and slow attack enhancements, more than one for harder
levels. Bows are best with poison/bleed and slow movement; whilst with melee
find a very fast weapon (with enhance attack speed, and slow monster
attack). Also make sure your resistances are high since you will find lots
of monsters with various attacks. Even on Epic level I found 2x +60% damage
to undead sometimes still need two hits to kill some wraith lords, so be
careful.

OK on to the quest. Babylon outskirts proceed to find a clearing with some
villagers. Activate the portal, and stock up, and housekeep your inventory.
Buy a few different types of weapons if you need to, and pump up your
offense and defense and resistances. You will find Appa, for an update of
main quest, saying the Telkine with a sickle passed through. Also you will
find a guy (Immeru) for a side quest: The seed of Destruction. Proceed to
the E to the farmlands.

Side Quest: The seed of destruction: Babylon outskirts: Babylon outskirts
Clear out the farmland area of all monsters, and go back and talk to Immeru
for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 18000XP
	Epic: 50000XP
	Legendary: 145000XP

Keep following the area until you reach a bridge, cross the bridge into the
Parthian highlands. You will see a few NPCs, talk to them if you want, they
will just say the Telkine passed this way. Keep going, you know you are
going the right direction if you see bridges (cross them of course). Keep
going through the "Silk road", "Bactrian woods", "Amdo region", until you
reach "ShangShung village", activating any rebirth fountains you see along
the way. This section is just a big battle and a glimpse of things to come.
You can start to familiarize yourself with the monsters since you will see a
lot more of them and in larger groups.

In ShangShung Village, stock up, and also change weapons. The previous
section will give you an idea of what monsters you will face and this
village allows you to tweak your equipment to these monsters. Talk to Pasang
Do ma for the "A gargantuan Yeti" side quest and Kilu Tam ba for "Mystery in
the mountain" side quest if you wish.

Go E from the village, you will come to a bridge. Continue through Natula
Pass, and Natula ridge, crossing the bridges as you see them. At Natula
ridge you can go E for a side quest, otherwise, proceed N to the torches and
exit.

Side Quest: Caravan in trouble: Natula Ridge: Natula ridge
If you decide to go E you will find a guy (Gong Li) chased by some monsters,
which will lead to a cave. You cannot talk to the guy yet, and he will just
stand there. Go in the cave, kill everything (including the boss), grab
loot, now go out and talk to the guy for reward.
Rewards:
	Normal: Powerful Ring + 18000XP
	Epic: Bug : Epic/Legendary has bug which prevents you from talking to Gong
Li, so this quest is inaccessible.
	Legendary: Bug : Epic/Legendary has bug which prevents you from talking to
Gong Li, so this quest is inaccessible.

The exit from Natula Ridge is to the N and eventually you will enter the
other side of the Amdo region. Keep going eastwards until you reach the
Chumbi Valley where there is a rebirth fountain. Keep going until you reach
a bridge. If you want to continue the main quest, cross the bridge
otherwise, take the following detour.

Side quest update: Mystery in the mountain: Village of ShangShung: Chumbi
Valley
Do not cross the bridge but instead, go NW up a slope, until you see a small
house, with a guy (Ang Tshe-ring). He will say something about his son going
after some magical weapons or something. Go E from the guy until you reach a
cave. Enter the cave and kill everything, until you find the Wraithlords and
the three magical cases. You cannot open the cases. Anyway, go back to Ang
Tshe-ring, and tell him the magical items are gone. That's it for this part
of the quest; this quest will continue later on.

Turning our attention back to the bridge. Across the bridge is a large area,
with a Neanderthal village and monsters, proceed in NE direction. Tsongmo
Peak.

Side Quest: Mystery in the Mountains: Shangshung village: Tsongmo Peak
You will meet Da-Wa Phu-ti (the son) for an update on the quest and a marker
to the cave (N direction). Go to the cave and battle the monsters, with two
or three Neanderthal bosses. Eventually you will exit the cave into an open
area, where you will met the big boss. This boss has high health, the shock
attack (which you first saw from the Cyclops, polyphemus), and some cold
attacks. He is quite tough, especially with his minions swarming you at the
same time. It will take some time but should be able to beat him. Melee
characters have the advantage, if you have high enough defense, and stun and
cold protection. Clear the minions out first if you can. Grab the loot at
the other side of the area. Portal back to ShangShung village and talk to
Kilu Tem-ba for reward
Reward:
	Normal: 22000XP
	Epic: 55000XP
	Legendary: 160000XP

The exit to this area is another cave further N, which leads into the
Tsongmo Ice caverns and a rebirth fountain. Keep going following the steps
and eventually you will meet a giant Yeti.

Side Quest: A gargantuan Yeti: Snagshung village: Tsongmo ice caverns
Kill it for reward. This guy is tough, so patience is the key. He can do
quite some damage as well as having a cold attack. Hit and run works, but in
the end should not be too difficult.
Reward:
	Normal: 20000XP
	Epic: 55000XP
	Legendary: 160000XP

Keep going until you exit the cave into Khantai Mountains, and a bit further
on you will find a portal, a merchant and rebirth fountain. There is
basically one path, which winds around, with two caves around the area,
eventually leading into Orkhan Valley. Orkan Valley has a cave to the N that
you can also visit, for XP and loot. On to Outer Mongolia (with rebirth
fountain), then to Mongolian Plateau and another rebirth fountain, and keep
going until you reach the Village of Guanzhong.

At the Village of Guanzhong, you will meet the Yerren for the first time.
They are like another version of the Neanderthals, but much more faster and
deadly. They have average health, but high speed and high attack damage, all
of them (melee, archers and magical users). Without saying much, try to lure
them out one by one or it will be a quick death for you if you get swarmed.
They are tough, so be carerful.

Side Quest: Child of the Raptor: Village of Guanzhong : Village of Guanzhong
Eventually you will enter a village with a woman Chang-Er. Talk to her for
the quest. Go N kill the raptor,who is fast, but raptor is by itself so no
minions, unless you run too far and attack other monsters. The technique is
generally hit and run, use slow down weapons to slow it down. Also only run
into areas you have already visited, so you do not bump into new creatures.
Kill it and a child appears and run back to the Mother. Talk to the mother
for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 23000 EXP, Magical Jewelry
	Epic: 55000 EXP, Magical Jewelry
	Legendary: 170000 EXP, Magical Jewelry

Keep following the road until you reach the Great wall and a rebirth
fountain. Talk to Zi Chan for the side quest "Peng problems", which you have
to do anyway, because it is along you path.

Side Quest: Peng problems: Great Wall: Great Wall
Talk to soldier (Zi Chan) and follow the great wall, and kill all the Peng,
including a boss Peng (Xiao ¡V Collosal Peng). Kill it, and continue on to
the next tower, where you exit and find a rebirth fountain. Talk to the
other soldier Bai Li Xi (commander) for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 23000 EXP, Magical Weapon
	Epic: 55000 EXP, Magical Weapon
	Legendary: 175000 EXP, Magical Weapon

Keep moving SE direction until you reach the Shaanxi Province. Keep going
till you reach a bridge, and eventually you will reach the Village of
Zhidan. Phew. Stock up, and adjust your equipment etc. More nasty monsters
to come, so keep them relics, charms, armor and weapons in tune or you will
find it harder and harder. Talk to a guy (Fan ye) for quest update ¡V Telkine
passed through here ¡V doh. Talk to Bao-Er for side quest "Stalker in the
woods", and talk to Lu Buwei for side quest "The Wealth collector".

When you have rested and tuned up your weapons and staves for maximum damage
(plus a few spare in inventory for different monsters), we can proceed. N to
Jingyang Woods, which you basically follow the road (you know you are in
right direction when you see the torches). There are three side quests here,
if you want to skip them, just follow the road.

Side Quest: Lesson in Despair: Jingyang Woods: Jingyang Woods
At the entrance to Jingyang Woods, just follow the west edge, killing the
creatures. Eventually you will reach an area, with a guy. Kill the monsters,
and talk to the guy a few times for easy reward. I am not too sure why this
side quest exists, it seems pretty pointless, maybe someone can explain this
quest to me.
Reward:
	Normal: 25000 XP
	Epic: 60000XP
	Legendary: 180000XP

Side Quest: Stalker in the Woods: Village of Zhidan: Jingyang Woods
From the entrance of Jingyang Woods, proceed in a E/SE direction. In the
forest you will eventually find a big boss tropical Arachnos (or whatever).
Kill it for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 27000XP
	Epic: 70000XP
	Legendary: 190000XP

Side Quest: A Wealthy Collector: Village of Zhidan: Jingyang Woods
From the entrance of Jingyang Woods, proceed in a E/SE direction until you
reach a cave. Go inside kill the monsters and get the Jade figurine from the
chest, and other loot. Portal or walk back to Lu BuWei in the Village for
reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Powerful ring + 25000XP
	Epic: Powerful ring + 55000XP
	Legendary: Powerful ring + 175000XP

Follow the road until you reach a bridge which faces N with a rebirth
fountain on the other side. Keep going through Shaanxi Fields and to
Chang'an Outskirts cross the bridges and activating the rebirth fountains.
Eventually you will reach the City of Chang'An. At the entrance is a woman
(Huan Ye), talk to her for a quest update. Make your way east until you
reach the city.

At the City talk to the soldier Ma Feibai for the side quest "The Emperor's
Clay Soldiers" and the other soldier Wai Zhen for the other side quest
"Terra Cottas At Large". You will also find Feiyan here, fully healed; you
can talk to her for a main quest update (to talk to the Yellow Emperor) to
complete this part of the main quest. Anyway, talk your time to activate the
portal and re-equip, etc. Talk to Fei Yan to complete this part of the main
quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 10000XP, powerful amulet
	Epic: 40000XP, powerful amulet
	Legendary: 90000XP, powerful amulet


Before you continue you can do the two side quests that are relatively easy.
You will also find that there are two doors/gates that are "quest locked",
you can ignore them for now.

Side Quest: Terra Cottas At Large: City of Chang'an: City of Chang'an
Just clear all the monsters in the surrounding areas and go back and talk to
Wai Zhen for reward. Note: The door to the north of Wai Zhen has a lot of
Terra Cotta soldiers, but also leads into a Palace. You do not have to go in
the palace for this quest, but is in fact part of the other side quest.
Reward:
	Normal: Magical Weapon + 26000XP
	Epic: Magical Weapon + 60000XP
	Legendary: Magical Weapon + 180000XP

Side Quest: The Emperor's Clay Soldiers: City of Chang'an: City of Chang'an
To the N of Ma FeiBai is an area with a lot of Terra Cotta soldiers, whose
only difficulty is that they have a lot of health. Anyway, if you did the
other side quest, this area will be cleared. Right at the end is a palace;
enter the palace to battle the boss (Bandari ¡V terra Cotta Sorceror) . In
the palace you will meet the sorcerror boss, and a lot of Terra Cotta
soldiers. Melee characters will find him hard, because he will teleport if
you hand-to-hand, so ranged characters have the advantage. Anyway, keep
killing the terra Cotta soldiers and avoid the sorcerers spells until all
the terra cotta soldiers are destroyed then kill the Boss. Talk to the
Emporer spirit and then to Ma FeiBai for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 30000 XP, 2 Attr points, Powerful Amulet
	Epic: 80000 XP, 2 Attr points, Powerful Amulet
	Legendary: 200000 XP, 2 Attr points, Powerful Amulet

2.11 Journey to the Jade Palace
---------------------------------------
Map areas:
	City of Chang'an (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Chang'an Farmland
	Shrine of Zhang Kui
	Quinba Bamboo Forest
	Village of Binxan (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Jinghe River Valley (rebirth fountain)
	Qiyun Ascent (rebirth fountain)
	Mount Qiyun
	The Jade Palace
	Jinghe wetlands

On with the main quest, compared to the previous part, this part is quite
short. There are two double doors that are quest locked, but the exit is a
bit hard to find. If you find the SE wall of the city, you will find a
section of a crumbled wall that is the exit to Chang'an Farmland. Keep
following the route through an area with huts, until you reach Quinba Bamboo
Forest. In the middle of the area (towards the S at a small pass) you will
find a "naked" man (Ran Ju). Talk to him for the side quest "A general in
repose". The exit however is a general SW direction from Ran Ju.

Side Quest: A General in repose: Quinba Bamboo Forest: Quinba Bamboo Forest
To the SE of the guy Ran Ju is a cave. Kill the monsters and find the chests
for the reward for this quest. There are two exits to the caves; one is to
the E, which leads to Shrine of Zhang Kui (monsters for XP and loot), the
other leads to another exit to Quinba Bamboo Forest (SE of the original
entrance to the cave). The shrine has nothing on normal level, but on Epic
and legendary you will find the Dragon Lych here, have some fun and gain the
XP, but beware he has skill disruption and stun attacks.

Reward:
	Normal: 26000XP
	Epic: 65000XP
	Legendary: 180000XP

Keep going in the general S direction to find the Village of Binxan. Here
you will find a portal and also rebirth fountain. You can talk to guy (Xiao
Yishan) for the "Hermit mage" side quest. A bridge is to the W of the
village. Further on across the bridge to reach the Jinghe River Valley. The
exit to the area is in the S direction, across a bridge, rebirth fountain;
there is only one exit so you cannot go wrong.

The next part is hard. Lots of monsters, all fast and high damage, so be
prepared, I hate the next section regardless of difficulty or character.

Ready? Cross the bridge (to the W of the village), some tigermen, lure them
back and let the soldiers of the village help you. This is an indication of
how difficult the next section is; fast tiger men, archers, and magic users,
and pack leaders, high damage, lots of them and high health. See inventory
tips for more information. On the other side of the bridge in the S
direction you see another guy (Liu Xu), talk to him for the "Behind the
waterfall" side quest.

The next section is big but the general direction is SW (bad). You will meet
the tiger men again, plus some dragonians (or whatever). The red ones with
one blue magic caster are hard; high damage and fast casting/shooting. Avoid
them if you can. You will also find more tigermen with a little camp that
you have to pass through which is tough.

Side Quest: Behind the waterfall: Jinghe River Valley: Jinghe River Valley
Go in the W/SW direction from Lui Xu and you will find a cave, enter the
cave/waterfall and kill the four (I think) shades, and return to Lui Xu for
reward.
Reward:
	Normal: Powerful amulet, 28000XP
	Epic: Powerful Amulet, 70000XP
	Legendary: Powerful Amulet, 190000XP

Side Quest: Hermit mage: Village of BinXin: Jinghe River Valley
Pass the bridge with the rebirth fountain, going S direction is a village,
pass the village in the SW direction is a waterfall, and some tigermen. Kill
the tigermen, and you will find a small shelter with some chests. Open the
chest and loot to complete the side quest.
Reward:
	Normal: 28000XP
	Epic: 70000XP
	Legendary: 190000XP

Keep going S direction to reach the bridges and into Qiyun Ascent. Across
the bridge is a woman (Yi shan) who will give you the "Three Sisters" side
quest that is later on. Keep going crossing the bridges as you see them
until you reach Mount Quyin.

Across one of the bridges you will meet Yao Guai an ancient demon bull, with
fire attacks, and also summon shadow stalkers. They all do quite a lot of
damage, and if you are a warfare character the battle standard is useless,
because they will hack it down. The bull is quite tough, because it is fast.
Best players can do is to slow it down. Just make sure you have enough
potions, as it can be a long battle. After you killed it, proceed N passed
another bridge and into The Jade Palace. Enter the jade palace and talk to
the Yellow emperor, who will update the main quest (and complete this part
of the quest). He will mention the last great Titan Typhon, and where he is
imprisoned.
Reward:
	Normal: Powerful ring, 25000XP health and energy restored
	Epic: Powerful ring, 80000XP, health and energy restored
	Legendary: Powerful ring, 225000XP, health and energy restored

This part of the quest is basically complete. You can take the easy way and
portal back to the City of Chang'An and talk to Fei Yan to continue the
quest (if so skip to next section). However you can take the slow way as
described by the Emperor by following the passageways behind the palace.
Choosing the passageways means you can complete the "Three sisters side
quest".

If you choose the passageway you basically go through the Passageway into
Jinghe wetlands, and then the NE direction through the Chang'an farmlands,
and back to the City of Chang'An through one of the double doors that was
previously locked.

Side Quest: The Three Sisters: Mount Qiyun: Jinghe Wetlands
This is a big area, and to the N/NE direction is another woman (Ru zhao) the
second sister. Talk to her to update the quest, telling you the third sister
is in trouble. Go E direction to a small village and kill the tigermen. The
N end of the village is the third sister (Lui Hua). Talk to her, and she
will explain the situation. Go back to Ru Zhao (W) and talk a few times, and
then back to talk to the rescued sister Lui Hua for reward.
Reward:
	Normal: 30000XP and magical jewelry.
	Epic: 75000XP and magical jewelry.
	Legendary: 200000XP and magical jewelry.

2.12 Under Wusao Mountain
-------------------------------------
Map areas:
	The Jade Palace
	City of Chang'An (rebirth fountain, portal)
	Forest of the Ancients (rebirth fountain)
	Wusao Barrens
	Wusao Caverns
	The Obsidian Halls
	*Olympus*
	Lower Olympus
	Olympus Summit

This is the final part of the main quest. First return back in Chang'An. The
previous locked door leading to area with monsters is now open, so enter the
area, and to the NE wall is the exit into the Forest of the Ancients. There
is a cave to the NE but just monsters and loot. Keep going until you reach a
bridge made from a fallen tree trunk. Cross it into Wusao barrens. Keep
going N and up to the portal and the cave entrance. Enter into the cave
(Wusao Caverns) and the scary music starts.
You should keep battling and following the exit points. You will go through
a few set of stairs until you reach an area with a bridge made of black
shiny rock (Obsidian made from cooled down lava). There is only one exit, so
keep following it till you reach the Obsidian Halls.
The exit is to the E but you have to go N first then SE to reach it. You
will reach a long passage with a rebirth fountain at the other side. This
level the destination is also to the E but again you have to go S then NE to
get there. You will find a big broken double door.

You should portal back and re-equip and buy potions, if you are short.

Enter and you will be just in time to see the Telkine (so that's what a
Telkine looks like under the robes) release Typhon, and Typhon will enter a
portal. Nothing you can do about it. Go down and kill the Telkine. This
should be quite easy if your character has handled all the creatures up to
now. This Telkine has a telekinetic attack that can grab rocks and throw at
you as well as elemental attacks and summons some Fire sprites (with bigger
health) and some kind of freeze attack. Again kill the summoned creatures
first then work on the Telkine. Ranged attackers have limited room to move,
and melee characters must have strong armor (or the rocks which kill you).
Best attack is area attacks, which is specialty of magic users. My magic
user (Earth) just ran around casting ring of fire, boring but it did the job
(run + cast, run + cast, did not even need to aim). Kill it and enter the
portal.

****OLYMPUS***

Lower Olympus, rebirth fountain. This is the Typhon run, in other words, the
part people play (after they complete the difficulty), just to kill Typhon
again and again for the magical drops.
Proceed up the steps, which have probably been damaged by Typhon on it's way
up. You will meet some nasty Minotaurs (and Minotaur lords), which are fast
and have massive damage. Keep you distance and use the hit and run tactic
(they have a range before turning back), melee is hard unless you have high
health and a lot of potions. Further up you will meet the Cyclops Elders.
These are easy because they are slow. Do not get hit because they do massive
damage, and keep your distance because of the shock attack.

Keep going until you get to Olympus summit and you met Typhon.

Typhon is quite easy but he/it has some massive damage attacks, especially
the fire attacks. High melee characters can just go bashing, as long as you
have high resistances and damage. However watch out for the fire attack, and
the frost Liches he summons. Ranged players can run around but this will
take time to kill, but there is plenty of room and Typhon is slow. There are
some shrines (not the statues) at the outer edge of the area, battle marker,
regeneration etc. Select the ones that help you out the most. When Typhon is
nearly dead, choose the Experience shrine for that extra experience boost
(do not know if it multiplies the XP, but should not hurt to use it).

If you are wondering the four statues of the Gods actually gives Typhon
extra skills. You can destroy these if you have problems with Typhon. Each
of the statues grants Typhon a power for a limited time (so no, they don't
last forever, he reverts back to his flame breath/melee combo soon
afterwards (probably around 10-20 seconds) unless he hits another statue
with one of his other powers).

Hades - Abyssal Liche Summons, Life Suction
Demeter - Thorns, Ranged Poison Attack, Stone Hand (comes up and grabs you
and holds you, disabling movement and attacking)
Zeus - Ranged Thunder Attack
Apollo - Meteors, Energy Suction

Wonder why the Gods didn't come out and help me out?? Too scared???

Congratulations you have completed the TQ single player quest, grab the
loot, and listen to the explanation of why you do not see the Greek Gods
interfering with the lives of men anymore.
	Normal: 30000XP
	Epic: 70000XP
	Legendary: 300000XP



>>>> END OF WALKTHROUGH <<<<<
==========================================================================
3. Items and equipment
==========================================================================

3.1 Weapons, armor and rings types
--------------------------------------------

Normal and magical items have a base type
e.g. bow, short sword, reinforced leggings, garland, etc.
This determines the base properties of the item, such as damage range,
speed.

In addition they may have a quality, such as copper, bronze, iron, or in
case of bows, pine ash or oak. These determine the quality of the item, for
example for armor, these may affect the armor rating of the item.

Finally they have magical pre- and post-fixes, eg. Pupil's simple wraps,
where "simple wraps" is the base type, and "Pupils" determine the magical
property.

Rare, epic and legendary items normally have special names.

I will not go into too much detail of each item type as there are too many.
I am sure some one else will someday produce one. There are so many types of
items and modifiers that it will probably require another document just as
big as this one to describe. I will instead give a general outline of each
type of item you will find in TQ. The descriptions below are in general for
normal (white) and magical (yellow) items, damaged (grey) items can be
considered to be inferior versions of normal, and rare or above have special
modifiers which may sway it from the standard properties.

I have listed the max requirement of each class of weapon, the max damage
because damage is relative to the speed, and enemy resistances, it should be
used as a guideline to see if you base damage is near the top end of the
scale. Note: These requirement statistics figures are generated therefore
there is some adjustment +/- depending when it was generated, therefore use
figures as a rough guide only.

3.1.1 Swords/Knives:
The bladed weapon and a general all round melee weapon. They have speed
which range from average to very fast (sabers) and there damage is related
to speed, the faster the less damage. In general they have average damage
and great for single weapon melee fighters. Having slow enemy attack
enhancements make swords deadly, as slowing enemy will not only decrease
your damage, but also increase the damage you do, and allow poisons and
bleeding to work as well. Increasing attacking speed can also be a help and
can make an average speed high damage blade into a deadly high speed high
damage blade. Swords also have a piercing damage percentage which should
also be a consideration in choosing the right sword.

Highest requirement sword:
	Thunderbolt, Lord Seth's Chaos blade, Thyestes' theme, Zhanlu,
Theseus' Inheritance, Stymphalian Talon, Amen-Ra's magebane, Mindrazor,
Pagos.
	Str:	307
	Dex:	250

Highest damage sword: Huo Qubing's ceremonial sword (Str:307, Dex:250)
Damage:	128-134
Pierce:	10%
Highest Pierce % sword: Kydoimos (Str:307, Dex:250)
Damage:	116-124
Pierce:	15%


3.1.2 Axes:
Axes are slow to average speed melee weapons, and suited for the high damage
fighter. Everything that applies to swords will apply to axes, however, the
need to offset the slower speed is important.

Highest requirement Axe:
	Erysichthon's Hunger, Persephone's Caress, The furies, Phoenix,
Acheron's touch, Axe of Tereus, Cerberus's bite.
Str:407
Dex:150

Highest damage Axe: Persephone's caress (Str:407, Dex:150)
Damage:	188-201


3.1.3 Clubs and maces:
These are average speed "blunt" axes. Their damage is also in between axes
and swords. In D&D terms these items are weapons of monks and clerics, and
normally has bonuses to attacking undead. However I do not think this
applies in TQ. These weapons also have a "spiked" version which can increase
damage inflicted by this type of weapon.

Highest requirement mace:
	Sapros the corruptor, Scepter of Thanatos, Areithous' mace, Glacial
maul, Hand of Hephaestus, Horn of Hiamat, Kraken's Fist, Orion's Mace,
Prometheus' gift, Agamennon's scepter.
	Str:	452
	Dex:	136

Highest damage Mace: Horn of Tiamat (Str: 452, Dex:136)
Damage:	200-231


3.1.4 Bows:
This is the only general ranged non-magical weapon (excluding the Rogue,
throwing knife). They are generally very slow to slow, but because they are
ranged, it is not a major factor except for fast monsters. "Over time"
enhancements work very well with bows, as well as slow movement (not slow
attack), as it reduced the time the monster takes to reach you, effectively
increasing damage done by poison and bleed, as well as allow you to get more
shots. Also increasing attack speed, will speed up the bows, as well as
increasing projectile speed. Bows also have a piercing % which should be
considered.

Highest requirement Bow:
	Apollo's curved bow, Artemis' Silver bow, Atalanta's bow, Bow of
Herakles, Helios' fury, Nemesis' recurve, Painweaver, Qin Warbow, Serpent
wispher.
Str: 136
Dex:	378

Highest damage bow: Bow of Herakles (Str:136, Dex:378)
Damage:	130-154
Pierce:	25%
Highest Pierce % bow: Hyksos Compound bow(Str:113, Dex:263)
Damage:	55-66
Pierce:	50%
Highest Pierce damage bow: Bow of Herakles (Str:136, Dex:378)
Damage:	130-154
Pierce:	25%

3.1.5 Spears:
Spears are the slowest of the melee weapons and tend to have high damage, to
offset. They are only effective one-on-one, because the slow speed really
makes it a weapon to be avoided, especially since it melee (and you will get
surrounded). If you use a spear, then all information about axes apply, and
also note the importance of slow enemy attack, or boost damage to get that
one-hit kill. Spears also have pierce %.

Highest requirement Spear:
	Achilles' spear, Ares' wrath, Blood of Ouranos, Fury of the Three
amazons, Kwan Yin's final mercy, Onuris' spear, Peleus' ashen spear,
soulharvest,Telamon's boar skewer.
Str: 150
Dex:	350

Highest damage Spear: Ares' Wrath (Str:150, Dex:350)
Damage:	185-216
Pierce:	30%
Highest pierce % Spear: Alexander's Spear (Str:150, Dex:350)
Damage:	188-201
Pierce:	25% (+26% pierce damage)
Highest pierce damage Spear: Alexander's Spear (Str:150, Dex:350)
Damage:	188-201
Pierce:	25% (+26% pierce damage)


3.1.6 Staff:
The magic users choice. Staves generally come in three forms, cold,
lightning or fire. They can also be "base" which means single base damage or
have damage which is ranged e.g. 3-9 fire damage. The different types of
staves, I think is generally just an indication of how much damage the staff
can inflict. I do not think staves can be used as melee as it always seem to
fire a magic bolt. You can add other enhancements to stave attacks, but in
general using the default attack does not use up your energy (by itself).
Staves are slow.

Highest requirement Staff:
Archon's Judgement
Int:	467

Highest Fire damage staff:
	Hades' Scepter (Int: 464)
	140 base fire
Highest Cold damage staff:
	Fingerbone of Boreas (Int:464)
	133-144 Cold damage
Highest Lightning damage staff:
	Cadeus (Int:464)
	89-190 Lightning damage

3.1.7 Shields:
The important fact for shields is the chance to block, and to judge the
"quality" of the shield, just look at this figure. Damage is less important
and only used for characters with the defense mastery that can use the
shield for attack as well. In general choose the shield with the best block
chance. You would probably change your shield around once every "quarter" of
the main quest as better shields start appearing. Enhancements can be
anything, and pierce protection, increase armor is find, but remember do not
put critical enhancements to shields, or you will loose it when you change
shield.

Highest requirement Shield:
	Abyssal Shield, Alexander's pelta,Hector's shimmering shield,
Hephaestus' molten shield, Hera's shield, Priam's gate, Scale of the Black
Dragon,Golden shield of Pelaron, Hades' Aspis, Spectral Defender, Crest of
Taurus, Chi Gon's resolve, Athena's mirrored shield, Ancile, Venomhusk
shield, Ajax' bronze tower, Achilles shield, Zeno's third paradox.
	Str: 407

Highest Shield block: Ajax' Bronze tower
51% of block 280 damage
Highest shield damage: Achilles' shield
160 damage

3.1.8 Head gear:
Head gear comes in type types, the melee class (helms) and the magic user
class (garlands, circlets), where the magic user class usually has less
armor and have more dependency on intelligence (as opposed to strength for
melee class head gear). For head gear add enhancements which are not too
critical to your character, as you will change these a lot.

Highest requirement helm:
	Strength:
	Alexander's Plumed helm, Hu Qubing's helm, Dark justice of Tartarus,
helm of the Nemean lion, Conqueror's brain cage, Agamemnons Deathmask, Ares'
warhelm, Helm of darkness.
	Str:	486

	Dexterity:
	Hesione's golden veil.
	Str:	150
	Dex:	378

	Intelligence:
	Archmage's diadem
	Dex:	150
	Int:	378

Highest armor rating:
	Strength: Dark Justice of Tartarus, Helm of the Nemean lion, Ares' war
helm,
( str: 486) 245 armor
	Dexterity: Assassin's shroud, Tracker's hood
(Dex:364) 170 armor
	Intelligence: Archmage's Diadem
	(Int: 378) 138 armor

3.1.9 Torso armor:
Similar to head gear and comes in two types, one for melee and the other for
magic users. Again Torso armor is very important, and according to manual,
more likely to get hit (40% chance compare to other armor which has 20%
chance). Again choose best armor over anything else, as you will change this
every time you have a chance. Enhancements follow the same rule, less
important enhancements as you will change your torso armor a lot.

Highest requirement torso armor:
	Strength:
	Abyssal Plate, Black cage of Tartarus, Alexander's cuirass, Hu
Qubing's cuirass, Pelt of the Nemean Lion, Conqueror's plate, Penumbra
plate, Odysseus's armor, Overlord's iron shell, Minoxian armor, Horus'
refuge, Armor of Achilles, Ferrus Gnosi, Armor of Peleus, Shroud of Eirene,
Verdant plate
	Str:	486

	Dexterity:
	Assassin's harness, Tracker's armor
	Str:	150
	Dex:	364

	Intelligence:
	Archmage's mantle, Calypso's cover, Feng Zhao's meditation robes,
Iris' scintillating robes, Mantle oa Amun-ra, Mindrage robe, Robe's of
Sidiros Loros, Vestment of the Overlord,
	Dex:	150
	Int:	378

Highest armor rating:
	Strength: Overlord's Iron shell(Str: 486)
250 armor
	Dexterity: Assassin's harness(Dex: 364), Tracker's armor(Dex: 364)
170 armor
	Intelligence: Archmage's mantle(Int: 378), Calypso's cover(Int: 378),
Feng Xao's meditation robes(Int: 378), Iris' scintillating robes (Int:378),
Mantle of Amun-ra (Int:378), MindRage Robe (Int:378), Robe's of Sidiros
Loros(Int:378), Vestment of the Overlord (Int:378)
	138 armor



3.1.10 Arm bands:
Again two types, but armor is less important than for head gear and torso
armor, so start considering other benefits of the item, e.g. resistances
etc. I like to add enhancements such as pierce and bleeding protection to
these as they are rare (compared to all elemental resistances). You should
change these when you get a better item, but armor is not the major issue
with arm bands.

Highest requirement arm bands:
	Strength:
	Inexorable Grip of Tartarus, Abyssal bracers, Alexander's bracers, Hu
Qubing's armguards, Phobos, Bracers of the Nemean Lion, Conqueror's bracers
	Str:	486

	Dexterity:
	Assassin's bracers, Trackers gloves
	Str:	150
	Dex:	364

	Intelligence:
	Archmage's clasp, Black pearl bracklet, Braclet's of Aman-Da, Senbi's
Clasp, Truesilver bracelet.
	Dex:	150
	Int:	378

Highest armor rating:
	Strength: Inexorable Grip of Tartarus, phobos, bracers of the Nemean
Lion,
(str: 486) 245 Armor
	Dexterity: Assassin's bracers, Tracker's gloves
(Dex: 364) 170 armor
	Intelligence: Archmage's clasp(Int: 378), Black pearl braclet(Int:
378), Braclet of Aman-Da(Int: 378), Senbi's clasp (Int:378), TrueSilver
Braclet (Int:378)
	138 Armor


3.1.11 Leggings:
Again two types, the less important of the armor items, in respect to armor.
Choose leggings for it's other protection properties. Once you get a decent
part of leggings add so good enhancements to it, such as
elemental/poison/bleed/vitality/stun/skill disrupt protection. You should
not need to change these often. Also I found +xx% slow enemy
attacks/movement and +xx% damage to undead/demons etc also useful on these
items as they allow you to apply the enhancement to both your primary and
secondary weapon.

Highest requirement Leggings:
	Strength:
	Abyssal greaves, Unyielding shackles of Tartarus, Alexander's greaves,
Hu Quibing's greaves, Greaves of the Nemean Lion, Conqueror's buskin
	Str:	486

	Dexterity:
	Assassin's greaves, Tracker's leg guard
	Dex:	150
	Int:	364

	Intelligence:
	Archmage's leggings
	Dex:	150
	Int:	378

Highest armor rating:
	Strength: Unyielding shackles of Tartarus, greaves of the Nemean lion,
(str:486) 245 armor
	Dexterity: Assassin's greaves, tracker's leg guard
(Dex:364) 170 Armor
	Intelligence: Archmage's leggings
	(Int: 378) 138 armor


3.1.12 Rings and amulets:
You rely on these for the best protection, more than leggings, so when you
find a good ring or amulet, add the best enhancements on them as you should
not need to change these. They take up small amount of space, so having a
few different resistance types in inventory is a very good idea. What is
good? Well + all resistances, +x skills etc are the best. You are likely to
keep these for a long time and once you find a good one, add some extra
critical enhancements to it, and you are set. Also I found +xx% slow enemy
attacks/movement and +xx% damage to undead/demons etc also useful on these
items as they allow you to apply the enhancement to both your primary and
secondary weapon.

	Ring's highest requirement: Required level 45
	Amulets's highest requirement: Required level 48

3.1.13 Sets: Sets are a set of equipment, such as helm, torso, armor,
leggings, armbands, weapons etc. They share the same name such as Abyssal
Armor, Abyssal Plates, Abyssal greaves, Abyssal shield. Each set may have a
different type of items, and different number of items. What makes sets
different is that when you equip more than one item in the same set you get
special bonus, and when you complete all the items in a set you get a bigger
bonus on to of the special bonuses.
This document sill not cover sets as there is already a good guide on TQ set
items on the internet. However here is a summary of the max requirements for
the types of sets found in TQ. Note: These are max stats, some sets require
less requirements, but may be more suited for your character, so use it as a
guideline. By no means below is the complete list of sets, but they are the
top of the stats range.

Strength sets:
	Abyssal, Tartarus, Alexander, Huo Qubing, Children of Ares, Nimean
Lion hide, Conquerers canoply.
Strength	486

Dexterity Sets:
	Assassins cover, Trackers armor.
	Dexterity	364

Intelligence sets:
	Archmages regalia.
	Intelligence	378

3.1.14 Best ring/amulet bonus
The following is a list of best bonuses from rings and amulets. The reason
why I just list from rings and amulets is because they are more flexible, in
the sense that you can swap them in an out, without changing your armor or
damage etc. It is much easier to store special rings and amulets for that
special occasion because they take up a small amount of space. Note: The
below does not include stats for "Chance of one of the following¡K."

+ Health
	692: Aphroditre's Favor : Level 48
+ % health
	14%: Prokopios : Level 35
+ health regen per sec
	+2.0 : Aeon : level 40
+ % health regen
+142%: Amulet of Hygeia : Level 40
+ Energy
	+238: Shavo's Relic : Level 47
+ % Energy
	20%: Thoth's Mark: Level 40
+ energy regen per sec
	+1.0: Eye of Horus : Level 45
	+1.0: Celestial band : level 40
	+1.0: Serenity : Level 38
+ % Energy regen
	+98%: Ring of Gaia : Level 40
- % recharge
	-17%: Eye of Horus : Level 45
- Energy cost
	-27 : Seal of the high priest : Level 36
- Energy reserve cost
	-28 : Seal of the high priest : Level 36
- % energy cost
	15%: Polaris : Level 40
+ Str
	+45 : Tyrvidar's Might: Level 37
+ Int
	+48: Archimedes Cogwheel : Level 45
+ % Int
	21%: Thoth's Mark: Level 40
+ Dex
	+47: Apollo's Will : Level 45
+ % dex
	+11% : Adroit Loop : Level 37
+ offense ability
	+101 : Mark of Ares : Level 45
+ % offense ability
	+10% : Adroit Loop : Level 37
+ defense ability
	+82: Essense of Styx : Level 47
+ % defense ability
	+11% : Adroit Loop : Level 37
+ % fire resistance
	62%: Eye of Flame : Level 40
+ % cold resistance
	111% : Tibetan Necklace : Level 38
+ % lightning resistance
	117%: Shavo's Relic : Level 47
+ % elemental resistance
	51%: Essense of Styx : Level 47
+ % damage resistance
	10% : Tibetan Necklace : Level 38
+ % pierce resistance
	+53%: Chiron's Loop : Level 40
+ % poison resistance
	+52%: Apollo's Will : Level 45
+ % stun resistance
	122%: Serenity : Level 38
+ % skill disruption resistance
	+25%: Crest of Murong : Level 38
+ % Vitality damage resist
	39%: Myrmidon's Pendant : Level 46
+ % life leech resistance
	105%: Band of Souls : Level 45
+ % energy leech resistance
	118%: Shadowformed Band : Level 38
+ % bleeding resistance
	+23%: Crest of Murong : Level 38
+ % reduced freeze duration
	100%: Frostshield talisman : Level 38
+ % chance to dodge
	+7%: Chiron's Loop : Level 40
	+7%: Shifting Beads : Level 33
+ % armor
	31%: Essense of Styx : Level 47
+ % shield block
	5%: Captain's Signet : Level 22
+ Burn damage
	117 over 3.0: Seal of Hephaestus : Level 45
+ fire damage
	21-36: Eye of Flame : Level 40
+ % fire damage
	71%: Seal of Hephaestus : Level 45
+ cold damage
	34-43: Thundrite Charm : Level 38
+ % cold damage
	34%: Crystal totem : Level 36
+ % lightning damage
	18%: Storm Eye : Level 6
+ elemental damage
	+23 : Polaris : Level 40
+ % elemental damage
	46%: Shavo's Relic : Level 47
+ % pierce damage
	+103%: Apollo's Will : Level 45
+ % vitality/life leech
	82%: Band of Souls : Level 45
+ % energy leech
	67%: Band of Souls : Level 45
+ Poison damage
	90-120 over 6: Venom heart : Level 22
+ % poison damage
	32%: Jade band : Level 26
+ % Stun damage
	+50% : Adroit Loop : Level 37
+ % attack speed
	+19%: Shifting Beads : Level 33
+ % casting speed
	90%: Cartouche ring : Level 16
+ % Projectile speed
	+58%: Apollo's Will : Level 45
+ % movement speed
	+19%: Shifting Beads : Level 33
- % slow movement
	-34% over 3: Frostmoon : Level 10
- % requirement for armor
	-25%: Captain's signet : Level 22
- % requirement for weapons
	-25%: Captain's signet : Level 22
- % requirement for shields
	-25%: Captain's signet : Level 22
+ all skills
	+2: Aphroditre's Favor : Level 48
+ damage
	+37 : Mark of Ares : Level 45
+ % damage
	36%: Myrmidon's Pendant : Level 46
+ % damage to undead
	70%: Phantom Bane : Level 33
+ % less damage from undead
	+44%: Signet of Hope : Level 33
+ % damage to demons
	70%: Phantom Bane : Level 33
+ % less damage from demons
	+44%: Signet of Hope : Level 33
+ % less damage from Titans
	25% : Tyrvidar's Might: Level 37
+ % Energy absorption
	13%: Archimedes Cogwheel : Level 45
+ % Damage to Health
	17%: Necklace of Harmonia : Level 45
+ % experience
	10% : prokopios : Level 35
	10% : Loadstone : Level 33

3.2 Relics and charms
---------------------------
These are little stones and stuff that can be used to add enhancements to
your equipment. Only one enhancement can be put onto a single piece of
equipment. Once you enhance a piece of equipment, you can only add the same
enhancement to that item. When it max the enhancement, you may get a bonus.
Note: Bonuses seem to be random (or character level based), so you do not
get the same bonus every time you complete a relic or charm. I have listed
the ones I have found, there may be more. This also means that you should
complete the relic/charm before using, so that you can see the bonus you got
before using it. I have also seen completed relic/charms without bonuses
(boo hoo).

I will list them in alphabetical order, as it is easier to reference; note
that I remove the "the", so "The Valor of Achilles" is under V for Valor.
Relics can be stacked up to three and charms can be stacked to five. The
comp bonus is the bonus you get when you stack to the maximum number.

3.2.1 Relics
---------------
There are actually three types
Essences (Ess), Embodiment (Emb), Incarnation (Inc) , the difference being
the power, bonus and the level requirement.

Amum-Ra's Glory: armor
Type	Level req	Health		Energy
Ess	12		20/40/60	20/40/60
Emb	32		40/80/120	40/80/120
Inc	44		60/120/180	60/120/180
Comp bonus : +x Health, +x Int, +x armor, +x% Lightning resist, +x% Cold
resist, +x% Fire resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental resist


Ankh of Isis: rings & amulets
Type	Level req	Health regen
Ess	12		35/70/105%
Emb	32		50/100/150%
Inc	44		65/130/195%
Comp Bonus: +x Health, x Energy Leech for x seconds, +x% Lightning resist,
+x% Cold resist, +x% Fire resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental resist

Anubis' Wrath: weapon
Type	Level req	attack damage to health
Ess	12		2/4/6%
Emb	32		3/6/9%
Inc	44		4/8/12%
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x Life leech for x seconds , x Fire Damage, +x%
Damage to Demons, +x% Damage to Undead, x-x Damage, x% chance Stun for x
seconds , x Energy Leech for x seconds, x% slower Attack Speed for x
seconds, +x offense, +x% Attack Speed

Archimedes' Mirror: shield
Type	Level req	chance 50% damage reflected	
Ess	3		3/6/9%
Emb	25		4/8/12%
Inc	40		5/10/15%
Comp bonus: +x% Cold resist, +x% Fire resist, +x% Lightning resist, +x%
Pierce resist , +x% Poison Resist, +x health , +x Str, +x% x-x Pierce
retaliation, +x% armor, DA,+x% Life Leech retaliation

Artemis' Bowstring: Bows
Type	Level req	Pierce damage	Attack speed
Ess	3		3/6/9		2/4/6%
Emb	25		6/12/18		3/6/9%
Inc	40		10/20/30	4/8/12%
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x Poison Damage for x seconds, x-x Damage, +x%
slower Attack Speed for x seconds, +x Dex, +x offense, +x% Attack Speed, x-x
Pierce Damage

Code of Hammurabi: rings & amulets
Type	Level req	Intelligence
Ess	18		6/8/12
Emb	36		9/18/27
Inc	48		12/24/36
Comp Bonus: +x% Int, -x% recharge, +x% Lightning resist, +x% Cold Resist,
+x% Fire resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental resist

Dionysus' Wineskin: rings & amulets
Type	Level req	Damage resist	Health
Ess	3		2/4/6%		15/30/45
Emb	25		2/4/6%		40/80/120
Inc	40		2/4/6%		75/150/225
Comp Bonus: +x defense, +x health, +x Str, x% chance Stun for x seconds, +x%
armor, +x% Cold Resist

Djed of Osiris: weapon
Type	Level req	damage to undead
Ess	12		7/14/21
Emb	32		12/24/36
Inc	44		16/32/48
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x Life leech for x seconds, x Fire Damage, +x%
Damage to Demons, +x% Damage to Undead, x-x Damage, x% chance Stun for x
seconds, x Energy leech for x seconds, x% slower Attack Speed for x seconds,
+x offense, +x% Attack Speed

Domain of the Dragon-Kings: armor
Type	Level req	Fire resist
Ess	18		8/16/24
Emb	36		10/20/30
Inc	48		12/24/36
Comp bonus: +x Health, +x armor, +x% armor, +x Dex, +x% Life regeneration,
+x Energy, +x% Elemental resist


Golden Fleece: armor (body)
Type	Level req	- Energy cost
Ess	3		5/10/15%
Emb	25		7/14/21%
Inc	40		10/20/30%
Comp Bonus: +x Int, +x Defence, +x health , +x% Lightning Resist, +x% Cold
Resist, +x% Fire Resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental Resist, -x% recharge

Guan-Yu's Grace: armor (body)
Type	Level req	Defense ability		Chance to dodge
Ess	18		5/10/15			2/4/6%
Emb	36		10/15/20		3/6/9%
Inc	48		15/30/45		4/8/12%
Comp Bonus: +x Defense, +x% Attack Speed, +x armor, +x Dex, +x% Movement
Speed, +x% Pierce Resist

Hecate's Crescent: rings & amulets
Type	Level req	Energy 	Energy regen
Ess	3		2/4/6%	20/40/60%
Emb	25		3/6/9%	30/60/90%
Inc	40		4/8/12%	40/80/120%
Comp Bonus: +x Int, x Energy leech over x seconds, +x% Lightning Resist, +x%
Cold resist, +x% Fire resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental resist, -x% recharge

Herakles' Might : armor
Type	Level req	Strength
Ess	3		4/8/12
Emb	25		8/16/24
Inc	40		12/24/36
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, +x armor, -x armor over x seconds, +x% Pierce
Resist, +x Defense, +x health, +x Str, x% chance of Stun for x seconds, x%
Attack Speed for x second, +x Offense


Jade Emperor's Serenity: armor
Type	Level req	Lightning resist
Ess	18		7/14/21%
Emb	36		10/20/30%
Inc	48		15/30/45%
Comp Bonus: +x Health , +x Int, +x armor, +x% armor, +x% Lightning resist,
+x% Cold resist, +x% Fire resist, +x Energy, +x% Elemental resist

Li-Nezha's Guile: armor
Type	Level req	Dexterity
Ess	18		6/12/18
Emb	36		9/18/27
Inc	48		12/24/36
Comp Bonus: +x defense, +x% Attack Speed, +x armor, +x Dex, +x% Movement
Speed, +x% Pierce resistance

Monkey King's Trickery: rings & amulets
Type	Level req	reduced 	Element	skill disrupt
			res 4s		resist	protection
Ess	18		2/4/6		2/4/6%	5/10/15%
Emb	36		3/6/9		2/4/6% 	8/16/24%
Inc	48		4/8/12	2/4/6% 	12/24/36%
Comp Bonus: +x defense, +x armor, +x Dex, +x% movement Speed, +x Int, +x%
Pierce resistance

Prometheus' Flame: weapon
Type	Level req	Fire Dam		Burn over 3s
Ess	3		5/5/5%			9/18/27
Emb	25		10/10/10%		18/36/54
Inc	40		15/15/15%		30/60/90
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x-x Fire Damage, +x% Fire Damage, +x% Damage to
Demons, x-x Damage, +x% Fire Resist, +x% Slow Attack Speed for x seconds, +x
offense, +x% Attack Speed

Set's Betrayal: armor
Type	Level req	Pierce damage		33% of x pierce retaliation
Ess	12		6/6/6%			7/14/21
Emb	32		9/9/9%			9/18/27
Inc	44		11/11/11%			13/26/39
Comp Bonus: +x% Bleed, +x armor, +x Int, +x Dex, +x defense, +x offense, x
Life leech for x seconds

Shen-Nong's Dark Medicine: weapons
Type	Level req	Poison over 5s		Reduce resist 5s	
Ess	18		15/30/45		4/8/12%
Emb	36		25/50/75		5/10/15%
Inc	48		35/70/105		6/12/18%
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, +x% Poison damage, x-x Damage, x% chance Stun for x
seconds, x% slower Attack Speed for x seconds, +x offense

Udjat of Horrors: armor
Type	Level req	Armor	
Ess	12		4/8/12
Emb	32		7/14/21
Inc	44		10/20/30
Comp bonus: +x armor, +x% Cold resist, +x% Fire resist, +x% Lightning
resist, +x% Pierce resist, +x% Poison resist, +x defense, +x% armor

Valor of Achilles: weapon
Type	Level req	Damage			Attack speed
Ess	3		5/5/5			4/8/12%
Emb	25		15/15/15		5/10/15%
Inc	40		25/25/25		6/12/18%
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, +x Dex, x Reduce armor for x seconds , x-x Damage,
Stun, x% slower Attack Speed for x seconds, +x Str, +x Offense , +x% Attack
Speed, x% chance Stun for x seconds

Yeng-Lo-Wang's Bloodletting: weapon
Type	Level req	Bleed over 3s		Bleed damage
Ess	18		15/24/36		4/8/12%
Emb	36		21/42/63		6/12/18%
Inc	48		36/72/108		8/16/24%
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x Life leech for x seconds, x-x Fire, +x% Damage to
Demons, +x% Damage to Undead, x-x Damage, x% chance Stun for x seconds, +x%
slower Attack Speed for x seconds, +x offense

Zeus' Thunderbolt: weapon
Type	Level req	lightning Dam		Lightning dam
Ess	3		5/5/5%			1-7/2-14/3-21
Emb	25		10/10/10%		3-12/6-24/9-32
Inc	40		15/15/15%		6-15/12-30/18-45	
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, +x Cold Damage, x-x Lightning Damage, +x% Lightning,
x-x Damage, x% chance Stun for x seconds , x Energy Leech over x seconds, x%
slower Attack Speed for x seconds , +x Dex, +x offense, +x% Attack Speed

3.2.2 Monster charms
---------------------------
Type: N= normal, E= Epic, L=Legendary
Level = level required

Bat fangs: weapons
Type	Level		Life leech over 3s
N	3		3/6/9/12/15
E	25		6/12/18/24/30
L	40		9/18/27/36/45
Comp bonus: +x% Damage (Physical), x-x Fire Damage, +x% Damage to Demons, x-
x Damage (Physical), x Energy leech over x seconds, +x% slow Attack, +x
offense, +x% Attack Speed

Boar hide: armor
Type	Level		Armor
N	3		1/2/3/4/5
E	25		2/4/6/8/10
L	40		3/6/9/12/15
Comp Bonus: +x% Resist Cold, +x% Resist Pierce, +x defense ability , +x
armor

Demon Blood: rings & amulets
Type	Level		vitality dam resists%		Stun resist %
N	5		5/10/15/15/15			5/10/15/20/25
E	25		7/14/21/21/21			7/14/21/28/35
L	40		10/20/30/30/30			10/20/30/40/50
Comp Bonus: +x% Stun resistance, +x% Fire resist, +x% Elemental resists, +x%
Damage to Demons, +x% vitality damage resists, +x% energy leech resist, +x
offense

Diseased Plumage: armor
Type 	Level		Poison damage %
N	5		2/4/6/8/10
E	25		3/6/9/12/15
L	40		4/8/12/16/20
Comp Bonus: +x% Poison damage,+x armor, +x Dex, +x Offense, +x Defense

Hag Skin: armor
Type	Level		Pierce resist %		dexterity
N	12		6/6/6/6/6		2/4/6/8/10
E	32		8/8/8/8/8		3/6/9/12/15
L	40		10/10/10/10/10	4/8/12/16/20
Comp Bonus: +x armor, +x% Fire resist, +x Dex, +x% Pierce resist, +x
defense, +x% armor

Lupine claw: weapons
Type	Level		Pierce damage
N	12		2/4/6/8/10
E	32		4/8/12/16/20
L	44		6/12/18/24/30
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, +x Pierce Damage, +x% Damage to Demons, +x% Attack
Speed, x-x Damage, +x Energy Leech over x seconds, +x% Slow attack for x
seconds, +x offense, +x% Attack Speed

Mechanical Parts: torso armor
Type	Level		Total speed %		Strength
N	10		1/2/3/4/5		0/0/0/0/0
E	25		2/4/6/8/10		0/0/0/0/0
L	40		2/4/6/8/10		3/6/9/12/15
Comp Bonus: +x armor, +x Str, +x Dex, +x Offense , +x Defense, +x% armor

Peng Claw: weapons
Type	Level	Damage
N	18	1-4/2-8/3-12/4-16/5-20
E	36	3-7/6-14/9-21/12-28/15-35
L	48	5-9/10-18/15-27/20-36/25-45
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x-x Pierce Damage, +x% Attack Speed, +x Dex, -x
armor over x seconds, x-x Damage, x Energy leech over x seconds, x% slower
Attack Speed for x seconds , +x offense

Pristine Plumage: armor
Type	Level		poison resistance%
N	3		4/8/12/18/20
E	25		6/12/18/24/30
L	40		8/16/24/32/40
Comp bonus: +x Defense ability, +x armor, +x Dex, +x offense ability, +x%
Resist Poison

Raptor tooth: rings and amulets
Type	Level		damage %
N	18		2/4/6/8/10
E	36		3/6/9/12/15
L	48		4/8/12/16/20
Comp bonus: +x% Damage, x-x Pierce Damage, +x% Attack Speed, +x offense ,
+x Str, -x armor for x seconds, x-x Damage, x% slower Attack Speed for x
seconds, +x offense

Rigid Carapace: shield
Type	Level		pierce resistance %
N	12		4/8/12/16/20
E	32		6/12/18/24/30
L	44		8/16/24/32/40
Comp Bonus: +x% Energy leech resist, +x% Fire resist, +x% Stun Resist, +x%
Pierce resist , +x Health, +x Str, +x% armor, +x defense

Saberclaw: Saberlions: shield
Type	Level		Bleed over 3s
N	18		9/18/27/36/45
E	36		15/30/45/60/75
L	48		21/42/63/84/105
Comp Bonus: +x% Damage, x-x Pierce Damage, +x% Attack Speed, +x% Bleed, +x
offense, x-x Damage, x Energy leech over x seconds, x% slower Attack Speed
for x seconds

Spectral matter: rings & amulet
Type	Level		energy leech over 2s	energy leech resist %
N	5		6/12/18/24/36		10/10/10/10/10
E	25		10/20/30/40/50		15/15/15/15/15
L	40		16/32/48/64/80		20/20/20/20/20
Comp Bonus: +x% Energy drain, +x Int, +x% Damage to Undead, +x Energy, x
Energy leech over x seconds

Turtle shell: shields
Type	Level		Shield block %	shield recovery time %
N	3		1/2/3/4/5	-5/-5/-5/-5/-5
E	25		2/4/6/8/10	-10/-10/-10/-10/-10
L	40		3/6/9/12/15	-15/-15/-15/-15/-15
Comp Bonus: +x% Pierce resist, +x Health, +x Str, +x% armor, +x defense , +x
Str

Venom sacs: weapons
Type	Level		Poison over 5s
N	8		6/12/18/24/30
E	25		14/28/42/56/70
L	40		23/45/68/90/113
Comp Bonus: +Offense , x% chance Stun for x seconds, -x Reduce reduced armor
for x seconds, x Poison Damage for x seconds, -x% slower Attack Speed for x
second, +x% Poison

Vile Ichor: rings & amulets
Type	Level		Vitality		vitality
			Damage %		damage
N	12		2/4/6/8/10		5/5/5/5/5
E	32		3/6/9/12/15		7/7/7/7/7
L	44		4/8/12/16/20		9/9/9/9/9
Comp Bonus: +x offense, x% Stun for x seconds , +x reduce armor for x
seconds, +x Poison over x seconds, +x% slower attack for x seconds

Viny growth: armor
Type	Level		health regen %
N	18		10/20/30/40/50
E	36		15/30/45/60/75
L	48		20/40/60/80/100
Comp Bonus: +x armor, +x health, +x% health regen, +x% Pierce resist , +x
defense, +x% armor

Yeti Fur: armor
Type	Level		Cold damage %		Cold resist %
N	18		5/5/5/5/5		4/8/12/16/20
E	36		5/5/5/5/5		6/12/18/24/30
L	48		5/5/5/5/5		8/16/24/32/40
Comp Bonus: +x armor, +x% Resist Cold, +x Str, +x defense , +x% armor, +x
health

3.3 Shrines
------------

Shrines have different properties are depending where your are.

1: Between the start and Megara which I will call Greece1
2: After megara to the end of Greece which I will call Greece 2
3: Egypt
4: Orient
5: Typhon

The following are shrines which have the same properties throughout the
game, regardless of location or level of difficulty.

Battle Shrine:
+100% physical damage;
+75% elemental damage;
+60% attack speed;
+5% movement speed.
Duration: 60 seconds

Shrine of Healing
instantly refills health

Regeneration shrine
regenerates health/energy at 7% per second (8 meter radius).
Duration = 40 sec

Shrine of Experience
increases experience gained by 50%.
Duration: 60 sec

Energizing Shrine
increases energy regeneration rate by 800%

The following are shrines that are dependant on location and level of
difficulty:

Frostbite:
Each hit xx cold/slowing per second, for 6 seconds.
Total speed slowing = 75%.
Duration = 60 sec.

Thorns:
Xx bleeding damage per second, for 3 seconds.
Duration = 60 sec

Mastery:
Xx bonus to all skills.
Energy cost reduction = 25%.
Duration = 60 sec

The following are the "xx" numbers for the above shrines
Normal:
Shrine Type	Greece1	Greece2	Egypt		Orient	Typhon
Frostbite	8	15	20		25	6
Thorns 		11	17	24		32	13
Mastery		4	4	6		6	n/a

Epic:
Shrine Type	Greece1/2	Egypt		Orient		Typhon
Frostbite	33		40		45		17
Thorns	 	47		53		67		35
Mastery		8		8		8		n/a

Legendary:
Shrine Type	Greece1/2	Egypt		Orient		Typhon
Frostbite	50		55		60		31
Thorns 		86		93		106		65
Mastery		10		10		10		n/a


4. Monsters
---------------

Monsters in TQ, come in three forms.
Normal spawned creatures, those you see running around all over the place.
You can ignore these if you wish.
Special creatures. Special creatures that have a name, and not really part
of the quest. They tend to be unique and have special powers e.g.
Polyphemus. You can ignore these if you wish but they normally have high XP
when killed.
Special bosses and minions. These are special unique characters that have
special names and are part of a quest or side quest. If you do not kill
these, you will cannot proceed with main quest or complete a side quest.

Normal monsters, have a type, e.g. Beast, Undead, etc which determines their
type. In addition to the type you will have the creature species, e.g.
Satyr, Centaur. Each species will have a class that determines its mode of
attack (some creatures do not have a class, such as carrion crows). Finally
some have a skill level e.g. Elite, Veteran etc.
Examples:
	Beastman: Dark Satyr - shaman
	Beastman: Dark Satyr - Soldier
	Beastman: Dark Satyr - Veteran peltast

Spawn monsters are character level related as well as setting e.g. Greece,
Egypt, Orient, so sometimes it is more difficult and sometimes not. As some
monsters are random, I will describe some monsters roughly in the order you
will meet them. You may encounter them on your journey, or you may not.
Also, in regards to health and attack, both are described relative to the
approximate level you met them, e.g. ratmen have can do some damage to a low
level character, but by the time you met them you damage and defense should
make them easy.

Types are as follows:
	Beasts: General wild creatures; birds, hyenas, boars etc.
	Beastmen: Half man half beats; satyrs, centaurs, ratmen etc.
	Construct: These are monsters made from inorganic matter e.g.
Automatoi, statues.
	Demons: Creatures of the underworld e.g. sprites, orthus etc.
	Devices: These are traps, standards etc.
	Insectoid: Insect type creatures e.g. spiders, mantids, scorpions etc.
	Magical: Mythical characters (and unclassed) monsters e.g. Cyclops
	Plant: Plant creatures e.g. Quill Vines, bog dwellers etc.
	Undead: Creatures of the spirit realm e.g. skeletons, Liches, wraiths,
zombies etc.

You may find items which allow you to do special damage to specific types of
monsters (e.g. +30% damage to undead), or skills which do the same e.g.
Hunting ¡V Call of the Hunt which give +33% damage to beasts and beastmen.

4.1 A troubled village
---------------------------
Carrion crows: Beasts : Fast, not much damage but once in a group they can
give you a good pecking. Low HP makes them easy.

Ravenous boars: Beasts :Don't be fool by their appearance, these are fast
mothers, and can surround you quickly. They have average damage but once
they surround you, your health goes down quickly. They also have a good
amount of health. Sometimes drop "boar hide" for your armor enhancements.

Satyrs: Beastmen : Average speed; generally low health, and low speed.
Damage is low but spell casters can be a pain. Ravagers have higher health
but should not pose a bit problem.

4.2 Spartans at war
------------------------

Awakened dead: Undead : They appear from the ground. These are pretty fast
but have low health, but the spell casters can be a problem, having damaging
attacks and higher health. Watch out for the frost Liches; some ice
protection would be nice. Captains can have damaging attacks. Note: I have
read somewhere skeletons are immune to pierce damage.

Brush Harpies: Beasts : Just a larger version of a crow with more health.
Should not be a major problem, as at most only two or three.

Cave Bats: Beasts : Just like carrion crows, but you find them in caves.
They may also drop Bat Fang charms.

Centaurs: Beastmen :These are fast and can deal some damage. However their
damage is average as well as their health. But hard to outrun, making range
attacks quite hard. Elders have more health and have some warfare skills.

Eurynomus: Demon : These are like little goblins. They have average speed,
and low health making them easy targets.

Festering zombies: Undead : These are slow, with average health. Easy to
pick of at range because they are so slow, even the captains are pretty
easy. Releases poison gas when killed.

Plague birds: Beasts :Just like crows but leave a trail of poison when move
as well as release poison when killed.

Zombies: Undead : These are slow undead monsters, which average health but a
high damage. Because they are slow, they should not be a big problem.

4.3 The words of the Oracle
----------------------------------

Arachnos: Insectoids : Spiders, large and small. Some are average speed,
like the drones, and the little ones are quite slow. They all have
relatively low health, even spell casters so they can be easily killed.
Their armor is great for an early warrior too. Sometimes drop "venom sacs"
for your weapons enhancements.

Arachnos Minions: Insectoids : These as small spiders that usually accompany
an Arachnos. They should not pose much of a problem.

Baleful Arachnos: Insectoids : These are just bigger version of Arachnos,
with higher health, and more damage. Magenta in color.

Cavern crawlers: Insectoids : Just like Arachnos minions, they are pretty
easy to kill, but has a special magic attack (red mist, maybe life leech, or
fire damage)

Coastal Icthians: beastmen : These lizards are fairly fast, and can deal
some damage. The spell casters are a real pain. They have higher health and
seem to be able to heal, making killing them quite a long process.

Dark Satyrs: Beastmen : Upgraded satyrs and just as easy to kill.

Exhumed dead: Undead : Upgraded version of Awakened dead.

Fen Icthians: Beastmen : These are the swamp equivalent of the coastal
Icthians.

Highland Centaur: Beastmen : Just an upgraded centaur, can be just as
deadly, so be careful around these.

Maenads: Beastmen : fast but very low health (you should have good damage by
the time you met them). Average damage making them quite easy, contrary to
mythology.

Orbed Weaver: Insectoid : These look like large black widows (except they
are not black). They have a ranged attack which shoots sticky web, but apart
from that they are pretty harmless.

Orthus : Demon : These are large demon like dogs and are pretty fast, with
high damage and average to high health. Their speed makes them quite
dangerous, and also has a flame surge attack. They are nasty when a few
surround you, so try to kill them individually. If you are a melee
character, hit them a few times, and move off, as they will most likely use
their flames surge attack, and go back and hit them again, repeat.

Rock Harpies: Beasts : Upgraded Brush harpies, can be a bother to get rid
of, but not too bad.

Ratmen: Beastmen : They are fast, but apart from that nothing special. They
are hard to outrun so they may pose some problems for ranged attacks. Low
health, and attack makes them easy.

Salt spitters: Beasts : Slow but they have high armor and health, so even
though they move a snails pace, you are in trouble if you get surround by a
few of them. Sometimes drop "turtle shells" for your shield enhancements.

Wraiths: Undead : They appear from the ground/sea. Slow, with slow speed,
but can deal some damage. Should be picked off at range. Melee fighters
should handle one or two at a time.

	
4.4 The source of the monsters
--------------------------------------

Boarmen: Beastmen : These are bad; I met one or two first in the monster
encampment and then four in the Athens battlegrounds. They are big and fast,
and have high damage and health, as well as a lightning attack that saps
your health. They should be easy one on one, but I encountered them with a
group of other fast monsters. I used melee that dealt with them quicker but
used a lot of potions in the process.

Catacomb crawlers: Insectoids : Upgraded cavern crawlers.

Crag Harpies: Beasts :The upgraded brush harpy.

Deadly Orbed Weaver: Insectoids : Same as the orbed weavers, just upgraded.
I think these slow you down when you walk over them.

Desecrated dead : Undead : Upgraded skeletons. Again nothing special, but
more health, and seem to have more magical resistances.

Dusky boars: Beasts : Upgraded Ravenous boars.

Gorgons: Beastmen : These have average attacks, although again magic users
cause problems if your resistances are low. They are slow so they should not
be any problem. The magic users have quite high health and tend to stay
behind. I used my bow that had about 70 damage over 6 sec, shot them and ran
off, and let the poison do its work. After about three shots they died from
the poison. This is a slow method but it is effective. The bow works great
with Centaur elders as well, but you have to keep running with centaurs.

Limos: Demon : These are fast , life leeching creatures, with relatively
high health. This is one monster which I find difficult both as melee
because of life leech, and as range because of the speed.

Malevolent Arachnos: Insectoids : These are just bigger version of Arachnos,
with higher health, and more damage. Grren in color.

Mountain Satyrs: Beastmen : Next upgraded satyrs and just as easy to kill.

Mud spitters: Beasts : An upgraded version of the salt spitter turtles, just
more health.

Scrawny Ratmen: Beastmen: I think just a tougher version of the normal
ratmen.

4.5 The Order of Prometheus
------------------------------------

Just a few new monsters to add to the Greek setting.

Automatoi: Theses are in sense robots, and they are slow. The do average
damage, but have high armor and health. I had a bow with burn and poison
damage, which seemed effective. Because they are slow, you can easily pick
them off. They seem to be susceptible to lightning attacks.

Minotaur: These have high health, and pretty big damage, but average speed
(they have a charge skill which makes them quick). You can get surrounded by
them easily so best to kill them one by one.

Orbed Brood mother: These are orbed weavers and pretty similar. I do not
know if they have any special attacks because they are easy to kill.

4.6 The Blindness of the Gods
--------------------------------------

Egypt and a whole new set of monsters.

Bone scarab : Insectoid : These are like small beetles, and are quite fast,
but have low damage and low health. They can be a problem with later
difficulties, because of their numbers (small so more can surround you).

Colossal Scorpion : Insectiods : These are big scorpions, they have higher
health, and because of their size, they are still slow, and you can get a
few ranged shots before it gets close.

Crypt worms : These are maggot like creatures, and there are two types, a
smaller type and a large type. The large type have a bite which can do some
damage, but are slow, and no ranged attack. The small ones are opposite,
they have a ranged poison attack, which can be deadly, and limited short
range attack.

Dark Obelisk : Device : This is the only "spawning" object you will mean.
They are like a small pillar and have the power to spawn hideous plasma,
which are a pain. If you do not destroy these, monsters will keep spawning.
Once the obelisk is destroyed all monsters created by the Obelisk will be
destroyed as well. It is best to destroy the obelisk rather than destroy the
hideous plasma. However in later difficulties, this may be difficult.

Desert crones : Beasts : These are just like harpies of the desert. There is
another variant the sandwing, but I cannot really tell the difference
between the two.

Desert Hag : another sandwing/desert crone type. Just the same, I cannot
tell the difference.

Desert witch : Beasts : Just like the desert crone, but with magical powers.
Usually one in the midst of a few desert crones and sandwings.

Desiccated dead : undead : These are the next type of undead. They look like
mummies. They are slow, and do not cause as much problems are skeletons.

Diseased vultures: Beasts : the carrion crow of the desert.

Dune raiders : Demons : They are fast monsters, and have mounted and trapper
types which makes them dangerous. Their health is average, but the common
"soldier" type has a funny spin attack which is fast and can do some damage.

Embalmed dead : Undead : Another type of Dessicated dead, again slow, and
looks like a mummy. Should not be a problem.

Gruesome bone scarab : Insectoid : These are big beetles and can do a bit of
damage. But they usually appear as a single one, in midst of groups of the
smaller less deadly bone scarab beetles.

Hideous plasma : undead : These are glowing skeletons spawned by Dark
Obelisks. They have high health and fast. They have physical and magical
attacks and can be a big problem. It is best to ignore these and concentrate
on the dark obelisk, as destroying the Obelisk will destroy all the hideous
plasma it spawned. However in harder difficulties, you can either avoid it,
or lure the hideous plasma away, destroy it, and run back for a few more
shots at the obelisk. Repeat until the Obelisk is destroyed.

Hyena beasts : Beasts : They are the boars of the desert. They are fast and
have a bite attack that can do some high damage.

Jackalman : Beastmen : Just like ratmen, pretty fast but easy to kill off.

Poisonous Scorpions : Insectoids : These ware scorpions with a melee poison
attack. They only have average health and average speed.

Reptilians: Beastmen : These are big lizards; they are not very fast, but
some Centurions or above have high health and big attacks. Magic, poison,
burn attacks seem to work well. Melee is possible but they have high
defense, and a pretty strong attack. Magic users are again a pain. The huge
Centurions drop armor with high armors suitable for none fighter characters
(require high intelligence).

Sandwings : Beasts : Equivalent to the lower level harpies. They have a
funny 360 degree vertical flip attack which can do some high damage.

Salivating Hyena Beast: Beast : I cannot confirm this type, but it seems to
be just a normal Hyena beast. I just saw it in the midst of some dune
raiders and Hyena beasts.

Shade : undead : These are like ghosts, or spirits, they are quite fast and
can surround you very quickly. They also have magic user types, and when
mixed together can be a big problem. However on the positive side, they have
low health so they can be easily killed.

Shadow Stalkers: Demons : Fast, with fast attack, but average health. The
attacks can do quite some damage, and also can enter "shadow" state with
cannot be attacked (but they cannot attack you neither). They are very
dangerous because of high damage and speed.

Stygian Scorpions : Insectoid : These have low health, but have a poison
attack, some larger scorpions have medium to high health.

Tomb Guardian ¡V Hound of Annubis : Undead : Mummified dogs/jackels. They are
just like hyenas but of the undead class, so probably has some resistances
normal beasts do not have. Again these can be quite fast and have high
damage so be careful.

Tomb rot: Magical : These are magical creatures, and are pretty slow. They
have medium health and a poison ranged attack, which is quite fast. Not too
difficult.


4.7 The Invocation
------------------------

Ant Lions: These look like giant lice. Really big and quite fast, average
health but do massive damage. However they only operate within a small area,
which makes killing them easier, and no ranged attacks.

Blood wing : Beast : Just like harpies or desert crones etc. They can be
fast and pretty nasty if you are surrounded.

Fire beetles: Insectoids :There are lots of these and they have quite high
defense and health (especially the bigger ones). They are quite fast (not
very), and have melee and ranged fire attacks. However they should not be
difficult.

Magma beetles : Insectoids : These are big beetles, and quite fast. They
have a flame surge attack which can be dodged quite easily. I found these
actually easier than the smaller fire beetles, although they should be
bigger and harder. This is because they only spawn singly on a group of fire
beetles and lack a proper long range attack.

Revolting Zombie : undead : The upgraded zombie, again poisonous gas when
killed. They are very slow, but best to clear them out as their attack
damage is quite high.

Sandwraiths : Demons : These are strange wraiths which come out of the sand.
They seem to be bound by a small area, and will not go very far from where
they spawned. They have ranged magic attack and close range melee attack.
They are fast, but should be easy to kill, but be careful when surrounded.

Scorpus : Insectoids : two legged scorpions? These are quite fast and have
high damage. However they have average health and susceptible to all forms
of damage so you should be able to take them out easily. However because if
you get surrounded or your health will be quickly reduced by three or four
of these.

4.8 A Telkein in Egypt
-----------------------------

Gilded Dead : undead : The next upgrade in skeletons. Just general
skeletons, fast and archers are a real pain. Nothing new.

Sandstone Guardian : Construct : You met these before in the pyramid of
Khufu. This time they are the smaller non boss version. Again due to their
slow speed, you should not have problems.

Scorpus Manslayer: Insectoids : You may have met these earlier. These are
larger scorpus, just as fast and a lot more damage. These are quite nasty,
probably one of the nasty ones at this level, kill them first, before they
kill you.


4.9 The Sickle of Kronos
-------------------------------

Another set of whole new monsters.

Chintinous Mantids: Insectoids : These bugs are bad. They are fast and can
deliver high damage. They are so fast that you will be surrounded very
quickly. The only advantage is that they only have average health and lower
resistances.

Creeping slime : Magical : This is an upgraded tomb rot. The slug like
monsters that have at slow ranged attack. Again, theses should not pose any
difficulty.

Fire sprites: Demons : fast little creatures with fire based attacks, and
seems to have high resistances. They have low health, and low physical
resiatnce which makes them easier for melee characters, so easy one shot
kills.

Jungle creep: Plant : Slow but high health. Shoots poison. They are usually
acommanied by Quill Vines, which means that you have to kill the vines first
whilst avoid it's poison attack.

Quill vines: Plant : Plants which are like archers. They do not move but
shoots at a very fast rate so they can do quite some damage. Take them down
first or have high pierce resistance.

Tidal Icthians : beastmen : sames as the greek counterpart, except different
graphics and upgraded stats. There is a new Lord of the Deep class which has
some kind of water attack, and high health.

Tropical spiders: Insectoids : Same as the spiders earlier but with higher
damage and different graphics.

Tropical widows: Insectoids : Same as the orb weavers earlier but with
higher damage and different graphics.

4.10 Hunt for the Sickle
------------------------------

Bog Dweller : Plant : These are like a bunch of twigs. Compared with other
plants you will meet. These are quite easy.

Corpulent Djinns: Demons : Fast with magic attacks and welds double weapon.
Low health makes them easy but they can do some damage. They can also cast
squall which can be problems for bow users. These are green as opposed to
Blue for the normal Djinns, and I think has a Squall attack.

Djinns: Demons : Fast with magic attacks and welds double weapon. Low health
makes them easy but they can do some damage. They can also cast squall which
can be problems for bow users.

Deadwater Icthians : beastmen : this must be the next upgrade from Tidal
Ichitians, as they appear later in the games. Just the same, and again watch
out for the water attacks.

Dragonians: Beastmen : These are beast men of the dragon kind and not to be
confused with the raptors. They come in soldiers, mages, archers etc. They
are big and fast and have high health. They are deadly, and can swarm you
quickly and kill you in seconds. However, most forms of attack can kill
them.

Elder Dragonians: Beastmen : These are beast men of the dragon kind and not
to be confused with the raptors. The Elders are upgraded Dragonians, which
makes them even more deadly. I have seem groups of two or three of theses.

Gibbering Pengs: Beasts : This is a larger version of the ice peng, and more
similar to sandwings. They are fast, but only dangerous when you are
surrounded.

Hulking Yeti: Beast : This must be the higher health version of the yeti. A
slightly different graphics, but just the same slowness and attack.

Jungle Raptors: Dinosaurs, small and large version. They are fast and do a
lot of damage, but have pretty low health, so not a big problem. These
appear in the Jungle areas of the orient. Note: These are not the dragonians
which are more deadly.

Ice Pengs: Beasts : The replacement for the winged creatures. These
creatures are fast and high attack, but generally pretty easy to kill.

Ice Raptors: Dinosaurs, small and large version. They are fast and do a lot
of damage, but have pretty low health, so not a big problem.

Ice Sprite: Demons : cold version of the fire sprite. Watch out they can be
fast.

Neanderthal: Beastmen : The general grunts. All types, from archers,
soldiers and mages. They have quite a lot of health, and can do a lot of
damage. They are quite slow so you can out run them.

Razor Pengs: Beasts : These are a bigger version of the Gibbering Pengs. I
would expect them to have a higher health and damage, but because they are
not difficult to kill, it does not really matter.

Rime Sprite: Demons : These are like ice sprites and usually one or two of
these are accompanied by a lot of Ice sprites. The graphics are different,
and they are slightly bigger than Ice sprites, but apart from that, there
seems to be no difference.

Sabrelions: Beasts : Like the saber-toothed tiger, and pets of the
Neanderthals. These are fast and their bites are quite dangerous. Luckily
their health is quite low.

Tigermen : Beastmen : These come in a few forms, from the standard soldier,
to sorcerors, pack leaders, trappers. The normal soldiers are OK, but the
special types have high damage and high health, which makes them hard to
kill. They are fast which makes things worse.

Tropical Archnos : Insectoids :sames as the greek counterpart, except
different graphics and upgraded stats.

Yerren: Beastmen : These are upgraded Neanderthals. In other words every
thing the same except they are fast. They have average health but a lot of
damage. They can swarm you and kill you. This makes them really deadly.

Yeti: Beast : These are well¡K.Yeti. Big slow, but have a lot of health and
hit damage, so don't get too close. However they are so slow you should be
able to dodge their attacks.


4.11 Journey to the Jade Palace
---------------------------------------

Ancient Dragonians: Beastmen : These are beast men of the dragon kind and
not to be confused with the raptors. The Ancient are probably the ones with
the most health and damage. I think there is just one or two of these in a
group of Dragonians. Like all Dragonians they are deadly.

Mantid Hivelords: Insectoids : Mantid Hivelords are a upgraded mantid and
just as deadly. They are a big bigger than normal mantids, and have a
different color. You will meet one of these in a group of mantids.

Terra Cotta warriors: construct : Slow constructs, with average to high
health. They can do a lot of damage, but because they are not very fast,
they should not be a problem.

4.12 Under Wusao Mountain
------------------------------------

Abyssal Liche: Undead : Upgraded undead mages. Has powerful ranged magical
attacks, but apart from that they are quite easy.

Brimstone Orthus: Demon : Just an upgraded Orthus but just as deadly.

Elder Minotaur (lord): Beastmen :Upgraded Minotaurs, they are nasty; they
are fast and have pretty good health, and high damage. They are bad.

Elder Cyclops: Magical : They have high damage, and magic attacks and high
health. However they are very slow. They take some time to kill but should
be easy.

Grotesk Zombies : Undead : Upgraded zombie. Pretty easy, again poison gas
when killed.

Master work Automatoi : Construct : Upgraded automatoi. Just as slow, and
easy to kill, as any ranged attack will be able to pick them out.

Sepulchal wyrm: Demon : These look like small fire dragons, and have a fire
attack, they are fast, but their main fire attack is slow, so you should be
able to avoid them.

==========================================================================
5. Skills and skill trees
==========================================================================

5.1 Character class table
------------------------------

The following table shows the different classes possible and also the
maximum stats from the mastery tiers (assume you have invested a full 32
skill points into your tiers). Since your own attribute points are not
included in the stats, these figures will give a rough guideline to your
stats for each class.

NOTE: The following has the base stats included (stats when you first create
the character)

					Health	Energy	Str	Int	Dex
Assassin:	Warfare + Rogue		1980	300	170	50	189
Avenger:	Earth + Hunting		1644	460	106	140	130
Battlemage:	Earth + Warfare		1756	460	114	140	114
Bone Charmer:	Spirit + Hunting	1644	460	106	146	178
Brigand:	Hunting + Rogue		1868	300	162	50	205
Champion:	Warfare + Nature	1868	620	114	130	162
Conjurer:	Earth + Spirit		1420	620	50	236	98
Conquerer:	Warfare + Defense	2316	300	162	50	178
Corsair:	Defense + Rogue		2204	300	154	50	189
Defender:	Defense mastery only	1420	300	98	50	114
Druid:		Storm + Nature		1644	940	50	226	130
Elementalist:	Storm + Earth		1532	780	50	236	82
Guardian:	Defense + Nature	2092	620	98	230	162
Hunter:		Hunting mastery only	1084	300	106	50	130
Illusionist:	Nature + Rogue		1756	620	106	130	173
Juggernaught:	Earth + Defense		1980	460	98	140	114
Magician:	Earth + Rogue		1644	460	106	140	125
Oracle:		Storm + Spirit		1532	780	50	242	130
Paladin:	Storm + Defense		2092	620	98	146	146
Pyromancer:	Earth mastery only	860	460	50	140	50
Ranger:		Nature + Hunting	1756	620	156	130	178
Rogue:		Rogue mastery only	1084	300	106	50	125
Sage:		Storm + Hunting		1756	620	106	146	172
Spellbinder:	Spirit + Defense	1980	460	98	146	162
Spellbreaker:	Warfare + Spirit	1756	460	114	146	162
SoothSayer:	Spirit + Nature		1532	780	50	226	146
Sorcerer:	Storm + Rogue		1756	620	106	146	157
Slayer:		Warfare + Hunting	1980	300	170	50	194
Stormcaller:	Storm mastery only	972	620	50	146	82
Summoner:	Earth + Nature		1532	780	50	220	98
Thane:		Storm + Warfare		1868	620	114	146	146
Theurgist:	Spirit mastery only	860	460	50	146	98
Wanderer:	Nature mastery only	972	620	50	130	98
Warden:		Defense + Hunting	2204	300	154	50	194
Warlock:	Spirit + Rogue		1644	460	106	146	173
Warrior:	Warfare mastery only	1196	300	114	50	114

5.2 Skills
------------

As well as defining your class, TQ also has skills that allow you to further
refine your character. For example, a warrior, can be a single weapon killer
with a shield or dual weapon killing machine. It is important not to spread
your skill points on all skills in your class but to concentrate on specific
skills that will increase your damage or increase your defense.

There are eight different masteries in TQ, and each character can choose
only one of two of the eight to develop his/her character. Each mastery
contains 20 skills to choose from 6 tiers. Each tier must be unlocked by
allocating the appropriate about of skill points. If the tier has not been
unlocked then the skills cannot be chosen, regardless of the level of the
character.

Skills have active or passive, active skills require manually using the
skills, for example assigning it to an attack, and only used when you
"click". Passive skills are put into effect when to allocate a skill point
e.g. increases your defense. I will not go into too much detail on this as
the manual states clearly which the skill type is.

The unlocking of tiers is done by allocation a skill point to a skill but on
the tier bar. Each point put into a tier will also have attribute bonuses.
The following will list the benefits of each mastery.

The comments on each skill, are my own personal opinions whilst playing. It
is a proven fact that every skill can be very useful, and how powerful you
character is does not solely depend on the skills, and points allocated to
them alone. It will depend on the equipment, the character attributes, the
player style and relic/charms enhancements.


5.3 Mastery bonuses
--------------------------

Each skill point allocated to a tier also gives attribute bonuses. The
amount for each mastery is different and varies depending on the mastery and
the level. The value in brackets shows the maximum value after putting 32
skill points into the mastery tier.

I should also note that although each skill has a maximum level e.g.
Defensive concussive blow has six levels; you can actually have more than
this limit. The next skill level after the maximum cannot be obtained
through adding skill points, they can only be increase by magic items e.g.
+1 all skills (which cause it to be 7). And shrine of mastery which can add
a massive 8 skill levels to each skill with at least one point in it. I have
only listed the extra skill level values of the ones I have come across, but
not the +8 from shrines because it does not last long enough for me to note
down the figures.

Defense Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity	(64)
	Health	(1120)
	Strength	(48)

Level	Str	Dex	Health
1 	+1	+2	+35
2 	+2	+2	+35
3 	+1	+2	+35
4 	+2	+2	+35
5 	+1	+2	+35
6 	+2	+2	+35
7 	+1	+2	+35
8 	+2	+2	+35
9 	+1	+2	+35
10 	+2	+2	+35
11 	+1	+2	+35
12 	+2	+2	+35
13 	+1	+2	+35
14 	+2	+2	+35
15 	+1	+2	+35
16 	+2	+2	+35
17 	+1	+2	+35
18 	+2	+2	+35
19 	+1	+2	+35
20 	+2	+2	+35
21 	+1	+2	+35
22 	+2	+2	+35
23 	+1	+2	+35
24 	+2	+2	+35
25 	+1	+2	+35
26 	+2	+2	+35
27 	+1	+2	+35
28 	+2	+2	+35
29 	+1	+2	+35
30 	+2	+2	+35
31 	+1	+2	+35
32 	+2	+2	+35


Earth Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Energy		(160)
	Health		(560)
	Intelligence	(90)

Level	Int	Health		Energy
1 	+3	+18		+5
2 	+3	+17		+5
3 	+3	+18		+5
4 	+3	+17		+5
5 	+3	+18		+5
6 	+3	+17		+5
7 	+3	+18		+5
8 	+3	+17		+5
9 	+3	+18		+5
10 	+3	+17		+5
11 	+3	+18		+5
12 	+3	+17		+5
13 	+3	+18		+5
14 	+3	+17		+5
15 	+3	+18		+5
16 	+3	+17		+5
17 	+3	+18		+5
18 	+3	+17		+5
19 	+3	+18		+5
20 	+3	+17		+5
21 	+3	+18		+5
22 	+3	+17		+5
23 	+3	+18		+5
24 	+3	+17		+5
25 	+3	+18		+5
26 	+3	+17		+5
27 	+3	+18		+5
28 	+3	+17		+5
29 	+3	+18		+5
30 	+3	+17		+5
31 	0	+18		+5
32 	0	+17		+5

Hunting Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity	(80)
	Health	(784)
	Strength	(56)

Level	Str	Dex	Health
1 	+2	+2	+24
2 	+1	+3	+25
3 	+2	+2	+24
4 	+2	+3	+25
5 	+2	+2	+24
6 	+1	+3	+25
7 	+2	+2	+24
8 	+2	+3	+25
9 	+2	+2	+24
10 	+1	+3	+25
11 	+2	+2	+24
12 	+2	+3	+25
13 	+2	+2	+24
14 	+1	+3	+25
15 	+2	+2	+24
16 	+2	+3	+25
17 	+2	+2	+24
18 	+1	+3	+25
19 	+2	+2	+24
20 	+2	+3	+25
21 	+2	+2	+24
22 	+1	+3	+25
23 	+2	+2	+24
24 	+2	+3	+25
25 	+2	+2	+24
26 	+1	+3	+25
27 	+2	+2	+24
28 	+2	+3	+25
29 	+2	+2	+24
30 	+1	+3	+25
31 	+2	+2	+24
32 	+2	+3	+25

Nature Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity		(48)
	Energy		(320)
	Health		(672)
	Intelligence	(80)

Level	Int	Dex	Health		Energy
1 	+2	+1	+21		+10
2 	+3	+2	+21		+10
3 	+2	+1	+21		+10
4 	+3	+2	+21		+10
5 	+2	+1	+21		+10
6 	+3	+2	+21		+10
7 	+2	+1	+21		+10
8 	+3	+2	+21		+10
9 	+2	+1	+21		+10
10 	+3	+2	+21		+10
11 	+2	+1	+21		+10
12 	+3	+2	+21		+10
13 	+2	+1	+21		+10
14 	+3	+2	+21		+10
15 	+2	+1	+21		+10
16 	+3	+2	+21		+10
17 	+2	+1	+21		+10
18 	+3	+2	+21		+10
19 	+2	+1	+21		+10
20 	+3	+2	+21		+10
21 	+2	+1	+21		+10
22 	+3	+2	+21		+10
23 	+2	+1	+21		+10
24 	+3	+2	+21		+10
25 	+2	+1	+21		+10
26 	+3	+2	+21		+10
27 	+2	+1	+21		+10
28 	+3	+2	+21		+10
29 	+2	+1	+21		+10
30 	+3	+2	+21		+10
31 	+2	+1	+21		+10
32 	+3	+2	+21		+10


Rogue Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity	(75)
	Health	(784)
	Strength	(56)

Level	Str	Dex	Health
1 	+2	+2	+24
2 	+1	+3	+25
3 	+2	+2	+24
4 	+2	+3	+25
5 	+2	+2	+24
6 	+1	+3	+25
7 	+2	+2	+24
8 	+2	+3	+25
9 	+2	+2	+24
10 	+1	+3	+25
11 	+2	+2	+24
12 	+2	+3	+25
13 	+2	+2	+24
14 	+1	+3	+25
15 	+2	+2	+24
16 	+2	+3	+25
17 	+2	+2	+24
18 	+1	+3	+25
19 	+2	+2	+24
20 	+2	+3	+25
21 	+2	+2	+24
22 	+1	+3	+25
23 	+2	+2	+24
24 	+2	+3	+25
25 	+2	+2	+24
26 	+1	+3	+25
27 	+2	+2	+24
28 	+2	+3	+25
29 	+2	+2	+24
30 	+1	+3	+25
31 	+2	0	+24
32 	+2	0	+25

Spirit Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity	(48)
	Energy	(160)
	Health	(560)
	Intelligence	(96)

Level	Int	Dex	Health		Energy
1 	+3	+1	+17		+5
2 	+3	+2	+18		+5
3 	+3	+1	+17		+5
4 	+3	+2	+18		+5
5 	+3	+1	+17		+5
6 	+3	+2	+18		+5
7 	+3	+1	+17		+5
8 	+3	+2	+18		+5
9 	+3	+1	+17		+5
10 	+3	+2	+18		+5
11 	+3	+1	+17		+5
12 	+3	+2	+18		+5
13 	+3	+1	+17		+5
14 	+3	+2	+18		+5
15 	+3	+1	+17		+5
16 	+3	+2	+18		+5
17 	+3	+1	+17		+5
18 	+3	+2	+18		+5
19 	+3	+1	+17		+5
20 	+3	+2	+18		+5
21 	+3	+1	+17		+5
22 	+3	+2	+18		+5
23 	+3	+1	+17		+5
24 	+3	+2	+18		+5
25 	+3	+1	+17		+5
26 	+3	+2	+18		+5
27 	+3	+1	+17		+5
28 	+3	+2	+18		+5
29 	+3	+1	+17		+5
30 	+3	+2	+18		+5
31 	+3	+1	+17		+5
32 	+3	+2	+18		+5


Storm Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity		(32)
	Energy		(320)
	Health		(672)
	Intelligence	(96)

Level	Int	Dex	Health		Energy
1 	+3	+1	+21		+10
2 	+3	+1	+21		+10
3 	+3	+1	+21		+10
4 	+3	+1	+21		+10
5 	+3	+1	+21		+10
6 	+3	+1	+21		+10
7 	+3	+1	+21		+10
8 	+3	+1	+21		+10
9 	+3	+1	+21		+10
10 	+3	+1	+21		+10
11 	+3	+1	+21		+10
12 	+3	+1	+21		+10
13 	+3	+1	+21		+10
14 	+3	+1	+21		+10
15 	+3	+1	+21		+10
16 	+3	+1	+21		+10
17 	+3	+1	+21		+10
18 	+3	+1	+21		+10
19 	+3	+1	+21		+10
20 	+3	+1	+21		+10
21 	+3	+1	+21		+10
22 	+3	+1	+21		+10
23 	+3	+1	+21		+10
24 	+3	+1	+21		+10
25 	+3	+1	+21		+10
26 	+3	+1	+21		+10
27 	+3	+1	+21		+10
28 	+3	+1	+21		+10
29 	+3	+1	+21		+10
30 	+3	+1	+21		+10
31 	+3	+1	+21		+10
32 	+3	+1	+21		+10

Warfare Mastery Skill Bonuses
	Dexterity	(64)
	Health	(896)
	Strength	(64)

Level	str	Dex	Health
1 	+2	+2	+28
2 	+2	+2	+28
3 	+2	+2	+28
4 	+2	+2	+28
5 	+2	+2	+28
6 	+2	+2	+28
7 	+2	+2	+28
8 	+2	+2	+28
9 	+2	+2	+28
10 	+2	+2	+28
11 	+2	+2	+28
12 	+2	+2	+28
13 	+2	+2	+28
14 	+2	+2	+28
15 	+2	+2	+28
16 	+2	+2	+28
17 	+2	+2	+28
18 	+2	+2	+28
19 	+2	+2	+28
20 	+2	+2	+28
21 	+2	+2	+28
22 	+2	+2	+28
23 	+2	+2	+28
24 	+2	+2	+28
25 	+2	+2	+28
26 	+2	+2	+28
27 	+2	+2	+28
28 	+2	+2	+28
29 	+2	+2	+28
30 	+2	+2	+28
31 	+2	+2	+28
32 	+2	+2	+28

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.4 Defensive Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Defensive skills are for any character although the benefits are more for
melee characters. Defensive skills concentrate on increasing the characters
resistance to attack or reducing the enemies' resistance to attack. Well-
balanced skill.

5.4.1 Defense Tier 1
-------------------------
Concussive Blow ( 6 levels) : passive
Club-type weapons have chance to stun. Improve all stun attacks.
This is the skill which determine if your use of clubs or swords, for a
paladin type you would use a sword, for a cleric type a club/mace would be
more suited. The chance of stun is low, but the damage enhancements for
clubs is definitely a plus to max this skill. Stun is very powerful (stops
enemies), and great for mobs, but you really need a lot of other stun
enhancements to make this skill powerful.

Level			damage		chance		Duration(secs)
1			15%		5%		1
2			20%		5%		1.5
3			25%		5%		2
4			30%		5%		2.5
5			35%		5%		3
6			40%		5%		3.5

Battle Awareness (10 levels) : active
Enter a state of enhanced defense; affects group players. ¡V75 energy.
This may be an interesting group skill, but the fact is the 12 level
requirement and the low figures really make this skill not very powerful. 12
armor is just nothing even in epic difficulty.

Level				range		defense			armor
1				5		10			3
2				6		16			4
3				7		22			5
4				8		28			6
5				9		36			7
6				10		42			8
7				11		46			9
8				12		52			10
9				13		56			11
10				14		64			12

Batter (12 levels) : active
Strike enemies with your shield, slowing their attack for 8 secs
This is a great skill but not one to max out immediately. However a skill
point on it early on is recommended. Compared to Shield charge this is a low
energy version. Use shield charge first the follow with batter. Great to
clear out the mob of ranged attackers.

Level	Energy cost		damage		damage %	slow chance
1	12			3		5%		18%
2	13			5		6%		20%
3	15			7		7%		23%
4	16			9		8%		25%
5	16			12		8%		30%
6	17			14		9%		33%
7	18			16		9%		35%
8	20			18		10%		38%
9	21			20		10%		40%
10	21			23		11%		45%
11	22			26		11%		48%				
12	23			29		12%		50%

Armor handling ( 6 levels ) : passive
Lower armor requirements, increase armor absorption.
This passive skill is a must to max for a defense mastery player. The damage
absorption will be a plus where damage is high in later difficulties and
every reduction of damage is welcome.

Level		strength requirement		damage absorb
1		-8%				6%
2		-10%				8%
3		-13%				10%
4		-15%				12%
5		-17%				14%
6		-20%				16%

5.4.2 Defense Tier 2
--------------------------
Adrenaline Rush (10 levels) : passive
5% Chance of increased health regeneration when hit for 12 seconds.
A nice to have passive skill but not priority. However this is one of those
skills which become invaluable in later difficulties, as you need to worry
more about other factors. This and it's enhancements will be a life saver.
Invest in a few points to open the tree.

Level		increase regen per sec
1		6
2		8
3		10
4		12
5		15
6		17
7		19
8		21
9		22
10		25

Rally (12 levels) : active
Heal and 150% life regeneration boost to nearby allies (10m) for 10s.
This is one of those really powerful skills especially when you have a
nature player with regrowth. Your team will hardly need to think about
health, except those hasty one hit kills. As with all health skills it will
benefit only those characters with low health. You certainly need some kind
of ¡Vrecharge for this skill to be effective in later levels.

Level		energy cost		health restored		armor bonus
1		51			255			5
2		53			300			8
3		56			345			10
4		58			390			12
5		59			435			15
6		62			480			18
7		64			525			20
8		67			570			23
9		69			615			26
10		70			660			29
11		73			705			34
12		75			750			40

Quick recovery (8 levels) : active
Increase shield block recovery and 5% armor absorption for a  time. ¡V 50
energy
The shield block recharge time of 3s is really a bad thing in TQ, making a
shield pretty less desirable and less effective. This is where a Defensive
mastery player can get the decent usage from the shield. Turn this on
always, and you will be getting less hits, invaluable in harder
difficulties.

Level		Duration(sec)		recovery bonus(%)	block bonus(%)
1		18			32			10
2		20			42			12
3		22			50			14
4		25			58			16
5		27			64			18
6		29			70			20
7		31			75			22
8		34			80			24

Shield smash (6 levels) : passive
Chance to smash enemies with your shield for +30% damage.

Level		chance used
1		6
2		8
3		10
4		12
5		14
6		16

5.4.3 Defense Tier 3
-------------------------
Resilience (6 levels) : passive
Adrenaline rush can happen more often.
Adrenaline is pretty nice, but the slow recharge and the low health bonus
(for high levels), means this is a must if your are using adrenaline. Max
this even if you have one point in adrenaline.

Level		recharge bonus
1		30%
2		38%
3		46%
4		52%
5		58%
6		64%

Focus (6 levels) : active
Makes shield more effective for all members of group. ¡V15 energy reserved.
Chance to block is very important to the effectiveness of a shield. Just six
points for an extra 18% change is a good trade off.

Level		Chance block %
1		5
2		8
3		10
4		12
5		15
6		18

Shield charge (12 levels) : active
Running attack (+300% speed) with shield that stuns enemies for 1s.
If you are using your shield attack for a primary defense character. This is
a must. One point is nice, because of the high energy cost. This skill is
for the 300% speed increase and stun. One strike with this to reach those
ranged users, and switch to batter for a more effective attack.

Level		energy cost		damage
1		30			1-28
2		33			3-34
3		36			5-40
4		39			8-47
5		42			13-56
6		45			15-62
7		48			17-68
8		51			19-74
9		54			22-81
10		57			27-90
11		60			29-96
12		63			31-102

5.4.4 Defense Tier 4
--------------------------
Inspiration (6 levels) : active
Adds mana regeneration to rally skill. +10% total speed and recovery of
energy per second.
I have not really used this skill much and later pretty much skipped it for
my Defense character. However usually do not use defense with a caster, so I
cannot say; but caster should have much better energy regeneration making
this skill pretty useless.

Level		Duration		energy per sec
1		1			2.8
2		3			3.6
3		5			4.4
4		6			5.2
5		8			6.0
6		10			6.8

Rend armor (8 levels) : active
Hit multiple (3) targets, reducing armor for 5s. ¡V15 energy
This is one of those skills which only shines if you have other
enhancements. It is "area" because you can hit three, which means together
with a slow attack from a relic or charm makes this a very nice skill.
However the reduced armor is too low to help.

Level		arc(degree c)		reduce armor
1		90			5
2		95			10
3		100			16
4		105			22
5		110			28
6		115			34
7		120			40
8		125			46

Disable (6 levels) : passive
Chance to disable enemies, slowing their attack by 50% for 5 secs and+15%
damage with shield.
Although this is a passive and only six points, it is something not on the
priority list. You could do better with relic or charm enhancements. However
if you are not lucky enough to get these from charms, max it out and you
will discover the power of slow enemies. Use a mystic to take it out when
you don't need it.

Level		Chance(%)
1		6
2		8
3		10
4		12
5		14
6		16

5.4.5 Defense Tier 5
-------------------------
Defensive reaction (8 levels) :passive
Modifies adrenaline rush. Adds damage and speed boost.
This is the second enhancement to adrenaline rush, and a much better skill
to enhance the adrenaline rush. A few points is very nice, and max it when
you have the spare points.

Level		damage bonus		speed bonus
1		15%			4%
2		19%			6%
3		23%			8%
4		29%			10%
5		33%			14%
6		37%			16%
7		43%			18%
8		50%			20%

Iron Will (6 levels) : active
Adds stun, trap, disruption and freeze resistances to allies, - 10 energy
reserve.
For just 6 levels, and just ¡V10 energy reserve. This is a must, considering
the bonuses you get at level 6 (+ any all skills or + defensive skills),
this is a must, especially helps you with bosses even at harder levels.

Level		Stun resist	entrap reduce	freeze duration	skill disrupt
				duration			protection
1		30%		30%		30%		30%
2		40%		40%		40%		40%
3		50%		50%		50%		50%
4		60%		60%		60%		60%
5		70%		70%		70%		70%
6		80%		80%		80%		80%

Disruption (6 levels) : active
Charged enemies cannot use skills for a time.
This is a later level skill and can be useful in harder levels, when normal
monsters start using their skills to cause some major damage. However, I
hardly invested points in this simple because it is active, and I do not
consider using this as any of my primary or secondary attacks. At tier 5 I
would rather put points elsewhere.

Level		energy cost		num targets	skill disrupt(sec)
1		12			2		1.5
2		14			2		2.0
3		16			3		2.5
4		18			3		3.0
5		20			3		3.5
6		22			4		4.0

5.4.6 Defense Tier 6
--------------------------
Defiance (12 levels) : active
Adds defense and chance of damage reduction, and also increased elemental
resistance. Modifies Rally and affects all allies.
Pros: A lot of people will want you on their party for farming on
multiplayer legendary. However sacrificing 4 levels of skills points just to
boost to 50% on a tier 6 skill. Not something you would do. Not worth it,
you would be better of farming for items for the same protection, and they
would be passive.

Level		energy cost	elemental resist	damage reflect
1		8		10%			5%
2		10		14%			10%
3		12		17%			15%
4		14		21%			20%
5		16		24%			25%
6		18		28%			30%
7		20		31%			35%
8		22		35%			40%
9		24		38%			45%
10		26		42%			50%
11		28		45%			55%
12		30		50%			60%

Colossus form (8 levels) : active
Assume form of a giant for 24s, 10 energy cost per sec; +50% damage, -15%
speed, increased strength, health and damage absorption.
This is really the only tier 6 defensive spell I found useful, and once I
got it, it became one of my most used skills, especially for bosses. The
strength bonus for high levels means much more damage, and the damage absorb
is a nice bonus. At least one point on the first chance. However make the
most of your increase stats for the 24s because the recharge time is really
long.

Level		strength bonus		health bonus	damage absorb
1		30%			30		30%
2		32%			32		32%
3		35%			35		35%
4		37%			37		37%
5		40%			40		40%
6		43%			43		43%
7		46%			46		46%
8		50%			50		50%

Pulverize (6 levels) : active
Chance to stun one or several (3) enemies within 120 degree arc with
shield.; -50 offense and skill disruption for 3 sec, and increase damage.
Although only 6 points, I did not use it due to the fact it is tier 6 and I
would invest my points into other skills instead. By this level a defensive
player will be using other methods to do more shield damage and stun.

Level		Chance		Damage bonus
1		6%		10%
2		8%		12%
3		10%		15%
4		12%		18%
5		14%		21%
6		16%		25%

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.5 Earth Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Earth master is the magic users fire skill tree, concentrating on the Earth
(rock/lava and fire). If your character has Earth mastery, then Earth
Enchant is a must, otherwise your damage is not enough.

5.5.1 Earth Tier 1
----------------------
Earth Enchantment (12 levels) : active
Imbue weapons with fire damage. 6 meter radius group affect. ¡V1 energy per
second, 5-8 fire damage for 1-3 secs, -75 energy reserve + fire damage bonus
on weapons.
If you choose earth mastery, this is a must to max. No questions asked. Just
slowly max this skill and your fire damage will be incredible; 100% bonus on
fire damage.

Level	Fire damage bonus
1	12%
2	20%
3	28%
4	36%
5	44%
6	52%
7	60%
8	68%
9	76%
10	84%
11	92%
12	100%

Flame surge (12 level) : active
Fires three jets of flame at a short range.
I did not like this skill. For normal it was OK, but the small damage, and
will not make much difference in harder difficulties, due to small damage
and fire resistance. There are better skills to make an escape route.

Level	energy cost		fire damage
1	37			8-15
2	40			11-18
3	43			13-22
4	47			17-27
5	51			20-31
6	54			23-34
7	57			25-38
8	61			29-43
9	65			32-47
10	68			35-50
11	71			38-54
12	75			43-59

5.5.2 Earth Tier 2
------------------------
Brimstone (8 levels) : active
Modifies Earth Enchantment and adds bonus physical damage and 15% chance of
burn damage for 3 secs
I have maxed this skill out, simply because it is tier 2 and only eight
points. For a character using Earth as a primary attack, this is a great
bonus. However, at later difficulties, I have to reallocate these points as
the bonus is just not that high.

Level		Fire damage		burn damage
1		1-3			25
2		2-4			29
3		3-5			34
4		5-7			39
5		6-8			43
6		7-9			48
7		8-11			52
8		10-12			58

Heat shield (12 levels) :active
Protective shield. Vanishes after too much damage or after a time.+15% Fire
resistance bonus and reduced fire damage.
I played with this for a time, just boosted it to level 12 and then took it
off. In fact it is trash. Even Epic bosses with fire attack can take it out.
12 levels and 70 energy cost, makes this skill pretty useless. Another thing
is that this skill has a longish recharge time, so watch out.


Level	energy cost		fire damage reduction
1	45			112
2	47			124
3	49			136
4	52			148
5	54			160
6	56			172
7	59			184
8	61			196
9	63			208
10	66			220
11	68			232
12	70			245

Ring of fire (8 levels) : active
Burns enemies who get too close.
This is a low energy and low tier skill, and at just 8 levels, seems like a
nice choice. However, the damage is too low, even with all the bonuses of a
main fire user. It was interesting, in normal, but after that it was pretty
useless. However I did (just for fun) use it once, on Epic Egypt Telkine. I
had a slowdown attack bonus and sword. I would hit the telkine and just run
around it spawning the ring of fire, and hitting it. Worked real nice.

Level		energy cost per sec		radius		fire damage
1		1				1.5		3-5
2		1				1.8		6-8
3		1				2.0		8-11
4		2				2.2		10-13
5		2				2.4		13-16
6		2				2.6		16-20
7		2				2.7		19-23
8		2				2.8		23-27

Volcanic orb (12 levels) : active
Lob a ball of fire that does area damage. Fragments in 2.5m radius.
Earth mastery characters will benefit from this attack. Not only is it a
ranged attack, but also area attack. With enhancements it is even better,
because it adds physical damage as well.

Level	Energy cost		damage		fire damage
1	64			18		25-54
2	68			21		31-60
3	72			25		37-68
4	76			28		43-74
5	80			31		49-80
6	84			35		55-88
7	88			38		61-94
8	92			41		67-100
9	96			45		73-108
10	100			48		79-114
11	104			51		85-120
12	108			55		91-128

5.5.3 Earth Tier 3
----------------------
Stone Form (12 levels): active
Hide and heal in shell of stone; 100% damage absorption for 6 sec, but
cannot move. Increased health per sec.
This can be a life saver, and best to the weak melee character who gets
surrounded. It gives you 6 secs basically to plan a escape route. 1 point is
enough, as once it ends, rush for the exit and drink potions instead.

Level	energy cost		health per sec
1	64			24
2	68			28
3	72			32
4	76			36
5	80			40
6	84			44
7	88			47
8	92			52
9	96			55
10	100			58
11	104			61
12	108			66

Summon core dweller (15 levels) : active
Summon an elemental earth guardian.
This is a nice pet, and although it has low health and damage. It is a good
shield, and can be great with some other group effects piled onto it. The CD
by itself cannot last very long in difficulty levels. The recharge time for
this skill is longish, so if your core dweller gets killed immediately when
you summon it, don't expect to summon another one immediately.

Level	Energy cost		Health		Energy		Damage
1	250			651		131		12-21
2	258			714		143		14-25
3	266			781		154		17-29
4	274			843		166		20-34
5	282			910		177		22-38
6	290			972		189		25-42
7	298			1039		200		27-47
8	306			1101		212		30-51
9	314			1168		223		33-56
10	322			1230		235		35-59
11	330			1297		246		38-64
12	338			1359		258		40-69
13	346			1426		269		43-74
14	354			1488		281		46-79
15	362			1555		292		48-84

Barrage (8 levels): active
Modified Flame surge and  fires more often at less cost, as well as chance
to pass thru enemies and burn damage for 3 secs and reduce recharge time.
Flame surge is not really that useful, especially in harder difficulties,
and the bonus of these is not really worth it. It is great for normal, but
really this skill tree should be reallocated for harder levels.

Level	pierce chance	burn bonus	recharge
1	45		14		-30%
2	50		20		-40%
3	55		27		-50%
4	60		34		-60%
5	65		41		-70%
6	70		49		-80%
7	75		57		-90%
8	80		66		-100%

5.5.4 Earth Tier 4
----------------------
Stone Skin (6 levels) : passive
Modified Earth enchantment and enhances armor and fire resistance.
A nice 6 point modifier for the important Earth Enchantment skill. Although
12 armor and 12% does not seem a lot, it certain worth it for 6 points and
the ¡V100% resistances in Legendary.

Level	Armor	fire resist
1	2	3%
2	4	6%
3	6	8%
4	8	10%
5	10	13%
6	12	15%

Inner fire (8 levels): passive
Modifies core dweller and adds speed boost and fire retaliation
Definitely an improvement for Core dweller, even if you just have one point
in Core Dweller. It will increase the life and make it much more useful.

Level	damage	dexterity		health regen		speed
1	3		15%		24%			5%
2	5		20%		32%			6%
3	7		25%		40%			8%
4	9		30%		48%			9%
5	11		35%		56%			12%
6	13		40%		64%			14%
7	15		45%		72%			15%
8	18		50%		80%			17%	

Soften Metal (8 levels) : active
Reduce damage, armor effectiveness for 3 secs of enemy weapons and armor. 1
energy cost per second.
This is not really a skill for the pure caster. For the melee/caster this
can help a lot. The reduced armor it self will compensate for the lower
strength and offense of a melee/caster. This is more than some reduction
armor skills for warfare.

Level	damage		reduce damage		reduce armor
1	3		3			18
2	6		5			24
3	8		6			30
4	10		8			38
5	13		9			44
6	16		11			50
7	19		12			58
8	23		15			65

Conflagration (8 levels) : active
Modified Volcanic orb and increases burn damage over time (3s) and radius to
3m.
Nice to have in volcanic orb, but not necessary, better to add points later
on and point points into fragmentation instead.

Level	energy cost		fire damage
1	6			11
2	8			16
3	10			21
4	12			27
5	14			32
6	16			37
7	18			42
8	20			48

5.5.5 Earth Tier 5
----------------------
Molten rock (8 levels) : active
Adds fire retaliation (fire damage over 2s ) to stone form.
No pretty useless. Low damage and extra energy cost. Skip this one.

Level	energy cost		damage
1	16			6
2	18			7
3	20			9
4	22			10
5	24			11
6	26			13
7	28			14
8	30			15

Wildfire (12 levels) : active
Modifies summon core dweller; Dweller can cast lethal fire spell on area(5
sec 4m radius).
Adds magical attack for the Core dweller and allows it to use some of it's
energy. Definitely add a few points into this skill if you are relying on
the Core dweller.

Level	energy cost		fire damage
1	49			16-25
2	50			20-30
3	50			24-35
4	51			29-41
5	52			33-46
6	53			37-51
7	54			41-56
8	54			46-62
9	55			50-67
10	56			55-73
11	57			59-78
12	58			65-85


Flame arch (12 levels) : active
Modifies flame surge. More damage, pass-through and more jets of flame.
The Flames surge, although not powerful, can be used as a escape route
creator. If you have invested in Flame surge, this skill really comes too
late, as by the time your get to this, flame surge is really not worth
using.

Level	energy cost		jet increase		damage
1	10			1			4%
2	11			1			8%
3	12			1			12%
4	14			1			16%
5	20			2			20%
6	21			2			24%
7	23			2			29%
8	24			2			33%
9	30			3			38%
10	32			3			42%
11	33			3			48%
12	34			3			55%

Fragmentation (12 levels) : active
Modifies volcanic orb.Fragments from the orb scatter, doing extra damage(3m
fragmentation and 1.5 sec stun)
A must for volcanic orb caster. The physical damage and fragmentation and
stun is just awesome. This is a must, because of the physical damage, which
helps a lot for those nasty fire resistant monsters.

Level	energy cost		fragments	physical dam		fire dam
1	10			3-5		35			12
2	11			4-5		43			16
3	13			4-7		51			20
4	15			4-7		60			25
5	16			5-8		68			29
6	17			5-9		76			33
7	19			5-9		84			37
8	20			6-10		95			42
9	22			6-11		101			46
10	23			6-11		109			50
11	25			7-12		117			54
12	26			7-13		126			59

5.5.6 Earth Tier 6
-----------------------
Volatility (12 levels): passive
33% Chance of increase fire attacks doing increase damage
In harder difficulties, fire resistances go up, and the to compensate this
skill really boosts the damage on each successful hit. A nice passive skill,
and a few points really makes a bit difference.

Level	fire damage bonus
1	75%
2	83%
3	92%
4	104%
5	112%
6	120%
7	129%
8	141%
9	149%
10	157%
11	166%
12	178%

Metamorphosis (8 levels) : passive
Modified core dweller; Core dweller becomes more resistant to damage;  33%
increase armor and other bonuses
Damn, at the top tier. This is a must for core dweller user, in order to
make it more survivable in harder levels. Just eight points, but pretty hard
to get (3 level ups at later difficulties).

Level	health		armor		elemental resistance
1	10%		10%		4%
2	15%		15%		6%
3	20%		20%		8%
4	25%		25%		10%
5	30%		30%		12%
6	35%		35%		14%
7	40%		40%		16%
8	45%		45%		18%

Eruption (12 levels) : active
Make volcanic fissures open beneath your enemies' feet. Open up the Earth
for 6 secs within a 3m radius.
At the top level, this skill is not really that powerful. By this time, you
should be topping volcanic orb tree instead.

Level	energy cost		fragments	Physical dam		fire dam
1	95			2-3		31			28-33
2	98			3-4		38			35-41
3	100			3-4		44			41-48
4	103			3-4		49			46-54
5	105			3-4		56			53-62
6	108			4-5		62			59-69
7	110			4-5		67			64-75
8	113			4-5		74			71-83
9	115			4-5		80			77-90
10	118			5-6		85			82-96
11	120			5-6		92			89-104
12	123			5-6		98			95-112


----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.6 Hunting Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
The hunting skill is a very balance skill, with a lot of percentage based
enhancements. It also has skills that benefit the group (which works single
player as well). However it has to be said that it benefits projectile
(spear/bow) characters in general. Groups with magic users and melee
characters may not benefit from some of the group effects.
Note: if you are thinking of using decoy, invest not too many on Monster
lure, and more on detonate to get full advantage of damage. Too many Monster
Lure points means it takes longer to destroy the decoy. Only invest more in
Monster lure at higher levels where monsters do more damage, in this case
decoy lasts a bit longer to attract more monsters.

5.6.1 Hunting Tier 1
-------------------------
Ensnare (6 Levels):active
Throws a net that keeps enemies from moving, and reduces enemy defense by
33%.
This might work on your, but not for you. Skip this tree, really!

Level	Energy cost		Duration	Pierce damage
1	15			3		15
2	17			4		19
3	19			5		23
4	20			6		27
5	22			7		31
6	24			8		35

Take down (12 levels): active
Strike with a forceful, well-aimed blow of the spear;+300% movement thrust
with spear weapons, for pierce damage and reduction of enemy health.
This is the skill for spear users. Spears class weapons have high pierce and
damage but are slow. Without this, you will have a hard time. Max it out.

Level	Energy cost		Pierce damage	Health reduction
1	30			25			8%
2	32			31			12%
3	34			38			15%
4	36			47			18%
5	38			52			21%
6	40			57			24%
7	42			61			26%
8	44			68			28%
9	46			72			30%
10	48			77			32%
11	50			81			34%
12	52			88			36%

Woodlore (6 levels) : passive
Increase attack speed, defensive ability.
This is the skill that is a must if you choose hunting as a mastery. All %
based bonuses, passive and only 6 points.

Level	Defense bonus		Attack speed bonus
1	10%			5%
2	14%			8%
3	18%			12%
4	24%			15%
5	28%			18%
6	32%			21%

5.6.2 Hunting Tier 2
--------------------------
Marksmanship (12 levels): active
Shoot an arrow with increased speed and damage. ¡V3 energy.
This does not apply to spears, but bows. Bow users this is a must as bows
are slow to very slow. The bonus in speed is essential, and together with
slow monster movement, and over time damage (poison, burn,bleed), mobs will
never get near you.

Level	Pierce damage		projectile speed bonus
1	5			30%
2	7			40%
3	9			50%
4	12			60%
5	14			70%
6	16			80%
7	18			90%
8	21			100%
9	23			110%
10	25			120%
11	27			130%
12	31			140%

Art of the hunt (10 ranks): active
Adds bonus damage against animals and beastmen. Increases pierce damage.
Affects the whole party members within 15m. requires 75 energy reserve.
Beast and Beastmen are probably the most common monsters in TQ. As this is a
group skill, it is one which is pretty much worth it. The damage is low, but
the % increase in pierce is certainly a welcome bonus.


Level	Pierce damage		damage to beasts/beastmen
1	12%			3
2	18%			5
3	23%			8
4	30%			10
5	34%			12
6	40%			15
7	45%			17
8	52%			19
9	56%			22
10	62%			25

Herbal remedy (6 levels): active
Increases health regeneration and poison resistance.
This is not really a very useful skill, but only six points. I can say that
poison resistance is not in most peoples main concern but very important
later on. However this skill is active, that means you have to activate it.
Best to leave this skill out, and only put points in it when you met some
poison spewing bosses in hard difficulties (hint hint).

Level	Energy cost	duration	Health/sec	poison resistance bonus
1	35		180		3		30%
2	40		240		3.6		38%
3	45		300		4.2		46%
4	50		360		4.8		54%
5	55		420		5.4		66%
6	60		480		6.0		72%

5.6.3 Hunting Tier 3
--------------------------
Barbed Netting (8 levels) : active
Netted enemies takes bleeding damage.Modifies ensnare, and adds bleeding
damage over 3s.
As I said before leave this skill tree, but if you are having fun with the
ensnare skill, might as well put some points to make the monster more
miserable.

Level	Bleeding damage
1	45
2	57
3	72
4	84
5	96
6	111
7	123
8	135

Call of the Hunt (8 levels): active
Grant attack speed boost to yourself and nearby allies(15m), adds bleeding
damage over 3 secs and +33% damage bonus to beasts/beastmen.
Comparing art of the hunt with call of the hunt, I will definitely choose
this one. Definitely a good skill for both single player and multiplayer.
However the recharge time for this skill is quite long, so you cannot keep
casting it useless you have some ¡Vrecharge gear.

Level	Energy cost	duration	bleed damage	attack speed bonus
1	45		28		18			15%
2	47		31		22			17%
3	49		33		26			19%
4	51		36		30			22%
5	53		42		34			24%
6	55		44		38			26%
7	57		47		41			28%
8	59		50		46			31%

Eviscerate (10 levels) : active
Modifies Take down and adds bleeding damage over 3 secs for extra 5 energy
cost.
Bleed damage is always nice, but the damage here is low, nonetheless it is a
bonus and a few spare points will definitely not hurt. Of course you should
max out takedown first.

Level	Bleeding damage
1	33
2	45
3	60
4	72
5	84
6	99
7	111
8	123
9	138
10	150

Monster lure (6 levels) : active
Place a lure that attracts monsters. The decoy Summons 3 monsters, 30 sec
duration (longest), 15 energy, and has provoke skill which requires ¡V15
energy cost.
This is not really a good skill. For single player, this may be the only
option for a low defense ranged player to lure monsters away from the
player. Better to use another mastery, with pets to do this kind of job.

Level	energy cost		decoy health	radius of attraction
1	34			120			5
2	38			150			6
3	42			180			7
4	46			210			8
5	50			240			9
6	54			270			10	

5.6.4 Hunting Tier 4
--------------------------
Study prey (8 levels): active
Lower enemy physical and pierce resistance for 8 seconds within a radius of
6m. 35 energy
For bow and spear users, this is active skill number two. It has fast
recharge which makes it excellent. Call of the hunt first and study prey
second, and your bow/spear will be invincible.

Level	damage resist		Pierce resist
1	-30%			-25%
2	-35%			-30%
3	-40%			-35%
4	-45%			-40%
5	-50%			-45%
6	-55%			-50%
7	-60%			-55%
8	-65%			-60%

Puncture shot arrows (12 levels) : active
Arrows fly throw enemy and hit those behind it. Increases pierce and
bleeding damage. Requires 1 energy per shot.
A must for the bow character. All percentage improvement, and allows you to
get a head start of monster in the back like magic users and archer because
of passthrough.

Level	passthru chance		Pierce damage		bleeding damage
1	8%			5%			9%
2	12%			8%			12%
3	16%			10%			15%
4	21%			12%			20%
5	25%			15%			23%
6	29%			18%			27%
7	33%			20%			30%
8	38%			22%			35%
9	42%			25%			38%
10	46%			28%			42%
11	50%			30%			45%
12	55%			33%			50%

Gouge (6 levels) : passive
Chance of bleeding damage(over 3s) with bow or spear.
Although passive and only 6 points, avoid it unless you have spare skill
points. The chance is low and the damage not really that good. Work your
other skills to improve bleeding damage before you put points in this skill.

Level	Chance used		Bleeding damage
1	6%			45
2	8%			60
3	10%			72
4	12%			81
5	14%			96
6	16%			108

Find cover (8 levels) : active
Higher chance to dodge projectiles for whole group. 10 Energy reserve
You are going to benefit from this as well as other players. In later
difficulties, those archers are going to be a pain. This skill will be
difference between death and getting out alive.

Level	chance avoid
1	8%
2	10%
3	12%
4	15%
5	17%
6	19%
7	23%
8	25%

5.6.5 Hunting Tier 5
--------------------------
Exploit weakness (10 levels) : active
Modifies Call of the Hunt skill and adds enhanced pierce and bleeding damage
for allies. 10 energy cost.
Call of the hunt is real nice and this enhancement really adds to the skill.

Level	Pierce/bleeding damage
1	58%
2	66%
3	77%
4	85%
5	93%
6	104%
7	112%
8	120%
9	131%
10	139%

Trail blazing (6 levels) : active
Modifies the Art of the hunt skill  and adds movement speed and reduces trap
durations(100%) of the whole group. Requires 1 energy per second.
Art of the hunt is really put in the background by call of the hunt. This
enhancement does not really make it any better. I mean how many times have
you been ensnared.

Level	Movement bonus
1	5%
2	8%
3	10%
4	12%
5	16%
6	18%

Detonate (12 levels): active
Lure can explode, causing area damage (fires 6 fire projectiles over 3
meters). ¡V15 energy
Lure the creatures then explode. Nice, but lure is not worth getting.
However, one point in lure (low health) and max this, can be useful.

Level	fire damage
1	36-58
2	42-66
3	49-75
4	58-86
5	64-94
6	70-102
7	77-111
8	86-122
9	92-130
10	98-138
11	105-147
12	114-158

5.6.6 Hunting Tier 6
--------------------------
Flush out ( 6 levels): active
Modifies study prey and lowers enemy resistances. 10 energy cost.
At the last tier this is a harder difficulty skill, and definitely a good
one. Maxed out it can take out general elemental resistance bonus on
Legendary, making their resistances the same as in normal difficulty.

Level	defense ability		elemental resistance
1	14%			14%
2	18%			18%
3	22%			22%
4	26%			26%
5	30%			30%
6	36%			36%

Scatter shot arrows (12 levels): active
Arrow fragment on impact, damaging nearby enemies. 1 energy per shot.
Any archer will need this. This is the only area damage skill in the hunting
tree, and a must for any archer.

Level	fragments	pierce damage
1	3-4		9
2	3-5		12
3	4-5		15
4	4-5		19
5	4-6		22
6	5-6		25
7	5-7		28
8	5-7		32
9	6-7		35
10	6-8		38
11	6-8		41
12	7-9		45

Volley (6 levels): passive
Chance to attack three times with bow or spear (3 projectiles).
Any spear user will benefit from this. A higher difficulty levels, the 16%
chance is not much guarantee, but if you have points to spare , then add a
few. For bow users it is better to invest in other tier 6 skills.

Level	Chance used
1	6%
2	8%
3	10%
4	12%
5	14%
6	16%

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.7 Nature Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Nature is the skill to boost your health, and summon beasts of nature to
help you out. This is more of an offensive skill, and used for characters
who do not intend on investing too many points in health.

5.7.1 Nature Tier 1
------------------------
Regrowth (12 levels): active
Heal yourself or ally.
This is a life saver skill, but not really worth investing points in early
on, even if it is a tier one skill. You will not need it for normal levels,
and potions will do. However in harder difficulties, this is your panic
button.

Level	Health restored		Energy cost
1	300			44
2	380			48
3	460			52
4	540			56
5	620			60
6	700			64
7	780			68
8	860			72
9	940			76
10	1020			80
11	1100			84
12	1180			88

Call of the wild (15 levels): active
Summon wolf companions
Wolves are nice little companions, but not really worth the points early
one. They are great to get those archers in harder difficulty but really
there are better pets. Do not rely on wolves, but they can be a great
support if you have other pets.

Level	Energy cost	Health	Energy	Summon Limit	Chance dodge
							attacks/proj %
1	120		155	45	1		15
2	124		180	48	1		16
3	128		205	51	1		17	
4	132		232	54	1		18
5	136		257	57	1		19
6	140		283	60	1		20
7	144		308	63	2		21
8	148		335	66	2		22
9	152		360	69	2		23
10	156		387	72	2		24
11	160		413	75	2		25
12	164		441	78	2		26
13	168		467	81	2		27
14	172		494	84	2		28
15	176		523	87	2		29

5.7.2 Nature Tier 2
------------------------
Heart of Oak (12 levels): active
Bolster health and speed. Affect allies with 18m, increase speed by 10%.
Requires 100 energy reserve and 1 energy cost per second.
Wow, almost doubles your health at maxed level. Just what you and your
companions need when your are in trouble. Slowly max this out and ensure you
have energy and turn it on all the time!

Level	Health bonus
1	8%
2	16%
3	24%
4	32%
5	40%
6	48%
7	56%
8	64%
9	72%
10	80%
11	88%
12	96%

Accelerate growth (8 levels): active
Cast regrowth more often.
In harder difficulties, bosses can be a real problem, this is really
necessary if you need to boost health quickly. However, for mobs, you really
should not be look at this as an option for survivability.

Level	cast recharge time
1	-18%
2	-26%
3	-34%
4	-42%
5	-50%
6	-58%
7	-66%
8	-75%

Maul (10 levels): active
Modifies Call of the wild; Wolves may use a special attack and clause
bleeding damage over 3s. 24 energy cost.
Adds nice damages to your wolves. If you are using the wolves well, add
spare points here. Skill points are better invested elsewhere.

Level	Bleed damage		Pierce damage		reduce enemy health %
1	9			3			6
2	13			5			6
3	17			7			8
4	22			9			8
5	25			10			8
6	29			12			10
7	33			14			10
8	38			16			10
9	41			17			12
10	45			19			12

Plague (8 levels):active
Cast a poisonous disease that spreads amongst enemies.
This skill is useless in itself, but what really makes it a consideration is
the enhancements you can get for it. This is also nice if have pets fighting
for you. Invest a point in it to open the tree

Level	Energy cost	Duration		Reduce enemy health %
1	64			3		3-8
2	66			3.4		4-9
3	67			4		5-10
4	69			4.3		6-11
5	70			4.7		7-12
6	72			5.3		8-13
7	73			5.6		9-14
8	75			6		10-15

5.7.3 Nature Tier 3
------------------------
Briar Ward (15 levels):active
Create a protective circle that enemies cannot enter. Last for 30s
Unless you are really lack, the briar ward tree can all be skipped. However,
if you are playing a lazy, stay back and let the summons do all the work,
you might as well have this as well, and let it do some small amount of
damage. The recharge time is quite long, for this skill.

Level	Energy Cost	Briar Health	Briar pierce retail
1	112		64		1-3
2	116		88		1-3
3	120		112		1-3
4	124		136		2-5
5	128		160		2-5
6	132		184		2-5
7	136		208		2-5
8	140		232		3-7
9	144		256		3-7
10	148		280		3-7
11	152		304		3-7
12	156		328		4-9
13	160		352		4-9
14	164		376		4-9
15	168		400		4-9

Survival instinct (15 levels): active
Modifies Call of the wild; Wolves may rally when their health is low.
Activates when health goes below 33%, and lasts for 6s
This a skill to keep your wolves alive, in practice it does not work too
well, as wolves health regen does not compensate for the more damage
absorption at high difficulties. Having said that, adding heart of oak, and
using regrowth will definitely make your wolves last much longer.

Level	Damage absorb		Damage bonus
1	15%			15%
2	20%			20%
3	24%			25%
4	30%			30%
5	38%			35%
6	42%			40%
7	47%			45%
8	51%			50%
9	54%			55%
10	60%			60%
11	63%			65%
12	67%			70%
13	70%			75%
14	74%			80%
15	80%			85%

Fatigue (8 levels): active
Modifies plague and saps strength and speed from those afflicted. Affects
enemies. Reduce damage for 3s, and 5% chance to reduce health of enemies.
Plague is pretty useless, but this enhancement really makes it much better.
Max this out, and let your pets take out mobs with ease.

Level	Less dam	Reduce health 	%	Reduced dam %	-speed %
1	3		50			15		15
2	3-5		52			18		18
3	3-6		55			20		20
4	3-8		57			23		23
5	3-9		61			28		25
6	3-11		64			31		28
7	3-12		66			34		30
8	3-15		69			36		33	

5.7.4 Nature Tier 4
------------------------
Tranquility of water (6 levels): active
Modifies heart of Oak and adds chance of reduce skill energy cost by 50%
Just the nature skills takes a lot of energy, and this is a must for any
heavy energy user. At only 6 points, you have more than 1 in 4 chance of
using 50% less energy.

Level	Chance %
1	8
2	12
3	16
4	19
5	24
6	28

Dissemination (10 levels): active
Modifies regrowth; healing spreads to allies nearby.
Regrowth being such a nice skill, why not let other players get the benefit.
In reality it does not work that well. The fact is different allies have
different health at different times. It will benefit one player but wasted
on another. Call me a selfish bas**** but this skill is not worth it.


Level	Health restored
1	180
2	260
3	340
4	420
5	500
6	580
7	660
8	740
9	820
10	900

Stinging nettle (8 levels): active
Modifies Briar wall and adds poison retaliation damage for 6s

Level	Poison retailiation
1	15
2	24
3	33
4	42
5	51
6	60
7	69
8	78

Sylvan Nymph (15 levels) :active
Summon a bow-welding nymph. Nymph has bow attack which reduces 3% of enemies
health. 1m radius.
High energy cost, and difficulty keeping her in range of some of the
beneficial group skills, makes this a tough choice. For all her defensive
bonuses, she does not last well in harder difficulties. However as a boss,
blocker she can be great. Invest in one early one, and if you are using
pets, work on the wolves first.

Level	Energy cost	Health	Energy	pierce damage	Dodge attack/proj %
1	200		198	130	9-21		18
2	204		226	138	12-25		20
3	209		255	146	15-28		22
4	213		283	154	18-31		24
5	217		311	162	21-36		26
6	222		340	170	24-39		28
7	226		368	178	27-43		30
8	230		396	186	30-46		32
9	235		425	194	33-49		34
10	239		453	202	36-54		36
11	243		481	210	39-57		38
12	248		510	218	42-61		40
13	252		538	225	45-64		42
14	256		566	234	48-67		44
15	261		595	242	51-72		46

5.7.5 Nature Tier 5
------------------------
Permanence of Stone (6 levels): active
Modifies Heart of Oak and adds resistance to elemental damage. 1 Energy cost
per second. Affects allies.
If you have nature, you should have heart of oak, and if you have heart of
oak, then you should have this. Instant 18% elemental resistant for that
extra boost against those nasty bosses.

Level	Elemental resistance
1	5%
2	8%
3	10%
4	12%
5	15%
6	18%

Strength of the pack (12 levels): active
Modifies Call of the Wild; Wolves howl, buffing all nearby (10m);adds 1
energy regeneration per second, +15% increase speed and damage and armor
bonus to pack for 15s. 25 energy cost.
Wolves are pretty weak, and do low damage, but they are fast. This is a good
boost for wolves, if you are on the pet summoning class.

Level	Damage bonus %		Armor bonus
1	15			4
2	20			6
3	24			8
4	30			10
5	34			12
6	39			14
7	43			16
8	49			18
9	53			20
10	58			22
11	62			24
12	68			26


Overgrowth (12 levels): active
Modifies Sylvan Nymph; Nymph can cast a living shield (33% chance) with
retaliation damage on allies.
You like the nymph, then this should be invested, as it boosts the
survivability of the nymph. However, you may consider improving the damage
with Nature's wrath (tier 6) skill instead.

Level	damage absorption		Pierce retaliation (33% chance)
1	79				1-5
2	86				3-7
3	95				4-9
4	103				6-12
5	111				7-14
6	120				9-16
7	128				10-19
8	136				12-21
9	145				13-25
10	153				15-30
11	161				16-31
12	170				18-33

Susceptibility (8 levels): active
Modifies plague and further lowers speed and damage resistance.
With just one point in plague and getting another great enhancement, you
will have enough stuff to make your pets destroy everything in their path
(OK maybe not). This skill will probably play some part in the grand scheme
of things.

Level	Damage resistance		Elemental resistance
1	-12%				-12%
2	-15%				-15%
3	-19%				-19%
4	-24%				-24%
5	-27%				-27%
6	-30%				-30%
7	-34%				-34%
8	-39%				-39%

5.7.6 Nature Tier 6
-------------------------
Refresh (6 levels): active
Instantly refreshes all recharging skills.
Damn, wish I had this earlier on. Just six points and basically increasing
your cast rate. A must, if you can get enough points at tier 6.

Level	Energy cost
1	200
2	170
3	150
4	135
5	125
6	115

Sanctuary (8 levels): active
Modifies briar ward and aids regeneration and damage absorption in briar
circle (18s), 3m radius

Level	Damage absorb %	health	Energy		Reduce		energy
				regen %		regen %		cost %
1	12			148		148		15
2	14			160		160		20
3	16			172		172		25
4	18			184		184		30
5	20			196		196		35
6	22			208		208		40
7	24			220		220		45
8	26			232		232		50

Nature's Wrath (12 levels): active
Modifies Sylvan Nymph and adds elemental damage to Nymph's attack Adds 33%
chance pass through enemies and increase radius of 1.5m
This is the damage improvement for the Nymph. If you have put a lot of
points on her, then this is a must. However, this is too little too late. If
you are a pet summoner, you should really improve your other pets. Keep the
nymph as an extra block, but do not add too much points unless you have some
spare.

Level	Energy cost		Elemental damage
1	8			33-58
2	8			38-66
3	9			42-74
4	9			48-82
5	10			52-91
6	10			57-100
7	11			61-109
8	11			67-118
9	12			71-127
10	12			76-137
11	13			80-148
12	13			88-160


----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.8 Rogue Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Rogue master for characters who want to play with poison damage and trap
damage. Rogue skills can complement any other skills quite nicely. The
poison and attack bonuses will help melee and bow characters. Gas bomb and
flash powder may be used by magic characters.
The rogue mastery is not really a first mastery but can be a useful
secondary mastery IMHO. The early skills do not have enough boost power to
make life easy the first eight levels.

5.8.1 Rogue Tier 1
------------------------
Calculated strike (8 levels): active
Every fourth hit does extra damage. 3 charge levels
This may see a great skill, for any melee or bow/spear character but really
fails because it is active. If it was a energy reserve skill it would be
awesome, but the fact that it is just active means you cannot use it with
another skill which makes it less desirable.

Level	Damage bonus %		Pierce damage
1	45			35
2	60			45
3	75			53
4	93			64
5	108			72
6	123			83
7	138			91
8	156			103

Blade Honing (6 levels): active
Boost pierce damage on swords and spears. 16m radius, 50 energy reserve
Now this is a energy reserve skill and definitely complements other skills
for melee characters. At just 6 points it is worth investing in.

Level	Pierce bonus %		Pierce damage
1	16			3
2	24			5
3	32			7
4	40			9
5	48			12
6	56			15	

Envenom weapon (12 levels):  passive
Adds poison to all attacks. 1 energy cost per sec, poison damage is over 5s,
and requires 50 energy reserve.
Another nice energy reserve skill, for melee and bow users. Although not the
best skill to pump up to max in one go (12 levels). For bow users, this will
be enough. For melee users, use it with blade honing. Your energy will not
be wasted.

Level	Poison damage
1	18
2	25
3	33
4	40
5	48
6	55
7	63
8	70
9	78
10	85
11	93
12	100

5.8.2 Rogue Tier 2
------------------------
Throwing knife (10 levels): active
Throws a blade with 100% chance pass through, that does bleeding damage over
3s
This is the rogue's ranged attack and can be quite useful. Not the best, but
you should consider it if you plan on using two melee weapons, and having
this as backup.

Level	Energy cost		Bleed damage		pierce damage
1	18			48			11
2	19			63			15
3	20			78			19
4	21			90			23
5	22			105			27
6	23			120			31
7	24			132			35
8	25			147			39
9	26			162			43
10	27			174			47

Disarm Traps (6 levels): passive
Disable and avoid damage from traps.
Although this is passive, and seems a basic skill for any rogue, in TQ this
skill tree is totally useless. Unless you are very dumb, you should be able
to avoid all trap devices. As for traps monster throw, just move out of
range. Skip this skill tree.

Level	Damage to devices		damage from devices
1	25%				-10%
2	50%				-20%
3	75%				-30%
4	100%				-40%
5	125%				-50%
6	150%				-60%

Nightshade (8 levels): passive
Modifies envenom weapon and slows enemies for 5s when you hit them.
For any bow user this is a must. Even if you only put one point in envenom
weapon, max this skill out. Just 8 points to slow enemies , awesome.

Level	Poison damage %		slow enemies %
1	15			10
2	20			14
3	25			18
4	30			22
5	35			26
6	40			30
7	45			34
8	50			39

Flash powder (8 levels): active
Flash and smoke blinds and confuses enemies. Adds chance to fumble attacks
for 8s, chance of 3-8 seconds of confusion.
Skip this skill unless you have no other skills to make a quick escape.
There are better ways to get out of trouble, instead of keeping a finger on
the quick slot for this skill.

Level	Energy cost	radius	Chance fumble	chance confusion
1	53		3.8	30		30
2	56		4.4	35		35
3	59		5	40		40
4	62		5.6	45		45
5	65		6.2	50		50
6	68		6.8	55		55
7	71		7.4	60		60
8	74		8	65		65

5.8.3 Rogue Tier 3
------------------------
Lucky hit (6 levels): active
Modifies calculated strike and adds chance (33%) of some extra damage,
pierce damage	and bleeding over 3s
This makes calculated strike even better, and the pierce bonus is something
any melee character should consider. However as I said before, calculated
strike is active, which makes it not worth the skill points.
If you use this skill, then you should have other energy reserve skills
active to boost you attack speed and damage, as well as offense.

Level	Damage		Pierce damage %		Bleeding
1	39		50			45
2	48		59			69
3	57		68			96
4	66		77			120
5	75		86			144
6	84		95			171

Open wound (12 levels): passive
Adds 33% chance that blade weapon attacks will do extra bleeding damage over
3 s.
A nice addition for any melee character. Add a few points for the extra
damage if you have spare. Remember melee characters should work on quick
kill rather than over time damage. Not essential but nice to have.

Level	Bleed damage
1	27
2	36
3	45
4	57
5	66
6	75
7	84
8	96
9	105
10	117
11	126
12	141

Lay trap (15): active
Bolt trap that fires at enemies. Up to 3 traps of 1m radius that lasts for
30s and shoots one projectile for piercing damage.
Your Rogue pet. Not very nice damage and not very nice health, but if you
want to play the trapper, this is your choice (OMG 15 levels). This is
useless in harder difficulties. However, lay a trap to get rid of those
ranged attackers, but really you should look at the poison bomb for this.

Level	Energy cost		trap health		pierce damage
1	29			74			14-21
2	31			86			18-24
3	33			98			21-29
4	35			110			24-32
5	37			122			28-35
6	39			134			31-38
7	41			146			34-41
8	43			158			38-46
9	45			170			41-49
10	47			182			44-52
11	49			194			48-55
12	51			206			51-58
13	53			218			56-63
14	55			230			59-66
15	57			242			62-69

Poison gas bomb (12 level): active
Throws a bomb that releases poison gas. Adds poison damage over 6s and also
66% chance of impaired aim for 9 seconds for all skill levels.
This is high energy skill for a rogue character but it is one of the best
skills for a Rogue, for harder difficulties. Throw a few of these to get rid
of those archers and magic users.

Level	Energy cost		Radius		Poison damage
1	33			3.2		32
2	35			3.4		41
3	37			3.6		50
4	40			3.8		61
5	42			4.0		70
6	44			4.2		78
7	47			4.4		87
8	49			4.6		98
9	51			4.8		107
10	54			5.0		115
11	56			5.2		124
12	58			5.4		136

5.8.4 Rogue Tier 4
------------------------
Lethal strike (12 levels): active
Single deadly strike multiplies normal damage.
Another active skill with lots of levels. It goes to say, if you are going
to use these for melee characters, you will be skipping a lot of the other
skills for their masteries (hunting and warfare). This is another skill for
a rogue/casters.

Level	Energy cost		Damage bonus %	Pierce damage bonus %
1	52			225		225
2	53			250		240
3	55			275		255
4	56			300		270
5	58			325		285
6	59			350		300
7	61			375		315
8	62			400		330
9	64			425		345
10	65			450		360
11	67			475		375
12	68			500		390

Rapid Construction (8 levels): active
Modifies lay trap and reduces time before you can lay another trap and also
energy cost.
You like traps, then add a few of these. Traps get destroyed so fast in
harder difficulties, that you may benefit from this. But really skip the
traps.

Level	recharge	Energy cost
1	-18%		-5%
2	-27%		-10%
3	-36%		-15%
4	-44%		-20%
5	-52%		-25%
6	-60%		-30%
7	-66%		-35%
8 	-72%		-40%

Toxin distillation (12 levels): passive
Modifies envenom weapon and increases potency and length of all poison
damage.
If envenom weapon is working for you, then get this. Definitely one to max.

Level	Poison damage %		Duration %
1	12			10
2	24			16
3	36			22
4	48			28
5	60			34
6	72			40
7	84			46
8	96			52
9	108			58
10	120			64
11	132			70
12	144			76

5.8.5 Rogue Tier 5
------------------------
Anatomy (8 levels): passive
Increases effectiveness of bleeding damage.
Now this a small (8 level) passive skill, which makes it desirable. However
before investing on this, really look at what weapons you have that cause
bleeding (no many do, and the damage is low).

Level	Bleeding damage
1	36%
2	48%
3	60%
4	72%
5	84%
6	96%
7	108%
8	120%


Mandrake (8 levels): active
Modifies envenom weapon and adds chance to confuse enemy. 1 energy per
second, chance to fumble attack for 3 seconds, chance to cause confusion

Another devious enhancement to envenom weapon. These are so good. This is
the tree you should spend the most points on, for a melee character.

Level	Chance fumble	Chance confusion	confusion duration
1	15%			12%			1.8-2.4
2	20%			16%			1.8-2.8
3	25%			20%			1.8-3.2
4	30%			24%			1.8-3.5
5	35%			28%			1.8-3.9
6	40%			32%			1.8-4.3
7	45%			36%			1.8-4.6
8	50%			40%			1.8-5.0

Shrapnel (10 levels): active
Modifies Poison gas bomb; bomb explodes with shrapnel (9-11 fragments) over
1.5m, causing bleeding damage for 3s and pierce damage
The poison gas bomb really helps in harder difficulties, to do some damage.
Although the poison gas method is slow, it gets the job done. You may
consider a few points in this, but really not that necessary.

Level	Energy cost		Bleed damage		Pierce damage
1	5			33			9
2	6			39			11
3	7			45			13
4	8			51			16
5	9			57			18
6	10			63			20
7	11			69			23
8	12			75			25
9	13			81			27
10	14			87			30


5.8.6 Rogue Tier 6
------------------------
Mortal wounds (8 levels) : active
Modifies lethal strike and magnifies bleeding and poison damage and 3
seconds of stun. 15 energy cost
This is the only skill which makes Lethal strike a consideration over other
skills for the melee character, making lethal strike a primary attack. A
must for the Lethal strike tree.

Level	Bleed damage		Poison damage
1	60%			60%
2	95%			95%
3	130%			130%
4	165%			165%
5	200%			200%
6	235%			235%
7	270%			270%
8	305%			305%

Flurry of knives (6 levels): active
Modifies Throwing knife adding multiple blades at once.
All I can say is that if you are using throwing knife, then add a few points
in this. However, this skill is hard to control.

Level	Energy cost		projectiles		Pierce damage bonus %
1	5			1			51
2	6			2			60
3	6			2			69
4	7			3			78
5	7			3			87
6	8			4			96

Improved firing mechanism (8 levels): active
Modifies Lay trap; Trap fires more rapidly and does more damage.
If you are using traps over poison bomb, because you are running away an
letting it the trap do the damage. Max this out.

Level	Projectiles	Chance pass thru %	Pierce damage	Trap Health
1	3		10			15%		30%
2	4		15			20%		35%
3	4		20			25%		40%
4	5		25			30%		45%
5	5		30			35%		50%
6	6		35			40%		55%
7	6		40			45%		60%
8	6		45			50%		65%

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.9 Spirit Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Spirit mastery is the mastery of the occult and undead. You can summon
undead to help you out, mind control, or just life zapping.

5.9.1 Spirit Tier 1
----------------------
Deathchill aura (6 levels): active
Aura slows and saps life from enemies. Also saps your life. 1 energy cost
per second, 1 second duration

The deathchill aura is a hit and miss, some people like it some not much.
However for 6 points, you may choose it. The reduced speed is the greatest
advantage (although you mostly will not need it in normal).

Level	radius		Reduce enemy health %		reduce speed %
1	2.5		1-3				13
2	2.7		1-4				15
3	3.0		2-5				17
4	3.2		2-6				19
5	3.4		3-7				21
6	3.7		3-9				25

Life drain (12 levels): active
Steal life from enemies
This skill is really nice, especially for high damage melee characters. It
have found that most monsters have bad vitality damage resists. However I
have to say that it does not help with the heavy hitting bosses in harder
levels, and you will need something to guard against the ranged attackers.

Level	Energy cost	Vitality damage		% damage convert to health
1	54		49			150
2	58		53			160
3	64		57			170
4	68		61			180
5	72		65			190
6	78		69			200
7	82		73			210
8	86		77			220
9	92		81			230
10	96		87			240
11	100		93			250
12	106		99			260

5.9.2 Spirit Tier 2
----------------------
Ternion Attack (12 levels): active
Fires three projectiles from your staff that go faster, and do more damage.
This the spirit skill tree to go for. Even at level 1 with the ¡V50% damage
it is a killer. Although you do not max this out initially, and only add a
few points, and invest the rest in Archane Lore on the same tree for the
area damage.

Level	Energy cost		Elemental damage
1	30			-50%
2	31			-45%
3	31			-40%
4	32			-35%
5	32			-31%
6	33			-27%
7	33			-23%
8	34			-19%
9	34			-15%
10	35			-11%
11	35			-7%
12	36			+5%

Ravages of time (8 levels): active
Modifies Deathchill aura; all enemy weapons dull and armor crumbles.1 energy
cost per sec.
If you are using death chill aura, maxing this out will give your melee
character twice the damage (-36% absorb, from an initial 66%). However, for
a ranged character this is not very useful because the range is small so the
pierce damage from archers probably will not be affected. For magic
characters, armor absorption is useless. Personally I skip this tree.


Level	Damage			Pierce damage		Armor absorption
1	-11%			-11%			-11%
2	-15%			-15%			-15%
3	-18%			-18%			-18%
4	-22%			-22%			-22%
5	-25%			-25%			-25%
6	-32%			-29%			-29%
7	-32%			-32%			-32%
8	-36%			-36%			-36%

Vision of death (6 levels): active
Fill the minds of enemies with fear and confusion, within 3m, causing them
to deal less damage for 3s and 66% chance to fumble attacks for 11s.
If you need a quick escape, this is better than any of the other fumble
skills in other masteries. Only six levels, which is nice. Not a mainstream
skill to invest in but nice to have sometimes.

Level	Energy cost		Reduced damage		Fear duration
1	55			3			3.0
2	60			5			3.5
3	65			7			4.1
4	70			9			4.6
5	75			11			5.2
6	80			13			5.9

Spirit ward (8 levels): active
Ward protects all from undead near you (6m).
If you are having problems with undead, this is the skill to have. You will
find undead quite difficult, due to high resistances and no bleed or life
leech from them. Not much use if you are handling them without problems.

Level	Energy cost /s		Damage to undead	Damage from undead
1	1			3			15%
2	1			5			18%
3	1			7			21%
4	1			9			25%
5	1			11			28%
6	2			13			31%
7	2			15			35%
8	2			17			39%

5.9.3 Spirit Tier 3
----------------------
Cascade (10 levels): active
Modifies Life drain; life drain arcs from enemy to enemy.
Vitality damage cannot be under estimated because there are so little
resistances to it. Not something to concentrate on, but a nice enhancement
to Life drain.

Level	Vitality damage		% damage to health
1	35			150
2	39			160
3	44			170
4	48			180
5	52			190
6	57			200
7	63			210
8	71			220
9	79			230
10	88			240

Dark Covenant (6 levels): active
Energy regeneration boost at the cost of life; -18 health per sec, 15 m
radius
Although just 6 skill levels, this is not really worth it. As a magic user,
one of your priorities would be high energy regeneration anyway. Stocking up
potions is another option. Skip this.

Level	Duration		Energy regen /s		Total speed
1	10			5			+9%
2	12			7			+11%
3	14			9			+14%
4	16			11			+16%
5	18			13			+18%
6	21			15			+21%

Summon Liche King (15 levels): active
Summons the spirit of an undead mage.
The Liche King has two attacks Spectral Bolt and soul blight (figures shown
with / seperator, left is for spectral bolt and right for soul blight)
Spectral bolt available at level 1 and has 15% attack damage converted to
health
Spectral bolt available at level 5 and has 33% attack damage converted to
health and reduce resistances for 8 seconds and radius of 6m.
The Lich King is the pet for Spirit. You will have mixed success with this
pet. In general invest a few points in it, but also remember to boost up the
enhancements to this skill.

	Energy	Spirit		-Elem	%	Vital	to	Reduce	Erg
Level	cost	Health/Energy	Damage	health	Damage		cost	Res%
1	250	369/307		13/0	3/0	19/0		0/0	0/0	
2	258	389/324		16/0	3/0	23/0		0/0	0/0
3	266	408/341		20/0	4/0	27/0		0/0	0/0
4	274	426/358		24/0	4/0	30/0		0/0	0/0
5	282	446/375		28/0	6/33	34/0		0/32	0/13%
6	290	465/392		31/0	6/33	38/0		0/33	0/17%
7	298	483/409		35/0	6/33	41/0		0/35	0/20%
8	306	503/426		39/0	7/33	45/0		0/36	0/23%
9	314	522/443		43/0	7/33	49/0		0/38	0/27%
10	322	540/460		46/0	9/33	52/0		0/39	0/30%
11	330	560/477		50/0	9/33	56/0		0/41	0/33%
12	338	579/494		54/0	9/33	60/0		0/42	0/37%
13	346	597/511		58/0	10/33	63/0		0/44	0/40%
14	354	617/528		61/0	10/33	67/0		0/45	0/45%
15	362	636/545		65/0	12/33	71/0		0/47	0/47%

Spirit Bane (6 levels): active
Modifies spirit ward; nearby allies do extra damage to undead. 1 energy cost
per second.
As said before if you have problems with undead (mainly skeletons), this is
a great skill. Add an extra damage to undead from relic or charm and undead
will be flying across the screen.

Level	Damage % to undead		Damage to undead
1	33				9
2	37				13
3	42				17
4	46				21
5	50				25
6	55				29

5.9.4 Spirit Tier 4
-----------------------
Arcane Lore (6 levels): active
Modifies Ternion attack and adds speed boost and area damage. 4 energy cost
If you have ternion attack (even one point) max this out, and see the power
of ternion attack. This gives a speed boost, but most important an area
boost, so it damages enemies around the target. If you max both, mobs get
killed in one shot. However, Ternion is only magic based attack and later
difficulties you really need to compensate for the high elemental resists.

Level	radius		Projectile speed
1	1.5		+10%
2	1.7		+18%
3	1.9		+26%
4	2.1		+34%
5	2.3		+42%
6	2.5		+50%

Necrosis (8 levels): active
Modifies deathchill aura and makes enemies susceptible to life-sapping
attacks. 1 energy cost per second.
Death chill has not been my favorite because better life regen may be nice
but definitely can be replace by potions. Design your character carefully
and don't rush into mobs, and this skill is really useless.

Level	Bleed/Vitality/Life leech
1	-23%	
2	-32%
3	-39%
4	-48%
5	-56%
6	-65%
7	-72%
8	-81%

Enslave spirit (12 levels): active
Control the mind of an enemy for a while.
This skill is fun, but definitely pretty useless. There are no boosts, so
you will find harder levels, the monsters just don't get controlled. High
energy cost makes it even worse.

Level	Energy cost		Duration (seconds)
1	90			36-48
2	92			40-54
3	94			44-60
4	96			48-66
5	98			52-72
6	100			56-78
7	102			60-84
8	104			64-90
9	106			68-96
10	108			72-102
11	110			76-108
12	112			80-114

Death Nova (12 levels): active
Modifies summon Liche king; deadly aura that saps the life and strength of
enemies. Radius 6m, 50% attack damage converted to health
The lich King only shines when you start adding these enhancements. If you
rely on one, add a point. Death Nova is not very good, but it unlocks
further skills for the Liche King which is essential for its survival.


Level	Energy cost		Reduce to		Vitality
				Enemy health		Damage
1	60			11%			33
2	62			13%			42
3	63			15%			50
4	66			17%			60
5	67			19%			68
6	69			21%			77
7	71			23%			85
8	73			25%			95
9	74			27%			103
10	77			29%			112
11	78			31%			120
12	80			33%			130	

5.9.5 Spirit Tier 5
----------------------
Unearthly power (8 levels) : active
Modifies Dark covenant and adds better attack speed, damage is converted to
life, plus extra elemental damage.
Dark covenant is a relatively useless skill, but this enhancement is really
a very nice skill enhancement. It is something to consider if you are having
difficulty in later levels.

Level	Health/sec	Physical/Elemental/Vitality damage
1	10		+8%
2	10		+14%
3	11		+20%
4	11		+26%
5	12		+32%
6	12		+38%
7	13		+44%
8	13		+50%

Wraith shell (12 level): active
Modifies summon liche king and adds increased resistances of all damage
types. 50 energy cost, 2 active energy per second. 33% damage resistance.
This is another must for the Lich King to keep it alive later on. Sometimes
the lich king seems to be very lame, and dies quickly, adding this may not
help in those levels, but certainly a bit later on.

Level	Damage absorb
1	19%
2	24%
3	28%
4	33%
5	38%
6	42%
7	47%
8	51%
9	56%
10	61%
11	65%
12	70%

Circle of power (12 levels): active
Create a circle that protects against the undead for 12 seconds, 6m radius
Nice to have if you are having problems with undead, but it is not powerful
enough for higher difficulties, even when maxed out.

Level	Energy cost		Damage to undead
1	64			17
2	68			21
3	72			25
4	76			30
5	80			34
6	84			39
7	88			43
8	92			49
9	96			54
10	100			60
11	104			67
12	108			75

5.9.6 Spirit Tier 6
----------------------
Death ward (8 levels): active
This will heal you if your life goes too low. Activates when health goes
below 15%, 3 second duration
This is the life saver, this is a nice skill, but not essential for the
spirit character. However this skill has a long, and I mean long recharge
time, so really be careful after you have used it once.

Level	Health restored
1	330
2	360
3	390
4	420
5	450
6	480
7	510
8	540

Summon Outsider (15 levels): active
Summon an extra-dimensional ally (Ether lord) for short duration
Ether lord attacks base attributes: 200 arc of attack, 3 targets, 33%
reduction in enemy health
A lot of people have given this guy a lot of praise and prefer it over the
Lich King. I agree that this is a better pet than the Lich King, but the
fact is that it is a high energy cost spell, and really should be used for
bosses. But it fails because really 58s is not a lot of time for a boss, and
the recharge time is so long.

			Minion		Minion				Elemental
Level	Energy cost	Life time	Health/Energy	Ergy cost	Damage
1	285		30		1065/518	27		75-115
2	290		32		1130/536	29		83-124
3	295		34		1195/554	31		91-132
4	300		36		1260/572	33		98-140
5	305		38		1325/590	35		105-148
6	310		40		1390/608	37		113-157
7	315		42		1455/626	39		120-165
8	320		44		1520/644	41		128-173
9	325		46		1585/662	43		135-181
10	330		48		1620/680	45		143-190
11	335		50		1715/698	47		150-196
12	340		52		1780/716	49		158-206
13	345		54		1845/734	51		165-214
14	350		56		1910/752	53		173-223
15	355		58		1975/770	55		180-231

Arcane blast (16 levels): active
Modifies Summon Liche King and adds a new powerful attack.
Attack base attributes: 1 second of stun,15% slowed for 1.5 seconds
This is a very nice mob killer for the liche king. Put a few points into it.
Again remember you will get mixed performance from the lich king on
different difficulties and area, but without this your Lich King will be
pretty useless.

Level	Energy cost	Projectiles	Elemental damage	Vitality damage
1	32		2		51			15
2	33		2		56			19
3	36		3		61			23
4	38		3		66			26
5	39		3		73			30
6	40		3		77			33
7	42		3		82			37		
8	42		3		87			41
9	46		4		92			44
10	47		4		100			49	
11	49		4		104			52
12	50		4		110			56
13	51		4		114			59
14	52		4		120			63
15	55		5		129			69
16	57		5		133			72

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.10 Storm Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Storm is the magic users lightning and ice spells. Mainly spells of the ice
and lightning type, and mostly active skills, meaning you will probably need
a matching passive skill mastery.

5.10.1 Storm Tier 1
------------------------
Ice shard (12 levels): active
Fires a deadly sliver of ice which slows enemies 15% for 1.5 seconds
You only have two skills at tier one of the storm tree. If you go the cold
way, a few initial points into this is nice. However this will benefit from
The heart of frost, which incidentally is in the second skill tree.

Level	Energy cost		Cold damage
1	21			16-25
2	23			20-31
3	25			23-36
4	27			28-43
5	29			32-47
6	31			36-53
7	33			39-58
8	35			44-64
9	37			48-68
10	39			52-73
11	41			55-77
12	43			60-83
	
Storm nimbus (10 levels):Active
Adds elemental damage to attacks. 1 energy cost per second, 75 energy
reserve
Chance of a cold damage or lightning damage but not both

This is not really a good skill to look at, but the skill enhancements is
very nice. Invest not to many points in this skill, but put at least one to
open up the tree.

Level	Cold damage		Lightning damage
1	3			1-21
2	4			3-27
3	7			5-33
4	10			7-38
5	12			9-44
6	14			11-50
7	16			13-55
8	19			15-61
9	21			17-67
10	23			19-75


5.10.2 Storm Tier 2
------------------------
Spell breaker (6 levels): active
Dispel enemy enchantments, skill disruption and drain energy, 6m radius,
+50% damage to magical
I have never effectively used this skill, (which may mean it is very good).
The energy drain really looks nice, but damage to magical seems very
useless, considering the number of monsters which are magical.

Level	Energy cost		Energy drained		Damage to magical
1	32			24%			15
2	34			32%			30
3	36			40%			45
4	38			50%			60
5	40			58%			75
6	42			66%			90


Thunderball (12 levels):active
Hurl a stunning ball of electricity; 1.8m radius
This is a great attacking storm skill. If you have no ranged magical
attacks, this is better than ice shard.

Level	Energy cost		Lightning damage	Second of stun
1	50			7-31			1.5
2	53			11-36			1.8
3	56			16-40			2.1
4	59			22-46			2.5
5	62			26-50			2.8
6	65			30-55			3.1
7	68			35-59			3.4
8	71			41-65			3.8
9	74			45-69			4.1	
10	77			49-74			4.4
11	80			54-78			4.7
12	83			60-84			5.1	

Heart of Frost (8 levels): active
Modifies storm nimbus and slows attacking and movement of enemies for 3s,
extra cold damage, +25 energy reserve

This is a must for storm users. Although it only enhances cold damage, the
slow movement % really shines. I recommend really to max this skill.

Level	Cold damage		Slow attack/movement
1	10%			-10%
2	16%			-15%
3	22%			-19%
4	28%			-24%
5	34%			-27%
6	40%			-31%
7	46%			-34%
8	52%			-38%

5.10.3 Storm Tier 3
------------------------
Spell shock (8 levels): active
Modifies spell breaker and adds damage and extra disruption
I have not really considered the spell breaker tree, but this really looks
like something interesting.

Level	Energy cost	% Drain cause damage	Duration of skill disruption
1	15		30%			3.0
2	16		45%			3.6
3	18		60%			4.2
4	20		75%			4.8
5	22		90%			5.4
6	24		105%			6.0
7	26		120%			6.6
8	28		135%			7.2


Velocity (8 levels): active
Modifies ice shard; Fires shards faster for more damage, and chance to pass
through enemies.
Cold characters, this is a must. Increasing cold damage by a percentage and
together with Heart of Frost, you can boost your cold damage enough to make
it useful even harder difficulties.

Level	Energy cost	Chance pass through	Cold damage	Projectile speed
1	2		18%			+10%		+15%		
2	2		24%			+16%		+20%
3	3		30%			+22%		+25%
4	3		36%			+28%		+30%
5	3		42%			+34%		+35%
6	4		48%			+40%		+40%
7	4		54%			+46%		+45%
8	4		60%			+52%		+50%

Squall (12 levels): active
Enemy projectiles are all swept off course in area of squall for 6 seconds.
Chance of lightning damage and chance of impaired aim for 1 second
Squall is a strange skill, where when you first try it, it is pretty lame.
However, I discovered it's strength at Epic difficulty where it really saves
lives against those archers.

				Chance		Lightning	Chance
Level	Energy cost	Radius	Lightning	Damage		Impaired aim
1	52		4.0	30%		3-21		50%
2	57		4.8	38%		7-25		55%
3	60		5.6	45%		11-29		60%
4	64		6.3	51%		14-32		65%
5	67		6.9	57%		18-36		70%
6	70		7.5	62%		22-40		75%
7	74		8.0	67%		25-83		80%
8	77		8.5	71%		29-47		85%
9	80		9.0	75%		33-51		90%
10	84		9.4	79%		36-54		95%
11	87		9.8	82%		40-58		100%
12	90		10.2	85%		44-62		100%

Freezing blast (8 levels): active
Traps enemies in ice , but makes them harder to damage (85% damage
absorption)
This is not very useful, because of the damage absorption bonus it give.
However for the cold player this is the equivalent of stun, and used as a
escape route maker rather than attack spell.

Level	Energy cost	Duration	Radius		Cold damage
1	50		3.0		1.8		3
2	54		3.4		2.1		5
3	58		3.8		2.4		6
4	62		4.2		2.7		8
5	66		4.6		3.0		10
6	70		5.0		3.3		12
7	74		5.4		3.6		13
8	78		5.8		3.9		15


5.10.4 Storm Tier 4
-------------------------
Lightning bolt (12 levels): active
Strike down enemies with your own lightning bolt and adds 1 second of stun

This is the lightning skill but really not worth the effort. Even maxed out,
the radius is 1.6m which is really small. If you are a main storm character,
make sure you have ¡Vrecharge for lightning attacks, they are slow to
recharge.


Level	Energy cost		Radius		Lightning damage
1	80			0.5		51-109
2	88			0.6		63-133
3	96			0.7		74-156
4	104			0.8		86-178
5	112			0.9		97-202
6	120			1.0		109-225
7	128			1.1		120-247
8	136			1.2		132-271
9	144			1.3		143-294
10	152			1.4		155-316
11	160			1.5		166-340
12	168			1.6		178-363

Concussive blast (8 levels): active
Modifies thunderball and increases radius (1.5m), adds electrical fragments
Thunderball is a nice area spell and this enhancement makes it better. The
energy cost is low making this very attractive.

Level	Energy cost	Fragments	Lightning damage	Seconds of stun
1	14		2-3		3-11			1.0
2	15		2-4		6-16			1.2
3	16		2-4		9-22			1.5
4	18		3-5		12-27			1.7
5	19		3-5		15-32			1.9
6	20		4-5		18-38			2.3
7	22		4-6		21-43			2.5
8	23		5-6		24-48			2.8

Obscured visibility (6 levels): active
Modifies Squall; enemy attack and defense are reduced inside squall. Reduce
damage and resistances for 6 seconds
As I mentioned earlier squall really shine when used against those pesky
archers. With this enhancement your get even better, Obscure visibility
really messes them archers up. Now with reduced resistances, and reduced
damage, it makes squall useful even for non archer monsters.

Level	Energy cost		Reduced damage		Reduced resistances
1	6			10%			10%
2	7			14%			14%
3	8			18%			18%
4	9			22%			22%
5	10			26%			26%
6	11			30%			30%

Static charge (12 levels): active
Modifies storm nimbus, adds 15% chance of lightning retaliation damage and
extra lightning damage. 25 energy reserve
If you are a lightning character this is the skill to max out. This does to
lightning what heart of frost does to cold.

Level	Lightning damage	Lightning retaliation
1	10%			54
2	16%			66
3	22%			78
4	28%			90
5	34%			102
6	40%			114
7	46%			126
8	52%			138
9	58%			150
10	64%			162
11	70%			174
12	74%			186		

Energy shield (12 levels): active
Blocks elemental damage (Lightning and cold only)

An active skill that blocks cold and lightning. Very fitting for a storm
player. Nice to have but not essential. This skill has a longish recharge
time.

Level	Energy cost		Damage absorption
1	60			125
2	64			149
3	68			174
4	72			198
5	76			223
6	80			247
7	84			272
8	88			296
9	92			321
10	96			345
11	100			370
12	104			394

5.10.5 Storm Tier 5

Torrent (8 levels): active
Modifies Ice shard; fires multiple shard, adds frostburn damage for 3s.
This is another nice addition to the cold characters, and as ice shard is a
ranged character you will benefit from the frostburn damage, and the slow
from heart of frost will mean more time to work damage before they reach
you.

Level	Energy cost		Projectiles	Frostburn damage
1	14			1		21
2	16			1		33
3	21			2		39
4	23			2		48
5	28			3		57
6	30			3		63
7	32			3		69
8	38			4		78

Summon wisp (15 levels): active
Summon a storm wisp to fight with you. 200 energy cost
Ability 1: Plasma burn (lightning damage only)
Ability 2: Dodge attack (no lightning, 99% dodge attacks and projectiles)
Ability 3: Level 5 or above: Thunderclap ; 3m radius

The wisp, as a storm character one point in the wisp is almost default.
Although low health, this guy can really survive. Do use it as a main pet,
or rely on it too much. But just like wolves in the nature mastery the wisp
can be a great secondary pet.

			Ability 1	Ability 3	Ability 3	Ability 3											Stun
Level	Health	Energy	Light dam	Ergy cost	Lightning dam	duration
1	153	186	6-25		0		0		0
2	165	195	9-28		0		0		0
3	177	204	11-31		0		0		0
4	189	213	15-34		0		0		0
5	201	222	17-38		31		36-51		0.5-1.0
6	213	231	21-41		32		41-57		0.6-1.1
7	225	240	24-44		33		45-65		0.6-1.2
8	237	249	29-48		34		50-73		0.6-1.3
9	249	258	32-51		35		55-80		0.7-1.4
10	261	267	36-55		36		60-88		0.8-1.5
11	273	276	40-58		37		65-95		0.8-1.6
12	285	285	46-62		38		70-104		0.9-1.7
13	297	294	50-66		39		76-113		0.9-1.8
14	309	303	55-69		40		85-126		0.9-1.9
15	321	312	59-74		41		94-140		1.0-2.0

Storm surge (12 levels): active
15% chance to release energy damage when hit. 5m radius, 1.5 s of stun, +150
energy reserve

Can be nice but really due to low chance, it is not worth putting points
into it unless you have points to spare.

Level	Cold damage		Lightning damage
1	25			3-43
2	30			9-50
3	36			15-57
4	43			23-63
5	49			30-73
6	54			37-80
7	60			43-87
8	67			50-96
9	73			56-104
10	80			63-112
11	88			69-123
12	97			77-134

5.10.6 Storm Tier 6
-------------------------
Chain lightning (12 levels) : Active
Modifies lightning bolt; cause bolt to leap from enemy to enemy. 0.5 seconds
of stun

Nice lightning effect. This is the area damage for lightning and together
with squall, the lightning character can kill before the monsters even know
what hit them.

Level	Lightning damage
1	31-53
2	41-69
3	53-84
4	65-101
5	74-115
6	86-130
7	96-145
8	107-163
9	117-177
10	128-192
11	138-207
12	150-226

Eye of the storm (8 levels): active
Modifies summon wisp; wisp enhances lightning and cold damage to allies for
30 seconds. 14m radius.
This is a must even if you put one point into wisp. Add this to make you
wisp more useful as a shield.

				Cold/Lightning		Cold/Lightning
Level	Energy cost		damage			Resistance
1	30			30%			12%
2	32			40%			15%
3	35			50%			18%
4	37			60%			21%
5	39			70%			24%
6	42			80%			27%
7	44			90%			33%
8	46			100%			33%

Reflection : active
Modifies Energy shield and adds general retaliation damage. 30 energy cost

Because of the high tier, I have not really used this skill. It must be
useful, but the scare skill points in higher difficulty, means I have not
had time to try this skill out. The low chance does make this skill less
tempting.

Level	Chance		Damage reflected
1	5%		25%
2	6%		33%
3	7%		41%
4	8%		49%
5	9%		57%
6	10%		65%
7	10%		73%
8	11%		81%

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
5.11 Warfare Mastery Skill Bonuses
----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Needless to say warfare is for the melee character. Weapon training is a
must, as it increases damage early in the game, and is also based on
percentages. There are skills to boost attack and attack speed for both
single player and multiplayer.
This skill in general is slightly below par, when compared to the others,
but not terrible. The stats bonuses are slightly lower, and some skills are
not very useful.

5.11.1 Warfare Tier 1
---------------------------
Weapon training (6) passive
Increase attack speed and offense with melee weapons
If you are going the warfare path, this is the skill to max out, and will
help regardless of what path you are going to take.

Level	Offense ability		Attack speed
1	10%			5%
2	14%			8%
3	18%			10%
4	24%			12%
5	38%			14%
6	32%			16%
7	36%			18%

Battle rage : (12) passive
Chance to enter extra-lethal state when hit. 8% chance of +50% offense
ability for 10s.

This s a passive skill so it helps pretty much by itself. You will find this
is a great skill for normal level, but later on in harder difficulties, this
is useless, and you will be relying on other skills.

Level	Damage bonus
1	5
2	8
3	10
4	12
5	15
6	18
7	20
8	24
9	27
10	30
11	33
12	38

Onslaught (8) active
Build up a charge that increases damage. 1 energy
Onslaught very nice for any melee character and recommended, especially the
enhancements later on. Use it as you main attack and at one energy, even a
pure melee can and should handle this.

Level	Damage bonus		charges
1	10%			1
2	15%			2
3	19%			3
4	20%			4
5	31%			5
6	37%			6
7	42%			7
8	50%			8

5.11.2 Warfare Tier 2
---------------------------
Dual weld (6) passive
Fighting with weapon in each hand.

It may seem that dual weapon is pretty bad idea for a melee character but
the fact that a shield requires a 3s recharge to block again makes this a
good option, especially if you do not have Defense as your other mastery.

Level	Chance
1	12%
2	14%
3	16%
4	18%
5	20%
6	22%

Dodge attack (6) passive
Chance to dodge melee attacks.
This is a good passive skill to invest in especially if you dual weld and do
not have the protection from a shield. Although 15% chance maxed does not
seem that much, it will prove invaluable in a lot of circumstances.

Level	Chance
1	3%
2	6%
3	8%
4	10%
5	12%
6	15%
7	16%

Ignore pain (6) active
Modifies Onslaught; Charge lets you ignore some damage.
If you use onslaught, then this is a skill you need. Even if you just invest
one point in onslaught for the slight added damage bonus, you should have
more points in this skill.

Level	Damage resistance		Pierce resistance
1	3%				3%
2	6%				6%
3	8%				8%
4	10%				10%
5	12%				12%
6	14%				14%

War horn (10) active
Stun enemies with your war horn within a radius of 12m
This is not a main warfare skill mainly because of the high energy cost (for
a strength based character), and also because in harder difficulties, many
monsters have stun resistances. If you want to use this you should invest in
Triumph (battle standard tree), as it reduced stun resistance, making this
skill worthwhile.

Level	Energy cost		Stun duration
1	52			1.5 ¡V 3.0
2	54			1.5 ¡V 3.5
3	56			1.5 ¡V 3.9
4	57			1.5 ¡V 4.3
5	60			1.5 ¡V 4.6
6	62			1.5 ¡V 5.0
7	64			1.5 ¡V 5.3
8	66			1.5 ¡V 5.6
9	68			1.5 ¡V 6.0
10	70			1.5 ¡V 6.5


5.11.3 Warfare Tier 3
---------------------------
Hew (6) passive
Modifies Dual weapon; Chance to attack with a jump for massive damage (+50%
damage).
This is not really a enhancement for the dual weapon, skip it if you wish.

Level	Chance
1	3%
2	4%
3	6%
4	7%
5	9%
6	10%

Crushing blow (12) passive
Modifies battle rage and adds chance to cause bonus extra
Battle rage is not good, and in harder difficulties, you will not use it.
This enhancement does not really make it any better.

Level	chance		damage
1	10%		16-57
2	10%		19-61
3	10%		24-67
4	12%		27-71
5	12%		34-79
6	12%		38-84
7	12%		42-89
8	14%		46-94
9	14%		50-99
10	14%		56-106
11	14%		61-112
12	16%		64-116


Battle standard (10) active
Increases melee ability of allies in range. Adds +1 all skills bonus for all
allies in 12m radius. 50 energy cost
This is a very good skill in the warfare, because of the group factor and
the +1 all skills, which is such a great bonus. Problem is that your have to
guard it to prevent it being destroyed, and it lasts only a short time with
high cost. However, together with Triumph, this can make killing mobs
easier. You should be aware that there is a longish recharge time, but not
too long.

Level	duration	health	damage	all skill duration	offense ability
1	18s		180	15%	24s			40
2	20s		210	18%	30s			50
3	22s		240	23%	36s			60
4	24s		270	26%	43s			70
5	26s		300	29%	48s			80
6	28s		330	34%	54s			90
7	30s		360	37%	60s			100
8	32s		390	40%	66s			110
9	34s		420	45%	72s			120
10	36s		450	50%	78s			130

War wind (8) active
Spin attack (360 degree arc), 4 targets.
This is a nice attack, but uses a lot of energy. Although not a primary
attacking skill, I would recommend it if you have a lot of slow attack
bonuses; do a war wind to slow the attackers then normal attack to clean
them out. I would not really put more than one point on this skill, and zero
if you do not have slow attack bonuses.

Level	energy		damage bonus
1	75		-25
2	79		-20
3	83		-15
4	87		-10
5	91		-5
6	95		5
7	99		10
8	103		15

5.11.4 Warfare Tier 4
---------------------------
Cross cut (6) passive
Modifies Dual weapon; Chance to hit two enemies with one attack, 90 arc, two
targets.
Nice to have and a good addition on the dual weld tree. Only six points to
max, although 10% is a bit small.

Level	Chance
1	3%
2	4%
3	6%
4	7%
5	9%
6	10%

Hamstring (6) active
Modifies onslaught; Slows enemies and lowers defense 3 seconds, reduce armor
for 6 sec, and slow movement for 5s.
On the onslaught tree, the ignore pain is much better to max than this. The
reduce armor and reduce defense is really very small in later difficulties,
and you will need modifiers to really take advantage of this. The slow is
for slow movement which allows you to escape, but does not slow attacks.

Level	reduce defense		reduce armor		slow
1	8			8			10%
2	12			12			15%
3	16			16			20%
4	20			20			25%
5	24			24			30%
6	28			28			35%

5.11.5 Warfare Tier 5
----------------------------
Counter attack (12 levels): passive
Modifies battle rage and adds chance to cause retaliation damage. The battle
rage tree is pretty lame. This modifier again has low damage (for higher
difficulties) and the chance is not high. However the only advantage is that
it is passive.

Level	Chance		Damage retaliation
1	6		18-31
2	7		20-35
3	8		23-38
4	9		25-40
5	9		30-46
6	10		33-49
7	10		35-53
8	11		38-56
9	11		40-58
10	12		45-64
11	12		48-67
12	13		50-71

Triumph (6 levels): active
Reduces melee ability of enemies in range (8m), -50% stun resistance.
If you have battle standard, this should be maxed out once you have the
chance, even before you max out battle standard. For just 6 points enemies
do ¡V40% less damage and have less damage resistance.

Level	Damage		Damage resistance
1	-15%		-15%
2	-20%		-20%
3	-25%		-25%
4	-30%		-30%
5	-35%		-35%
6	-40%		-40%

Lacerate (8 levels): active
Adds bleeding damage over 3 second, 20 energy cost.
Bleeding damage is nice, because like pierce, it is not absorbed by armor.
However, for melee, the main objective is to kill as fast as possible, and
not use over time (which gives enemy more time to hit you). Invest if you
wish but the damage is not really great.

Level	Targets		Bleeding damage
1	1		19
2	1		27
3	1		35
4	1		44
5	2		50
6	2		58
7	2		66
8	2		75

Doom horn (6 levels): active
Also reduces enemy life and armor for 10 seconds. 20 Energy cost
Doom horn is a great high level skill and for 20 energy cost it is not bad.
Doom Horn saved me a few times. The reduction in health and armor is great,
but make sure you kill them in 10 seconds.

Level	Reduced health		Reduced armor
1	9%			12
2	12%			16
3	15%			20
4	18%			24
5	21%			28
6	25%			33		

5.11.6 Warfare Tier 6

Tumult (6 levels): passive
Chance to execute spin attack 360 degrees arc at 3 targets
Spin attacks are not really that effective, unless you can get one hit
kills, in later difficulties this can be hard. The only advantage is using
it in combination with slow attack bonuses. As for a maxed out 10% chance,
you are better off using the low level active war wind, which hits four
targets.

Level	Chance
1	3%
2	4%
3	6%
4	7%
5	9%
6	10%

Ardor (6 levels): active
Charge increases attack and movement speed.
This skill is only 6 levels and has a 16% increase, which is a noticeable
difference. In later difficulties, you will gain advantage as the speeds
stack. The only big disadvantage is that it is active, so to stack you need
to active, which means allocating to quick slot which is not really that
desirable in harder difficulties.

Level	Movement	Attack speed
1	6%		6%
2	8%		8%
3	10%		10%
4	12%		12%
5	14%		14%
6	16%		16%

Ancestral horn (15 levels): active
Summon ancestral heroes to your aid for 24 seconds. 190 energy cost
I really did not think much of this skill, being a melee character and did
not want pets to do my fighting. The health and damage seemed low for higher
difficulties also. However the melee character really struggles in harder
difficulties and to be honest these guys are a good shield, especially if
you have no buffer against those ranged attacker. Invest in this skill, if
your are primary melee, they will save your life in harder difficulties.
This skill has a very long recharge time, so higher health is a big
advantage.

Level	Summon limit		Health		Energy		Damage
1	3			330		300		47-53
2	3			360		300		52-61
3	3			390		300		47-68
4	3			420		300		62-75
5	4			450		300		69-86
6	4			480		300		74-93
7	4			510		300		79-100
8	4			540		300		84-108
9	4			570		300		91-118
10	5			600		300		96-125
11	5			630		300		101-133
12	5			660		300		106-140
13	5			690		300		115-151
14	5			720		300		120-159
15	5			750		300		125-166


==========================================================================
6. Combat and character builds
==========================================================================

6.1 Combat
---------------

6.1.1 Melee and ranged
-----------------------------
There are two types of combat, melee and ranged (or more accurate close
range and long range). Close range tends to do more damage and lose more
health, whilst long range tends to be slower and less damage. According to
the manual ranged attacks always hit (if it strikes the target, and not off
to side). Melee on the other hand can miss. Anyway I think the logic is that
ranged will hit but amount of damaged determined after all resistances are
taken into account. Melee on the other hand may or may not hit, depending on
offense ability and defense ability. But when it the damage is less affected
by resistances and more on armor. This works both ways, in other words the
same method of calculation of hit and damage of monsters attacking you.

In general each character should have both long range and short range
attacks. This does not mean that magical users will have to hold a sword;
there are short-range magical attacks such as the flame surge (Earth). For
ranged characters (bows, magic), it is best to have a short range attack
that allows you go gain a quick escape route. For a melee character, a long-
range weapon allows you to pick of a few of the crowd as well as those pesky
magical users and archers.

6.1.2 types of damage
----------------------------
There are three types of damage;
i) Physical damage. This subtracts the health upon successful hit once per
hit.

ii) Time based damage. This will subtract health over a period of time,
after a hit is successful. For example, burning, poison, bleeding.

iii) Magical damage: This is one of damage and damage depends on whether the
roll (internal dice rolls) against the targets resistance is successful.

In addition certain attacks have an effect, such as slowing you down,
reducing your stats, stunning you, or stopping you from moving.
As you play the game you will notice monsters using these various methods,
and it goes to say that you should have a variety of these attacks, as
different monsters are susceptible to different types of damage. I have
found that for weapon based characters (bows, axes, swords, spears, knives)
having a few different weapons with different properties very useful. Rings
and amulets with a variety of different resistances is also useful in
inventory. You should sell those you do not need e.g. a ring with 11% fire
resistance and a ring with 15% fire resistance, sell the 11% ring, and keep
the 15% either equipped or in inventory until you need it. Keeping unused
items may take up some room, but let me tell you, you will not run out of
money, merchants normally sell rubbish, and you sell more than you buy.
Have a weapon for physical damage, and some for elemental damage and some
for bleeding damage etc. Bows should have bleeding and poison damage, as it
allows you to fire at one target, let the damage work on them whilst firing
at another target. Magical users are not left out; look for attacks with
elemental damage as well as physical damage, for example the Earth master
has Volcanic Orb which deals both physical and fire damage.
Relics and charms also have a use in that you can add other types of damage
to  existing weapons damage, so you do not need as many types. Piercing,
bleeding and poison damage is great. Close range combat, you may have fire,
lightning damages to add to your physical damage.

Here are some brief explanation of each type of damage.

Damage/Physical damage: This is damage done by physical weapons, such as
knives, swords, axes, bows, maces and spears. The damage is immediate. +%
damage will increase your damage to your weapon, but will not affect damage
if you are not inflicting physical damage. Physical damage is absorbed by
armor.

% pierce : Some weapons have a % pierce. This is the percentage of the
damage inflicted is done by piercing. For example if your weapon has 25%
pierce and inflicts 100 hp damage, then 75 will be physical and 25 will be
pierce damage. Pierce damage is NOT reduced by armor. Pierce is affected by
pierce resistance.

Elemental damage : This is fire/lightning/cold damage. This is not affected
by armor but by the fire/cold/lightning resistances. Elemental is increased
by +% fire/cold/lightning/elemental modifiers (if you use attack using fire,
lightning or cold).

Bleeding damage : Normally most weapons does not produce bleeding damage.
Bleeding is like pierce but works over time. Bleeding damage is gained from
weapons and skill modifiers. You can get more bleeding damage using +%
bleeding (but only if you have bleeding damage from a skill or weapon). The
bleeding damage is affected by the bleeding resistance.

Poison damage : Similar to bleeding but for poison, and is affected by
poison resistance.

Burn damage : This is the fire equivalent over time damage. It is affected
by the fire resistance.

Frostburn : This is the cold equivalent over time damage. It is affected by
cold resistance.

+damage to undead/beasts/demons/magical¡K : Exactly what it says, increased
the physical damage to the monster type.

+% damage to undead/beasts/demons/magical¡K : This is a better version and
increases damage of all types to the type of monster.


Vitality/Life leech : This is over time health damage. In other words
reduces your health over a period of time if hit. This is protected by
vitality resistance (note: There is a bug that shows an incorrect value for
your vitality resistance).

Energy leech : Same as life leech, but protected by energy leech resistance.

%damage converted to health: This converts a % of the damage you inflict
into your health. Life leech/vitality is over time, this is immediate, and
also this increases your health, life leech does not. This is dependant on
the damage your inflict (or receive).

X% stun for y seconds: If you hit the target with a weapon which has stun,
then there is a chance the target will be stunned. If so, a check against
the stun resistance, if the check (virtual dice roll) fails then the target
is stunned.

X% skill disruption for y seconds: Just like stun, but stops you or your
target from using skills instead. Checks against skill disruption
resistance.

X% reduction health : Immediate reduction in the health of enemy by the
amount stated.

6.1.3 Weapons and casting speed
-----------------------------------------

Weapons all have a speed attribute, which is very important, however they
tend to be balanced in the sense fast weapons deal less damage than slow
weapons. However, use your relics and charms to speed up weapons or increase
damage. For dual weapon fighters, two fast weapons will do more damage
quicker than one slow weapon. Relics are important not just to add attack
attributes, you can use relics to increase you offensive ability or to
increase you attack speed making a slow weapon at least average in speed.

Slowing down the monsters can counter your slow weapon problems. Bonuses
such as slow movement or slow attack should be treasured, it can reduce the
damage you take as well as deal more damage in the same amount of time. Just
imagine a slow enemy attack combined with a very fast weapon can do for a
melee character.

6.1.4 Local and area attacks
-----------------------------

Previously I have mentioned the type attack strategies of melee and long
ranged attack, and also the types of damage these attacks can inflict. In
addition it should be noted that TQ has localized and area attack for melee,
ranged (bow) and magical attacks.

A character should have some skills and/or equipment that allows them to
attack locally or an area. High local damage is great for bosses, and can
handle monsters in most cases. Area damage is less idea for bosses but can
clear out a mob of monsters really quickly. Whilst are skills are not really
needed, they will really help you out in later difficulties.

Close ranged attacks:
For melee, the localized attack is basically the weapon hitting the monster.
Only one monster is affected by your damage. The area attack for this type
of melee is something like war wind (warfare skill) which allows you to hit
more than one monster on each attack.
For magic users, the localized skill is just the same, a blast at the enemy
with a single shot. Any monster next to the monster being hit is not
affected regardless of how close they are. The area effect of close range
magic use is like the flame surge or ring of fire (Earth mastery).

Bow attacks:
It is obvious that for bow attacks each arrow will strike the intended
target and that target only. However skills such as scatter shot (hunting)
can make arrows explode on impact.

Long ranged magical
Ranged magical attacks using a staff only hits one monster, even if you use
lightning (which should be conductive, but is not). Anyway the point is that
no matter what the animation looks like, staff blast only affect the monster
you hit. Many magical masteries, have skills which has area effect, such as
volcanic orb(Earth) and Ternion attack (spirit). You should invest in these
skills and their enhancements, in order to do more damage in a shorter time.

6.1.5 Choosing the right equipment
--------------------------------------------

Equipment is very important, not just weapons. Melee characters should have
high armor to increase defensive ability as well as items that improve
offensive ability. Heavy magic users should use items to increase
intelligence and speed up casting and also energy and energy regeneration.

Never equip an item you do not need. I have seen so many people equip an
"epic" or "legendary" item just because they are very rare. Bad idea. Only
equip it if you need it. What is equipping a 25 armor, 150% energy
regeneration, +50% fire damage, +50 energy, 1-25% lightning damage epic
piece of armor going to help a fighter with a blade which does physical
damage only. You might as well just have a 48 armor normal armor instead.

Also avoid equipment that increases your stats that you do not need. For
example, magic users should not have armor that enhance strength, and melee
characters should not have items which increase intelligence. This is even
if you are lacking in the attributes mentioned. You will regret it. For
example, Bob a melee character finds armor with 34 armor and +15 dexterity,
great he puts it on. Now he can use a fast long bow because of the extra
dexterity, later on he finds a 48 armor suit, once he puts it on he no
longer is able to use the bow, because he has lost the +15 dexterity bonus.
Items that increase strength, dexterity, and intelligence are pretty
useless; health and energy are OK bonuses to have.

Finally choose equipment with lots of bonuses, and weigh the advantages. It
may better to equip an item with lots of useful bonus. A 38 armor with +1
all skills plus other bonus is much better than say armor with 48 armor, and
+20 defensive ability. However you may start to reconsider when you find an
armor say with 78 armor and some extra small benefits. Bigger is not better,
another example, a +20% fire resistance ring and a +10% all resistances
ring. The all resistances ring is much better; trust me. Weigh the cost.

As for rings, keep a few rings with different protections, e.g. lightning
resist, cold resist, fire resist, and swap them when you need them.

Bows:
	Use "over time" enhancements such as poison and bleeding damage, cause
this allows damage to be done whilst they and coming towards you. Slow
movement is also quite good, as it slows down their approach. Slow attack is
less useful, because it does not slow down their approach.

Melee Weapons:
	Weapons do not benefit too much from "over time" enhancements, as you
want to do as much damage and kill as fast as possible. Fire/cold/light
bonuses are nice, but best would be "Slow attack" enhancements. These are a
must for any melee weapon, and when used with a very fast weapon, it can
become the ultimate killing machine. I had two slow attack bonuses (one on
weapon, one on ring), a very fast sabre, and the Warfare whirlwind attack.
Four enemies instantly slowed down. Even Yerren could not get a blow in. A
second choice will be + attack speed for slower, higher damage maces and
axes (however slow attack is still preferred).

Staffs and magic weapons
	No bleeding or poison, extra casting speed would be best. Slow down is
nice, but slow attack speed is not really essential especially if you try to
keep your distance. Again % bonuses to the base staff class will increase
the damage the staff can deal, however these bonuses may be better off on
other equipment such as rings and amulets or armor.

Armor
	Armor should have defense or resistances; complement these with relics
and charms. Most of these charms are protection based any way.

Rings and amulets:
	You should choose any that complement your character. As they are
small you should have a few high resistance rings and amulets in place, so
you can swap then in and out when you need them. Best enhancements are
Damage to undead, slow enemies, or slow attacks, as they can then be applied
to all your weapons. Also they get stacked so you can bonus +60% damage to
undead on a ring and a weapon, making it lethal to all undead.

Finally, here is a bit of advice. Don't get too attached to your equipment.
To play best, you need to keep upgrading, and you should sell your old
stuff, even if you have great bonuses and relic/charm enhancements. I always
keep the "next" upgrade weapon/armor in inventory (e.g. one with better
damage or whatever), and wait for a complete charm or relic to upgrade it
and then use it as the main equip item. Just because its rare/epic/legendary
does not mean there is not something better for your character.

6.1.6 How damage is calculated in combat
---------------------------------------------------

After browsing forums and web sites here are some of the information
summarized on how hit and damage is calculated in TQ.

With physical damage, first a calculation is performed to see if you get hit
(some kind of offense to defense comparison). If a hit is made, then next is
deciding where it hit; 40% chance on torso, and 20% chance on other three
(head, arm legs). Next the physical damage then has 66% of the armor rating
subtracted to reduce the damage (66% can be increase with skills). This
means even if your armor is higher than the damage dealt e.g. damage = 10
hp, armor = 11, you still receive 34% damage.

If you or enemy has a shield then there is a chance to block for damage. If
your block is successful, 100% of the damage your shield can take will be
subtracted from the physical damage. However there is  a delay (recharge) on
how often the shield is used, to prevent you from blocking every attack.

Physical attacks have chance of being critical which adds extra damage to
your hit. The chance of going critical and the increase in damage is
calculated but the offensive ability of the attacker and the defensive
ability of the defender. The big the ratio, the more chance and more damage
a critical hit is. Note: Dexterity will increase OA and DA.

Magic is not affected by armor, but is based on your resistances. So if you
hit a target or an enemy hits you with a magic attack, a "dice roll" is made
with your resistance value to see if you suffer the damage. Magic attacks
are never critical.

6.1.7 Putting it all together
---------------------------------

To summarize have both short and long range attacks.
Try to have a few weapons or attacks with different types of damage.
When you equip new weapons, look at the stats to see if there is
improvement.
See where your equipment is weakest and use relics and charms to improve
them.
Try to balance your character as much as possible.
Use different rings, amulets, and weapons for different situations.

6.2 Character builds
---------------------

First the bad news; there is no ultimate build. TQ is designed so that there
are many ways to accomplish the same objective, and also there are many
objectives. So just relying on the build does not make your character super
in all situations.

Character builds define the attributes (which affect attack and defense) as
well as the skills available to the character. This is usually not enough.
You will have to balance this with the equipment your find, which either
boosts certain statistics or use to compensate for a particular lack of
ability. This is the same for relics and charms, which also affects how well
you character can handle harder difficulties. In addition your character's
statistics will determine how your play e.g. low health characters will
definitely stay away from crowds etc.

However, although there is no such thing as the ultimate build, there are
certain classes which are more powerful than other for single player. It is
also possible with planning and skill for you to create a character which
can handle most of the situations fairly well; this is what you would aim
for in single player.

6.2.1 Attribute points
--------------------------

Points allocated to mastery tiers will give bonus attribute points to your
character. These reflect in general what a character specializing in that
particular master needs. This does not mean you let it decide (and if you
do, you will have problems). Your extra attribute points should also be
allocated in a similar way.

Since you gain str/int/dex/health/energy from your mastery tier increases,
you should save a few attribute points. Just 10 can give you a boost of 40
to str/Int/Dex so save a few, you will not regret it. Use it when you find
that extra special item, which you do not have the requirements (yet).

You attributes affect the following:

Health: +25 per point: Increases your health pool

Energy: +25 per point: Increases your energy pool

Strength: +4 per point: Increases melee damage and piecing damage only
Each 50 points of Strength adds 10% Physical damage and +2 flat Physical
damage.

Intelligence: +4 per point: Increases energy regeneration rate, and all
elemental damage over time (even on enchanted melee/ranged weapons)
Each 65 points of Intelligence adds 10% Elemental damage, and roughly 1.625
flat Elemental damage (I'm not certain how far out TQ keeps the decimal)
Each 50 points of Intelligence adds 10% to Elemental duration damage, spread
evenly over the duration (yes, you get a bigger bonus to Burn/Frostburn!)

Dexterity: +4 per point:  Increases OA (chance to land critical hits) DA
(chance to avoid critical hits ) shield abilities (chance to block) and
piercing damage
Each 65 points of Dexterity adds 10% Piercing damage and roughly +1.95 flat
Piercing damage

Here are useful attributes for each type of player in order of importance,
this is just a guideline, as it will also depend on what items you find ,
and what enhancements you have. Some of the attribute points will be
allocated
from your mastery tier increases, and hence , it may not be necessary for a
magic user to put all points into intelligence.

Attribute points are one of the most problematic areas in character creation
mainly because you cannot take them out and reallocate them. Also the
attributes
you need are dependant on the items you find, so it is wise to keep a few in
stock. Also check out the items sections of this document to see the highest
stats of the epic and legendary items.

If you find in later difficulties that you have not enough attribute points
for what ever purpose (e.g. for an item, or dex for offensive or defensive
ability or str or int for the melee or magical damage, or health), you have
to rely on the points you reserved. If these are used up (and you have
completed all the +attr quests), you have two choices;
1: Level up, do some XP runs
2: Use some +% DEX,STR,INT items (This is best but will mean you cannot
change to another item or you will lose the bonus)

Melee fighters:
These characters will benefit from more damage from strength and better
armor. Health is important, as you will lose a lot of health. Dexterity
should be added for the option of ranged weapons such as bows. Energy and
intelligence is least important, better to find items to improve these
rather than invest points into it.
In later difficulties, melee characters are going to have a lot of problems
with ranged attackers, especially archers and such. You really need some
skills (such as squall in storm) or high pierce protection, otherwise you
will find it very difficult, even in Epic difficulty.
Strength
Health
Dexterity
Energy
Intelligence

Ranged weapons (hunters):
Go for dexterity to allow you to use better bows. Strength and heath are
only important so that you can get slight better armor and a bit more
damage. Energy and intelligence (even for the elemental bonuses) is less
useful  and it is better to find items to improve these rather than invest
points into it. + offense is useless for ranged users, because offense only
used in melee calculations. Also ranged non magic users have limited area
effect skills (hunting), the only being the scattershot, which is almost a
must for any bow characters.
Dexterity
Strength
Health
Energy
Intelligence

Magic users:
You will need a lot of energy but there are not many spells that constantly
use energy, most use a small amount with can be offset with regeneration and
potions. Invest in energy if you constantly use energy draining skills. It
is better to use say a staff, and have enhancements and skills to boost the
damage, rather than cast the spells yourself. Intelligence comes first; so
that you can get better armor specifically those that will boost your energy
and regeneration, as well as get the special equipment that can boost your
skills. Health should also be considered so that you do not die from a few
ranged attacks. Strength and dexterity is less important, you do not need
powerful armor.
In later difficulties, the deficiencies in armor for "Intelligence" based
magic users becomes apparent. You really need those + defense. + offense is
useless for magic users, because offense only used in melee calculations.
Intelligence
Health
Energy
Dexterity
Strength

Rogues:
Dexterity for your choice of weapons, energy I find useful because
rogues/thieves/assassin tend to use a lot of skill based attacks which use
energy. Intelligence and strength are important to a point. I find rogues
have to be a bit more balance than the other types of characters. Although
quite a few rogue skills use energy, the most constantly used ones are
energy reserve, so do not invest in energy unless you are short on this
attribute.
Rogues are not really a melee character, although there are blade based
skills. Rogues are pretty much a defense mastery, used to complement another
skill. You will have problems in later difficulties from both melee and
ranged as you cannot get the offense or defense. Poison, bleed and poison
skills will benefit a bow, and you will need a buffer such as pets or
decoys.
Dexterity
Health
Energy
Intelligence
Strength

6.2.2 First mastery
-----------------------

The first mastery is very important and forms the basis for your character.
In fact by the time you choose your second mastery you will have put in at
least 18 skill points into your first mastery (level 2-7 = 6 levels, with 3
skill points per level). Although later on you can make up the skill points
in you second mastery, it is most likely your first mastery will have the
most skill points allocated.

Choosing you first mastery is like choosing you main form of attack, and how
you play your character. See the section 5 for more details. However once
you choose you first mastery, you do not just dump skill points into the
skills and tiers at random. It is not good to say lets try this and try
that.

If you allocate your skill points wrong, you can use a Mystic to remove
skill points but not the mastery. However, this will mean you will have
played with some wrong skills at least through some part of the game.
Therefore it is best to plan your skill advancement.

Just because you chose your mastery does not mean you cannot specialize.
Every mastery has various options that can affect the way you play your
character. Let us use the Warfare mastery as an example. The warfare has 20
different skills and it is wise to select the type you need for your
character. For example

	Barbarian: You want a massive melee character. Then put your skills in
the weapons training, Dual weld branch, and the onslaught branch. These will
be your main skill points. Some points into dodge attack will also help. War
wind and battle rage tree is also nice.
	The Centurion: Ignore the onslaught, and dual weld as you will
probably have a weapon and a shield. Weapon training is a must, then dodge
attack. Also battle rage as that is a passive skill that may help you in a
sticky situation.
	The multiplayer character: You should first build your single
character with a few skills for single player campaign then put a lot more
skills in the multiplayer skills such as battle standard.
	
Just one mastery can give you so many options, when combined with your
second mastery you can have a truly unique character.

6.2.3 Second mastery
---------------------------
When you choose you second mastery at level 8, you basically define your
full character. However choose wisely as certain combinations work better
with less effort. For example, I tried a Battle mage build and it was a very
difficult build, because of contrasting requirement. That is not to say you
should not build a battle mage. However if you want to quickly build up a
killing machine, careful choosing of your second skill is best.

IMHO, Iron Lore has made the different masteries slightly unbalanced in
order to encourage you to use dual masteries rather than a plain class. For
example, Warfare lacks the ranged attacks, or Earth lacks the percentage-
based skills. What this means is that you will probably choose the second
class based upon the weakness of your first class, and the equipment you
have found. Remember by the time you choose your second class, you will have
found a lot of good items, and also had time to see how your character
perform in combat.

If you do not choose the second mastery there is a slight disadvantage, in
that you only have 32 points on your mastery tier, so you only get attribute
bonuses from one mastery. Consider this when you stick to solo mastery. You
could of course choose a second mastery that closes resembles your first
mastery, and only invest skill points into the tier (but this would mean you
are not a Rogue, or Warrior, or Storm caster etc.). In the end it is your
choice.

The main purpose of the second class is to supplement your first class,
unless you first class is doing very well, in which case go ahead and
experiment. Warfare will benefit from defense, and also Hunting whose
attributes bonuses are pretty similar, choosing this will give your
character pretty good strength, for more damage, and more blocking (from
defense) or ranged skills (from hunting). Magic users have the same choice
Earth characters may choose Storm, Spirit that will have high-energy bonus,
as well as attacks that deals with fire resistant monsters. You should also
consider the second mastery skills that boost your first skill. For example
if you have a warfare dual weld + war wind character, you may consider
Hunting because of the Call of the Hunt/Exploit weakness skills; you can do
massive damage with two weapons on weakened beasts.

To a lesser extent equipment you find should also affect your character
advancement. Why, because you may have two or three choices for your second
mastery and to narrow down to one choice, you should choose one that can
enhance your equipment skills. "So what happens if I do not find similar
equipment later on?" First I did say lesser extent, and secondly I found
that early on when you're low level and just starting to develop your first
and second mastery, greater damage means faster leveling. This means the
second mastery together with your equipment will be more in turned allowing
faster leveling. By the time you reach higher levels, and other equipment,
you will have developed higher-level skills that will offset original
equipment.

OK so what do you mean by equipment affecting choice. Well a nice "epic"
shield may benefit from Defense mastery that will have a lot of shield
attacks and shield bonuses. A good poison damage bow of a hunter may benefit
from Rogues poison and enhancements. Staff bonuses may affect a magical
mastery.

In the end you objective is to create the ultimate monster-killing machine.
The difference between a standard player and expert lies in correct
character development and how you uses all your skills, weapons, armor,
relics, rings etc. and of course your adaptability and creativity.

6.3 Difficulty levels
-------------------------

There are three levels of difficulty in TQ, normal, epic and legendary. Each
one is unlocked when you complete the previous level in the main quest. In
Epic and legendary, not only do the monsters get harder, more resistances,
health and damage, but also your own character resistances start of
negative, so you need more resistance bonus just to make up for the loss.

6.3.1 Normal
-----------------

No resistance modifications.

This level is pretty straightforward and any character build can get through
(some with a lot of potions and hardly any skill). As long as you have some
skills to help you out, a few relic and charm bonuses, and an OK set of
equipment, this level should be a breeze for melee, ranged or magic user.
You can basically proceed and complete the side quests at your own pace,
from start to end.

6.3.2 Epic
-------------
1.15 and before
-40% fire/cold/lightning/poison/pierce resistances modifications.
-25% bleed/vitality/energy leech/stun/ disrupt skill resistances
modification.
1.2
-40% fire/cold/lightning/poison/pierce resistances modifications.
0% bleed/vitality/energy leech/stun/ disrupt skill resistances modification.

Minus resistances means that you need more resistance enhancements in order
for them to start having an effect. In other words on Epic, if you have 51%
fire resistance it shows as 1% and actually only gives 1% fire resistance.

The monsters are harder, and a lot more difficult to kill. However it is
wise to proceed with the main quest and all side quests just for the XP
(which now goes up slower, because you need a lot more XP to gain next
level). Fight with skill and caution as you may find you will die often if
you use the rush and attack method for normal. Pick off monsters one by one.
Mistakes usually mean death. This is quite difficult and you will start to
concentrate more on your equipment, skills and relic bonuses to gain the
best attack/defense combination. You have to start combining skills to get
multiple bonuses especially for bosses. No more one-hit kills and monsters
start doing one-hit kills on you instead.

You will find it wise to boost up your resistances before starting epic,
especially your primary resistances, it will save you lots of problems right
from the start. You will find that your attacks seems feeble and your armor
is not doing it's job. That's because of your resistances, so do some item
farming on the last few areas of the previous difficulty is wise. You should
improve your pierce resistance, as many people will find that a group of
archers can really cause problems at this level.

For Epic, to be comfortable your character should be in the mid 30s level,
otherwise the difference in monster and you character level would be too
high and the game get increasingly difficult. You cannot rush into monsters
anymore, and you should use more a hit and run tactic. Poison, bleeding
resistances are much more important at this level.

6.3.3 Legendary
--------------------
-100% fire/cold/lightning/poison/pierce resistances modifications.
-50% bleed/vitality/energy leech/stun/ disrupt skill resistances
modification.

This level is very hard. All your skills, and weapons and bonuses seem to be
less effective, and leveling is slow. If it is anything like Diablo II, then
it will take a few characters and a few legendary runs, to really master
this difficulty.

It is best to concentrate on the main quest and skip the side quests. Rush
through the areas, skipping the monsters, (if you are fast enough), and open
the portals for later areas. This would mean a few boss attacks, and lots of
potions. Fight with caution and expect long battles. You will notice certain
attacks will work better with certain bosses, and also certain skills will
keep you alive better. You may need to redistribute some skills points.

Once you have got a few portals turned on, it is useful to go back to areas
with monsters that your character can handle. You should have an idea of
what kind of monsters you character can beat and return to those areas and
battle around to gain XP. The more you level the better the equipment you
find, both dropped and in the merchants.

Once you have attained that build with the right equipment, even certain
parts of Legendary can be easy. However mistakes most definitely end in
death, and rushing is a mistake.

Since you do not level much on Epic, you will have a difference in level on
Legendary with the monsters. You should be around mid 40s with your
character on entering Legendary. However you can do a few runs of bosses on
epic, just to gain that one or two level. Any higher would be better but the
time spent leveling on Epic would be too long.

As for your character, you really have to try to improve all aspects, from
resistances (all of them), offense, defense, movement, and your
regeneration. You have really no real choice but to play hit and run, and
concentrate on the bosses. There are so many one hit deaths at legendary so
probably best to improve movement. Just remember resistances (including
secondary) are very important at legendary ( a lot of the bosses use various
secondary resist damage skills), and I would go as far as to say, more than
damage. If need be, give up the legendary, and epic items, and use magical
and rare items, for just one simple reason; you can have good relic/charm
bonuses on them. You will find some legendary relic/charm bonuses essential
such as ¡Vrecharge for magic users.

There is not much more I can say about legendary, except it is over
difficult, especially the first time through. However, my melee character
was really struggling in Legendary, and only right at beginning, when my
magic character started. In the end my magic user was the first to complete
Legendary, so I think magic users have the advantage on Legendary. My melee
finished legendary only from equipment help from my magic user (oracle).

6.4 What am I doing wrong?
----------------------------

What am I doing wrong? You may have heard or seen people who can do 50
Typhon runs in Legendary and kill Typhon and other bosses in 10s on
Legendary. You character on the other hand seems like a weakling and takes
ages, and even a minor boss take ages to kill.

What am I doing wrong? Well, If you have been following this guide, and
still have problems then here is your answer¡K¡K Nothing.

In fact you are probably going the right direction. In order to do the
things stated above, you have to have the right combination of everything to
compliment your character and skills.

The hardest part is the right equipment balance end enhancements to keep
your damage, offense , defense and resistances. The fact is that the players
who are finding it easy have most of this right. You are not going to
achieve this with your first few characters through epic and legendary. To
be honest, these first few characters will have a hell of a time doing so
(even with some popular ultimate builds like the Ternion attack Oracle).

Once you have some characters through these harder difficulties, you can
start passing great items to your newer characters who will benefit from
these items, and find it much easier. The older characters, now armed with
better equipment will probably start running Typhon runs in Epic, to get a
few more items, before they reach the ultimate, Typhon in 10s on Legendary.

So keep going, it is normal to have some problems, on harder difficulties.


==========================================================================
7. Hints and Tips
==========================================================================

7.1 General
----------------
On early levels, you can listen for the "heart pounding" warning, which
means DRINK potion fast (Key R). Later on, it is best to keep an eye on the
health bar. This is good practice, just like looking at the rear view mirror
when driving.

Do not zoom in; I know it looks nice, but you will regret it. Always zoom
out to smallest, so that you will not be caught off guard by ranged (archers
and spell casters) firing at you from off the screen. You may zoom in to
look at the damage you made after a battle.

7.2 Exploration
--------------------
Explore the map thoroughly, always walk around the edges and clear out the
"fog of war". The maps are pretty linear, so if it is not a main route, it
will lead to a dead end, e.g. ruin or cave etc. Main paths are indicated by
braziers/torches normally on each side of the road.

Explore caves/ruins etc for the special loot.

7.3 Combat
---------------
Put all your useful skills in the first few slots, this makes access to them
easier.

Do not use the "9" or "0" key for potions, use the other default keys which
is much more accessible (see manual, he he- OK they are "E" and "R").

Kill minions first as they are a pain, lure them away if you can.

Kill ranged attackers first if you can or lure the melee monsters away so
the ranged attackers are out of range.

Try to create a character with melee and ranged attack, one primary and the
other secondary.

Clear out as many monsters a possible to gain XP and equipment.

Don't rely on regeneration of health or energy because it is slow.

Use the hit and run method. First used in the Nessus the Centaur. Most
monsters have a range and an invisible boundary that they will not cross and
hence will not follow or attack. Once you pass this point, the creature will
stop attacking turn its back and walk back towards its origin spawn point.
This is a good time to move forward and attack. As it approaches you again
just run pass the invisible boundary and repeat. However remember to clear
the area you intend to run to or else, trouble!

Know your enemy. This may seem obvious but you'll be surprised how many do
not care. In harder difficulties you will need this knowledge. Not only do
different enemies have different resistances to different damage, but also
they have speed differences. The Minotaur boss is slow, you can probably hit
it at least once with an average speed sword and run off before he raises
his double axe; try that with the spider queen and you would have been hit
and with poison damage as well.

If you are a bow user, never under estimate the usefulness of
poison/bleeding. Enough poison on your arrows and you need less shots to
kill a monster, and they will die before they reach you. You can also do
more damage to more monsters, you can shot one, the shot another whilst the
poison is working on the first monster (doing damage on two or more monsters
at once).

The 3D image uses perspective, that means the bottom of the screen is
"bigger" and top of the screen is "smaller"; this means you actually see
more of the landscape at the top. When fighting always keep enemies at the
top, and the top left and top right actually provides the longest field of
view. For ranged combat, the top left and top right is the greatest
distances, and enemies at these directions take longer to reach you. You can
fire more shots before they reach you.

7.4 Inventory
-----------------
Try not to pick up normal items, unless you need them. No stash so they take
up space and their sell value is low anyway.

When you have time, organize your inventory, TQ AI does a bad job of placing
the items you pick up and wastes space.

Don't equip items that are useless to your class. This is important in
character building as well. In other words, say you are a magic user and
find this cool very rare shield with lots of strength and damage bonuses but
require over 20 strength above your current strength point. Don't invest
point into strength if this is not what your class need the most (you will
regret it later). Sell the item instead.

Magic items are worth more than armor and weapons e.g. complete relics,
charms, magic user staffs etc. This is same for buying items as well.

Concentrate on weapons and skills. Spawn monsters are level specific, so the
creatures you will encounter will be leveled around your current character
level. Therefore your only advantage is greater damage done, by clever use
of inventory, relics and skill allocation. If you do it well, most spawned
monsters will be a hack (pun intended). This is especially important in
higher difficulties.

Use and collect relics and charms, stack them up for the bonus. However do
not use them just because you have them, or you have completed a set for the
bonus, add them if your character needs that bonus. For example, magic users
can benefit from ¡V requirements or increased energy relics and charms,
fighters do not. If your character does not need the bonuses provided by the
charm or relic, then sell them (completed items will sell for a lot more).

+ all are the best. + all skills are the best. Never throw these away unless
you have something much better. These are basically lots of extra skill
points. You can in fact have more skill levels than the maximum with this.
For example Warfare weapons training has six levels, when you max this out
to six and wear a +1 all skills item, you are actually level 7 on weapons
training. + all resistances comes a close second. Don't throw these away
unless you have something better, you will need lots of these items in
legendary.

7.5 Character building
----------------------------
Work on your character according to his/her class. For example, do not add
points to attribute intelligence just to equip a nice item if you are a
melee character, or do not increase your strength just to wear a nice armor
if you are a magic user. If your character is doing well in killing enemy
you can then afford to use your points on these "lesser" attributes,
otherwise concentrate on attributes needed by your character.

Concentrate on specific skills required by your character, do not put skill
points on skills your character does not need, just because you have skill
points left, or just because the skill is available. For example, Do not put
skill point in Dual weapon, if you do not intend to use dual weapons (tier
2) for a warrior, put it in weapon mastery (tier 1) instead.

If you have "spare" skill points, put it in your secondary masteries or put
it in your tiers. Secondary skills are more important later in game and also
in harder levels to balance your character.

Re-organize your skills, especially or harder difficulties. This is not just
for tweaking your character or correcting mistakes. In harder difficulties,
you will level slower, and paying to re-organize skills is vital. You can
put up a particular skill for a certain part of the game e.g. to increase
health or damage, and change it to something else later on. Use it to your
advantage. You can also make use of this when switching between multiplayer
and single player, where in multiplayer you can change to more group benefit
skills.

==========================================================================
8. Interesting little things
==========================================================================

8.1 Cheats?
No I do not encourage cheating, so no real cheats here, not even special
modes the game may provide. All the following are just little "work arounds"
which are allowed in a "normal game". You can look for other facts if you
want real cheats.

Say you have an item with +10 str bonus but you need another 5 str points to
wear it, then equip another item with has at least +5 str bonus or -
requirements, then wear the item you want, and then remove the other item.
The +10 bonus on the first item will allow you to keep wearing it. You could
also use skills which increases your str such as rage, and wear it. As long
as you do not remove your item, you can always wear it.

Mule-ing, or using another computer (probably a friend on the internet) is
not cheating but allows you to exchange equipment between characters. Just
get a friend to open a new game on the internet, you join the game, drop the
items you want to pass to a another character. Exit game with first
character and join game with second character and pick up the stuff. You can
also create special characters (mules) whose purpose is to hold all these
goodies and pass it to your "real" characters.

Infinite XP : This is not really a cheat, but definitely a way to get to
level 65. So skip this now, or it will spoil the fun¡K¡K..First you will need
a good ranged attack for this, and if you are using magic, have an attack
which uses with low-ish energy usage. In the Egypt level where you get the
hand of balance, you will have to battle the four big statues; remember?
When you get to this part, Destroy the obelisk and two statues closest to
the door, leaving the other two statues and obelisks. Now move SE corner of
the room, and use shift to stay put and fire at the center of the room. If
you position right, you will hit the undead monsters. When one is killed
another will spawn, and so on. Each undead will give you XP. Use something
to hold down the shift and the first button and leave it to run. Infinite
XP. (This tip was found in www.titanquest.net forums)

8.2 Final things

On 1.11 patch ( I do not know if it appeared earlier ¡V or later) is that
once, I was battling the Telkine. He killed me and was walking off, when I
went back, his back was turned and did not see me. I just creep behind and
hit him, and he did not turn round. I just kept on bashing him from behind
after that and killed him without another bit of health lost.

Your enemies drop what they wear, and attack with the weapons you see. Look
at them carefully. Look at the different color armor and the different
weapons they wear. The detail is quite impressive. They will drop these
items too, when killed.

The physics is so over exaggerated. Bash monsters on the edge of pits, and
cliffs and they fall off. I once used a club to bash a satyr and it flew up
in the air. It's just really fun to watch as you play. Also look at the
twisted bodies of some of your enemies, when they lie dead on the ground.

Some NPCs have better animation than your character. I notice this talking
to Diomedes right at the start. Diomedes was actually waving his arms and
everything, whilst my character was starting blankly in an attack pose
looking stupid. You will see the heads of the cows/bulls move as well, and
of course the rippling of water and swaying of grass as you walk through the
fields.

There is no blood, probably to keep the rating down, stupid really because
it's a really violent game. Bleeding damage and no blood?

==========================================================================
9. Credits and acknowledgments
==========================================================================

Thanks to THQ and Ironlore for creating and distributing this amazing game.

www.gamespot.com for telling me about this game
www.gamefaqs.com for all the other faqs and walkthroughs, which helped me
through other games
www.titanquest.net for all the interesting information and tips whilst I was
playing TQ to help me get through some of the more difficult situations.
